 dr. goldberg offers everything i look for in a general practitioner.  he's nice and easy to talk to without being patronizing; he's always on time in seeing his patients; he's affiliated with a top-notch hospital (nyu) which my parents have explained to me is very important in case something happens and you need surgery; and you can get referrals to see specialists without having to see him first.  really what more do you need?  i'm sitting here trying to think of any complaints i have about him but i'm really drawing a blank. 
 Unfortunately the frustration of being Dr. Goldberg's patient is a repeat of the experience I've had with so many other doctors in NYC -- good doctor terrible staff.  It seems that his staff simply never answers the phone.  It usually takes 2 hours of repeated calling to get an answer.  Who has time for that or wants to deal with it?  I have run into this problem with many other doctors and I just don't get it.  You have office workers you have patients with medical needs why isn't anyone answering the phone?  It's incomprehensible and not work the aggravation.  It's with regret that I feel that I have to give Dr. Goldberg 2 stars. 
 Dr. Goldberg has been my doctor for years and I like him.  I've found his office to be fairly efficient.  Today I actually got to see the doctor a few minutes early!  He seems very engaged with his patients and his demeanor is friendly yet authoritative.    I'm glad to have Dr. Goldberg as my doctor. 
 Been going to Dr. Goldberg for over 10 years. I think I was one of his 1st patients when he started at MHMG. He's been great over the years and is really all about the big picture. It is because of him not my now former gyn Dr. Markoff that I found out I have fibroids. He explores all options with you and is very patient and understanding. He doesn't judge and asks all the right questions. Very thorough and wants to be kept in the loop on every aspect of your medical health and your life. 
 Got a letter in the mail last week that said Dr. Goldberg is moving to Arizona to take a new position there in June.  He will be missed very much.  I think finding a new doctor in NYC that you actually like might almost be as awful as trying to find a date! 
 I don't know what Dr. Goldberg was like before  moving to Arizona but let me tell you STAY AWAY from this doctor and this office. I was going to Dr. Johnson before he left and Goldberg took over when Johnson left. He is not a caring doctor. He is only interested in the co-pay and having you come in for medication refills every month. He will not give refills and could less about patients's financial situations. Trying to get your 90 days mail away pharmacy prescriptions through this guy is a joke. And to make matters even worse his office staff is incompetent. 90% of the time when you call the office they'll put you through to a voice mail that NO ONE ever answers or returns your call. Both my adult children and husband have decided to leave this practice after experiencing such frustration. The entire office has an attitude like they are doing you a favor. Give me a break! Stay away from this doc and the practice. You deserve better and they will not be there when you really need them. I have never felt compelled to write a bad review about anyone until I met this pathetic excuse for a doctor who is all about the money. 
 Top notch doctor in a top notch practice. Can't say I am surprised when I was referred to him by another doctor who I think is wonderful and because he went to one of the best medical schools in the country. It is really easy to get an appointment. There is minimal wait to be seen and his bedside manner is great. 
 Dr. Eric Goldberg is a fantastic doctor who has correctly diagnosed every issue that my wife and I have had. Unlike many of my past doctors Dr. Goldberg is very accessible and we have been able to schedule appointments with him and his staff very quickly. We are happy to have him in the neighborhood and look forward to being his patients for many years to come. 
 Good truck stop dining at the right price. We love coming here on the weekends when we don't feel like cooking. 
 If you like lot lizards you'll love the Pine Cone! 
 Enjoyable experience for the whole family. The wait staff was courteous and friendly; the food was reasonably priced and a good value. A word of advice--LEAVE ROOM FOR DESSERT! the deserters are great but huge! Plan to bring some home 
 One of my favorite truck stop diners with solid food and friendly quick service. My god those desserts are huge! I can't imagine eating that giant cream puff. All the food we had was delicious and I love how they leave a carafe of coffee on the table. Love this place. Would definitely be back if I was in the area! 
 Only went here once about a year and a half ago but they had great pancakes! My only problem with it at the time was that they allowed smoking so I left smelling like a cigarette. With the change in law I'm sure the atmosphere has improved! 
 Great truck stop restaurant.  I've had breakfast and dinner here and it has always been good.  Huge portions and reasonable prices.  The bakery I guess is legendary.  They have doughnuts the size of your head!  Eclairs the size of your arm and Cream Puffs that are about 10\ high.  On our most recent trip in the area stopped at the gas station attached to the restaurant fo some quick snacks and of course BAKERY.If you are driving by and see the sign for The Pine Cone Restaurant - Take the next off ramp and stop it. 
 Yeah thats right a five freakin star rating.  Five Star Truck Stop Dining At Its Finest.Be prepared to eat.  I was first introduced to the Pine Cone at its Johnson Creek location years ago and freaked out at the size of the awesome delicious desserts.   Then on a recent road trip someone mentioned about eating at the Pine Cone I thought is there really more than one?  I looked out the window to see exactly where we were at and it wasn't near Johnson Creek -- when we arrived and I saw the bakery....I knew I was home.It was near dinner time so I ordered stuffed chicken breast.  The dinner roll alone is a meal.  I can't say enough about dinner.  Everything is homemade. They don't add alot of salt if any.  You can tell its fresh.  Its plentiful.  Its cheap.  You literally can stuff yourself for next to nothing.You can't possibly leave this place without indulging on some bakery goods to take home IF they can make it home.  In our case they were safely packed in the trunk for our safety and yours.  The last thing we need to explain to the police is we were under the influence of bakery goods from the Pine Cone. 
 Ate a Saturday morning breakfast at the Pine Cone.  Friendlyquick service normal prices.  But for the new year - the special was all-you-can-eat pancakes for $2.12 I added a breakfast sausage patty ($3.00).  Father had the typical two eggs toast hash-bowns (seem fresh cut) sausage links.  Food was tasty no major qualms other than - the hash-browns need a bit more cooking and the coffee needs a bit more bite.very nice assortment of bakes goods - massive - as large as your head cream-puffs eclairs - I took a blueberry muffin to go - which I enjoyed.  Quick exit from I-94...just northeast of  Madison 
 Attention fans of David Lynch.  Do stop by this place.  The atmosphere staff and patrons will certainly help to make your visit enjoyable.Last time I was here I ordered the caramel nut covered cinnamon roll.  The waitress asked if I wanted it warmed with some butter.   I thought that sounded even better and said to go ahead and do that.  She nodded agreement.  Then when she brought it to me it was unheated and no butter.   Odd but also kind of humorous.  I always enjoy being in a David Lynch film from time to time.The service and food is way better than the country restaurant just a mile south on 51.  Be sure to go here instead.   Their booths are made for skinny people from the 50s.   take a table.  start a conversations with the truck driver to your left. We used to go to the Pine Cone when it was across the street.  Must be hard times for these guys because the interior appears to be older than what they had when they were on the other side of the street.   That place now sits empty.   Why is this area depressed?   Don't ask me I don't know.  Do I look like I have all the answers?The food here is good and the prices are cheap.   Go here for a nice meal and a flash back to the past and don't forget to take home some bakery.  Or if you aren't hungry just stop by for some great baked goods.    Well worth the stop.This place gets four stars because of their five star bakery selection.  Crazy big cinnamon rolls and good prices. 
 With a recent addition of a truck driver for a BF I have found myself frequenting truck stops to dine. This little place is quite a pleasant surprise. Basically it is just great home cooking. Everything is homemade and quite good. The baked goods in the front counter were amazing. The size of the cinnamon rolls was insane. And of course I couldn't leave without a piece of pie. 
 This is one of the best breakfasts I have had! Is the decor dated? Absolutely but it just adds to the nostalgic charm! The place just reeks of beef cooking... Ahhh delicious! Check out the pastry cases!!!! OMG is all I have to say! 
 hands down one of the best breakfasts my wife and i have had. stopped in here based on the positive reviews from fellow yelpers and was sure glad i did. this is a good sized diner at a truck stop. the first thing that caught our eye was the pastries - they were all huge and all looked great. tip - be sure to save space for at least one. i went with the cinnamon roll french toast and was very pleased. very large portion and great taste - go witht the sausage patty over the links. people behind us had links on their plate and they didnt look too appetzing. the patty was good. wife went with a chicken friend steak eggs and hashbrowns. hashbrowns left a bit to desire but they get bonus points for being real potatoes and fresh. overall great experience and we were in and out in 35 mins so we could continue out journey. looking forward to stopping here again sometime soon. 
 This is definitely not your usual truck stop. Pastries look delicious. Dinner rolls are large enough for a meal themselves and good!  We had a young waitress who I think was new. We found her to be sweet polite and trying very hard. The lady managing the restaurant was really rude to her. We could all hear it. 
 A delicious breakfast.  Amazing fresh bakery and pastry items.  HOWEVER the parkinglot/gas station area is filthy.  Strewn with debris dead cars broken glass.  If you judge a book by this cover you would NEVER venture inside.  I hope the Mgr.  sees this and cleans up. 
 Don't be fooled because it's in a truck stop truckers know where there are good places to eat. Stop here just for the desserts I bought an eclair that must have weighed a pound delicious like they are supposed to be made. Cream Puffs look like they wouldn't fit in a one pound coffee can... grin. Don't miss this place... 
 Continuing on my Saturday morning hangover theme: there's just something about a plateful of greasy food when you're slightly hung over that makes it all better. The Pine Cone has down-home rib-sticking greasy food in spades.  The SO and I split the chicken fried steak which comes with plenty of toast hashbrowns and two eggs.  I could'nt finish mine!  The gravy must be the same that they use for biscuits and gravy because it tasted sausage-y and as my plate sat there I could see the grease rising to the top.  BUT--I didn't come here in search of health food and it was just what the doctor ordered. I'll work out later. 
 Some times Jane and Michael Stern are on point and other times the story of the place beats the food.  I would definitely return to the Pine Cone.  It's a bakery and diner attached to a truck stop on the Wisconsin highway.  I live in Chicago and work in a famous Mexican restaurant and I get up to Wisconsin for the old school steak and butter as much as possible: it gives me the energy to do my job.  Pine Cone has eclairs and cream puffs the size of my cat.  And I got a pig cookie.  This little truck stop gives me the big energy to get even deeper into steak and butter territory. 
 I like this location better than the one near Johnson's creek.  It is a bit tight when you walk in but the charm soon takes over.  I was not really impressed by the food.  However their pastries won my over.  Try it all!  The pie was delicious.  I went with a simple apple selection.  Delicious perfection.  It is nothing crazy no fancy name but truthfully one of the best piece of classic apple you can find around here.  The service is a little slow but once again it is a small restaurant with lots of charm.  You get what you get and I love it.  It is near a Christmas tree farm so it is the perfect place to stop and get some cocoa on your way. 
 OMG!  The bakery items at Pinecone are AMAZING!   Cinnamon rolls as big as your head and absolutely scrumptious!   The food in the restaurant is great for truck stop food.  We've only come for breakfast but stop every single time we head up to Rhinelander  WI.  Do NOT miss this place if even only for their baked goods! 
 A really lovely surprise on a rather horrific family road trip.We were greeted at the door the waitress was a peach and the nice man who filled water/helped out was the sweetest guy ever. The food is also great if you're a fan of the diner-type grub; my hot turkey sandwich will live on in my dreams.You can definitely tell the place has the old time appeal of a great family place as all the locals (mostly older people) know each other and it's clear it's the happening place for breakfast with the over-60 crowd (but hey that says the food has to be pretty homestyle and tasty to me.)  If you're headed down 94 and need a good lunch stop make this it. 
 Very nice and clean place to have breakfast or lunch 
 I eat here regularily because it is consistently good.  Very large menu which makes it tough to choose but never disappointed! 
 Unlimited hot coffee. I don't have any recollection of what I ate....I wanted t give it four stars but that would be a very generous review for a meal I cannot recall.I know it was decently good and it's like the only restaurant in Deforest.For that I give it four stars. 
 Homestyle cooking at its best dnt go to culvers McDonald's or whatever trash is right off the hwy head a bit further down u will find this gem one of the reasons I love this place so much? They dnt play annoying music scratch that they don't play ANY music. People working here are super nice as to be expected. If I owned this joint I would invest in a new bigger sign as I drove right by this place and almost missed it twice. 
 Nice simple homey diner. Very friendly staff huge family friendly menu salad bar. If you are on the road this beats the same old options. 
 Love their breakfast menu & they have friendly waitstaff. We go there nearly every Friday for the last 4 yrs.  I love that they don't play any music.  It is quiet conversational and comfortable. 
 Went here for lunch with two co-workers checked Yelp before we went and the reviews were very positive so we decided to give it a try.Yikes! How can the reviews be 4-5 stars and the service at best \average\ the food was terrible and myself and my co-workers all agreed this restaurant doesn't rate two stars.I had one of the special Friday offerings Smelt. It came with a salad (very average but fresh) fries (ordinary) and the Smelt. After a 20-25 minute wait our server came with our orders. I looked at my plate and was shocked! There was 12-15 so-called Smelt about 3\ long and deep fried. They looked like little fat cigarettes! I bit into one and it was all batter I tried another and it was the same. I had deep fried batter for lunch!!I haven't had a meal this bad since I got out of the Navy!  My co-workes meals were not much better one had Chicken Fried Steak and he said it was made out of the box. My other co-worker had the Cod and he said it was mushy and brown colored! YUK! I hate to write such a negative review but this restaurant earned \one\ star. Maybe they have great breakfast! I hope they do because their lunches are sub-par. There are other restaurants on this street/highway I'd give them a try before I stopped here. I know my co-workers and I won't be coming back. 
 Huge menu fresh tasty food reasonable prices.  Beats a chain highway place for sure. The chicken dumpling soup alone is worth a trip (fresh made every day and it caused my vegetable-phobic daughter to eat carrots and celery of her own voltion!);  the steak-cut French fries were great and the coconut cream pie was wonderful. 
 Food was very good. I had the Reuben sandwich. My only suggestion is that the waitress should check back more often to see if we need anything. Otherwise I recommend it. 
 My boyfriend and I came here to have breakfast after New Years. We weren't expecting much being not at our best either. The service as mentioned several times in yelp is really slow. My drink was forgotten about and the next time our waitress came around she was serving our meal about 30-40 minutes from taking our order. The restaurant was probably half full of people. My boyfriends meal was mediocre \at best\ as he put it but my meal was worse. My bacon and egg omelette was burnt and the cheese was scarce. At the end of our meal our server still charged us for the missing drink but they were kind enough to take it off the bill that is while we waited 10 minutes standing at the register. I wouldn't go back to this restaurant because I think my time is worth more than they treated it but could be nice for those who think differently. 
 Nice clean place with a very friendly staff.  Great homemade chicken dumpling soup and a very tasty club sandwich.  Decor is outdated but not sloppy. Good local place to bring the family. 
 Californians are all about the In-N-Out where you can get your burger animal style. And the Midwest is all about Culver's where the Butter Burger is the thing to order.C. and I ate lunch here on our way between Milwaukee and Mosinee before going to my folks for Christmas. I got a cheddar burger with fries and C. got the two-piece chicken dinner with mashed potatoes and green beans.That's one of the things I love about Culver's. Yes it's a fast food restaurant. But they also do family restaurant food well. The chicken was good and the green beans really fresh C. said. Fast food you can feel good about.I also got a frozen custard their flavor of the day: Swiss almond Christmas or something like that. Chocolate custard with slivered almonds. Yummo. 
 I wanted ice cream so my husband pulled off the highway at this Culver's. We opted to get the flavor of the day (cookie dough craving). I was disappointed to find that it was a chocolate custard with TONS of cookie dough chunks because I like custard and not just the mix-ins etc. but it was overall a decent sundae. I'll just stick to vanilla next time! 
 Next to Chick-Fil-A Culver's is my fav fast food chain.  Rarely is a snowboarding trip complete without Culver's to top off the day.The butter burgers hit the spot (though mine was heavy on the red onions; good thing those are easily removeable) and the fried cheese curds are to die for.  You don't find those floating around just anywhere.  But if there is anything you MUST get it's a cup of the frozen custard.  Damn that's good stuff. 
 Go-to meal: cheddar butter burger fried cheese curds and flavor of the day custard.The difference between a deluxe burger and cheddar butter burger is that in the deluxe you'll get American cheese.  And you have to pay 25 cents extra to add lettuce tomato etc. to the cheddar butter burger.  File that away in your memory bank. 
 Really good stuff!! The custard was great! I loved it and when I am back in the old USA I can only hope I will cross paths with another culvers.You know what the thing is with culvers? You actually don't need that much it's sort of like eating cake batter or cookie dough. You can only have so much before you start getting that sickly feeling and start stirring that plastic spoon around and staring down the custard and wondering why you dont wanna finish. Yeah it's custard and it's heavy especially when you add every kind of peanut butter chocholate bar to the mix.Let me tell you those first five spoonfuls are pure goodness then it goes downhill. Less is more with this stuff let me tell you! Next time I am getting the smallest size and I will be far more pleased and not guilty I threw out a mega size bucket. Hahaha! 
 Love it!!!!! Love it!!!!!! love it!!!!!!!   Who doesn't love Culver's! 
 Everything was great except for the burgers they are greasy and very charred compared to other stores. 
 I really like both Chinese restaurants in town.  This one has outstanding crab rangoon.  Love the chicken with snow peas and mushrooms and General Tso Chicken.  Food is always ready in 10 minutes which is accurate.  Good place and they give you free pop. 
 Above average takeout with friendly staff. The sauce on the pan fried noodle is tasty. Dumplings are quite good. 
 We order from Chang Jiang often and have never been disappointed.  The menu is huge and can accomodate anyone's taste buds.  The service is quick usually ready in 10 minutes. 
 If you live in Madison you too probably have a love/hate relationship with Charter.  It's nice to have high speed Internet without having to buy a useless cable package however it kind of sucks that the service is insanely inconsistent.  As someone who has spent countless hours with customer service representatives ranging from inadequate to empathetic and resourceful I have no idea where the problem lies with their service.  (a.k.a. why am I not consistently getting the Internet service that I both adore and pay so much for?) However those of us who just want high-speed Internet without phone or cable one just sort of has to suck it up as this is really the only option. 
 My arch-enemy.I've never encountered a company with such an astounding lack of customer service.  Their monopoly on the local market doesn't help either.UPDATE: after posting this review a customer service rep contacted me regarding my problem.  I had a rather pleasant email exchange with the reps.  We still weren't able to correct my problem but for finding an employee that was willing to go above and beyond they gain an extra star. 
 They charge more than the services they provide are worth.  Since they currently have a monopoly on cable tv in the madison area there is nothing anyone can do about it. 
 To be fair I am not yet a customer so I cannot rate the actual quality of their cable/internet.  That said I have so no such qualms about revealing their absolutely HORRENDOUS customer service practices.I spoke to a representative yesterday to sign up for internet service at my new apartment.  I specifically asked the representative if there were any promotions currently available in order to receive the best price possible.  He quoted me 39.99 as their only current promotion for basic internet (not including moden/router rentals upgraded speed etc.) Taking him at his word I accepted and scheduled an installation.  Thus begins the tale of woe:--------------------------------------------------------------  Later that night on the internet:  I see advertised in giant bold colorful letters $24.99 for basic internet.  Just about half the price of the \promotion\ the representative offered me.-  I call the representative line to find out what I was told a blatant lie (in nicer terms of course).  He confirms the promotion is available but he doesn't have authority to change me to that price. TRANSFER 1 TO SALES!- Sales also confirms the much cheaper promotion but says it is an online-only offer and she absolutely cannot give it to me:  I can only receive it online and I will need to reschedule my installation.  TRANSFER 2 TO THE INTERNET!- The internet promotion finds my address alright but instead of being able to sign up online every time I reach the promotion page for my address I receive the same error message:  \Your session has timed out or encountered an error. Please start over or click the \Back Button\ on your browser. If you still wish to contact us.\  This occurs over 3 different computers and the same number of unique browsers.  TRANSFER 3 TO THE ONLINE-CHAT REPRESENTATIVE!-  Online chat confirms again that the service is available but I cannot achieve it online only over the phone.  Having just been told the *exact opposite* i attempt to point out the circular logic there but to no avail. Apparently reducing my price to their own advertised offer would be considered \downgrading\ a customer and he is not allowed to do that. TRANSFER 4 TO THE PHONE REPRESENTATIVE (AGAIN)!-  The new phone representative tells me that as I am NOT a customer she cannot help me at all.  Still loving the contradictions (the last one claimed that she could not downgrade customers now I'm not even a customer?  Really?) I try to argue but she claims sales needs to handle me and transfers my call.  TRANSFER 5 TO SALES (AGAIN)!- And at this point after another few minutes of lovely Charter advertisements and soothingly torturous elevator music I am transferred to... a voice mail.  This proceeds to Inform me that the Sales Depts. hours are over so please call back later and then terminates the call.---------------------------------------------------3 fun filled hours of lies contradictions and a misinformation campaign that would dazzle ANY public figure later... absolutely nothing was accomplished except a gigantic waste of my life and a review that will hopefully reveal these horrifying business practices to all those unsuspecting cable-seeking fellows on Yelp.Beware. 
 Used Charter for a couple of years. Just ditched them and I couldn't be happier. Shortly after we first started with Charter our connection went out took them days to send someone out and it turned out they'd disconnected us for no reason at all. Thanks Charter. Fast forward to the recent past when our bill went up I called up to try and get a new promotional rate because I'm no paying $60 for internet that bombs out briefly a couple times a day. They said they couldn't do anything better than their listed rate. After that I decided to downgrade to their lowest speed for the time being in order to save some money. When I called up to do so they transferred me to retentions and magically they offered me a better rate. Turned out they were lying and there was an additional charge on top of that because I wasn't bundling serviced (I have no interest in rotting my brain out watching cable TV or having a phone that I can't take with me in my pocket) when I complained and asked for the original rate the supervisor did not apologize and said the last person I talked to must have assumed I knew about the extra fee. When I told her I wanted the original rate she said there was nothing she could do what is the point of having a retentions department if the best they can do is what is listed on the website?Finally I organized DSL with AT&T which was simple and easy and did not require a visit for installation. I just plugged the DSL modem in and called customer service who guided me through the set up. When I called to cancel with Charter they offered me the original rate but I'm pretty sure it would have been the same thing again. After calling to disconnect I got several calls from Charter trying to get my business back if perhaps they offered me a really good rate but by that point they'd managed to blow whatever shred of credibility they had left in my mind. Since I don't trust their billing practices I had no interest in continuing business with them any longer and am now much happier for it! 
 I signed up for Yelp solely so I could post a review of Charter. That is how much I hate them. If you are new to Madison and you don't live downtown - go with someone else. If you are living downtown sorry like me you're probably stuck with Charter. I have been their customer for 7 years so my list of woes is long but I'll just sum up the current one:I canceled my account towards the middle of June. The account was to be canceled as of 7/1. On 7/2 I moved. On 7/8 I returned all my equipment to Charter. 7/9 - present I am STILL receiving bills for this account (now up to $280!). I have called 4 times and received INCREDIBLY poor service. People who were supposed to call me back have not. All have admitted that yes my account is showing up as canceled on 7/1 but that some mysterious \work order\ has not been completed. The current agent I am speaking with told me they actually OWE me $19 but that the account still will not be canceled until the \work order\ is complete. Do yourself a favor and get U-Verse or WHATEVER else is available in your area. Charter has a monopoly on downtown Madison and as such treats its customers like crap. 
 In my opinion Charter Communications is just terrible.  They have been unreliable unhelpful rude and incapable of providing an acceptable level of service.  The customer service representatives are like talking to pre-programed robots even in the midst of a prolonged service outage their main goal is to sell more worthless services. Avoid this company like the plague. 
 By far the worst company I have ever worked wit. If you can avoid Charter do so at all costs. Absolutely terrible customer service and SCAMMERS. I have to call every bill I get because they add charges. I have had to call about TV and internet about 10 times in 2 months. 
 Do NOT. I repeat - do not do business with this company. We purchased a furnace with an extended warranty. The warranty was for 650.00 and we were told it would cover any defects issues etc. Within 2 years the blower motor went out on a Friday. They advised us it would be 198.00 per hour since it was overtime. This was at 3pm on a Friday. They told me to read the fine print..... you know the drill. Finally after much run around I was told we would have a man out for no charge Monday morning at 8am. Of course no one showed up. after 3 more calls and missed times finally we had a tech arrive at 12noon. They do NOT do what they say they are rude and not the least bit proactive. Beware of any promises the sales persons make and any comittments the company makes. 
 We called them once to fix our heat -$200. We called them again -$500. Oh and that was without giving us an estimate. Just making the repairs and sending us a bill. And the system was still broken. We finally called another company and the problem was fixed. HVAC problems can be tough but there isn't much reason to take a chance with this company. There are plenty of other HVAC companies who are more competent and communicative. 
 Scheduled appointment and repeated the date and time to confirm... The technician was a no show. So i called and was told hat the appointment was for another day and time. Ok a misunderstanding. They said someone would come out in 2 hours. In 3 hours I called and they said something else came up. I said \it's now or I am calling someone else\. The guy on the phone just said \ok\.These people are disorganized do not respect your time and clearly don't care about making customers happy.  Don't waste your time on these losers. 
 I was super nervous about using these guys due to the poor reviews but I have a home warranty and the company chooses who we work with- I didn't have a choice.  I was pleasantly surprised.  We actually had to cancel our first appointment because we were having some major electrical work done that morning and the power was shut off at the time the appointment was supposed to be.  THEY actually called us a little later in the afternoon to find out how things were going and asked when they could send someone out.  They came out on time and got right to work.  The technician was nice and knowledgeable and explained to me that our A/C was shot (bad compressor and burned out wires- we were worried this might be the case after he said it was almost 20 years old).  I was glad to hear he knew about the warranty process and explained how that would all work too.  So far so good.  I'll be sure to update my review when they actually repair or replace the A/C (it's pending approval from the warranty company at the moment). 
 This public library is a short drive from our house.  During the school year you see a lot of students here from the neighboring schools.  During the summer a lot of Moms here w/ their toddlers and young preschoolers reading.  I don't go here much although my daughter does.  They're open til 8PM four days a week which is cool for those who work later in the day.Before we replaced our printer I was here frequently.  Some of the librarians can be snooty but whatever.  It's a small hometown type library but has what you need to relax and read or get some work done on their computers and printers.A good-needed staple for the area.INFO:Monday-Thursday: 9-8Friday-Saturday: 9-5:30Sunday: 12-3CLOSED: January 1 Easter Sunday Memorial Day July 4 Labor Day Thanksgiving December 24 & 25. Closing early at 5:30 on December 31. 
 Needs more books and homeless people. DVD collection didn't include Jingle All The Way and the place feels off putting. One star. 
 I've had a copy of Jingle All The Way since it came out and they haven't charged me a late fee yet. Talk about refusing to enforce the laws. 
 Grade: CThe food is almost as good as the prices. Decent service. 
 I have never eaten at the Green Lantern but whatever.  What I HAVE done is gone to karaoke there.I am not the kind of person to enjoy a \hip\ bar.  I don't want ironic metal on the jukebox or $8 flirtinis.   What I want is totally unpretentious karaoke renditions of Unskinny Bop from people that still look like they graduated high school in 1991 and $2.50 vodka and cranberry juices. 
 I'm sure if I drove far enough outside of Minneapolis I'd find a place about as awesome as the Green Lantern. Instead of doing all of that work I just wish the Green Lantern would move into my backyard.I HATE bars where I feel like I have to do a lot of work just to try to have a good time. I'm not dressing up or drinking a certain drink just to feel like I have a shot of being accepted somewhere believe me. The Green Lantern rules because it's completely laid back and totally unpretentious. I've seen such a wide variety of people there and everyone is always having a great time.Besides the drinks are super strong and cheap - that alone is good enough for me. 
 The biggest plus is it is on the lake with a dock and open for breakfest.That is huge if your a fan of a boating trip to eat ...I'll swing by soon to actually eat there again ...it's been 3 years since we had a boat.We did find a used boat ...now we may return.I guess that says a lot as without the boat we do not go with a boat its a 6 out of 5 stars!!!! 
 Who does not love the Greeny?  As some posts before me it is a place you can go and have a good time no matter what and just be you.  The staff is awesome and the food is decent.  But the Green lantern has something that other places try to imitate atmosphere. I have seen bar after bar try and create a fun atmosphere but they cannot.  The Greeny has it and I wish I could get there more than I do. 
 The Green Lantern is the kind of place that comes in right above the Mendoza Line.  What I mean by this is the quality of the meals and the atmosphere of this supper club is good enough to warrant return visits but not to elicit rave reviews.  I'm not a supper club kind of guy so right off the bat a place like the Green Lantern isn't going to be my favorite.  However there are plenty of old school supper clubs that do a nice enough job that I've got no qualms tagging along for dinner on a Friday night.  The Green Lantern is one of these places albeit just barely.My friend however absolutely loves this place.  As such I've had cause to dine here many times over the years.  There are quite a few pluses.  The bartenders are quick and generally friendly and they've got an adequate tap selection including Ale Asylum offerings.  I love the location right off the lake and two-thirds of the seating areas have great atmosphere.  The service has always been above average and I can't think of a bad experience - this type of consistency over the years is very hard to maintain.  They've got Wiggies which are kind of like low-rent roesti - hashbrowns with onions peppers and American cheese.  And finally the Green Lantern is obviously popular with the denizens of McFarland.  I don't recall a single trip out here where the bar wasn't mostly full and the restaurant hopping.The negatives: first and foremost I've always found the menu to be pretty limited.  I'm not big on fish fry and the Green Lantern's Friday night menu doesn't have much else aside from sandwiches and a grilled chicken breast entree.  Now as I said I'm not big on fish fry so my opinion should be taken lightly but the times that I have ordered the fish I've been underwhelmed.  This is probably just me - my friend simply can't get enough of the stuff.  Prices are moderately high for the perceived quality though the bar is quite reasonable.  There's also a bit of a hassle when it comes to paying the bill.  While I've never had any concerns with service from the waitstaff I have stood around for upwards of 15 minutes waiting to have the hostess swipe my card.  That is unacceptable and it's unfortunately led to smaller tips to otherwise deserving waitresses.  Finally it always seems that after waiting 20-30 minutes for a table on a Friday night we always end up either in the basement or at one of the few poorly located tables upstairs.  If it were just up to me I don't think I'd be going to the Green Lantern all that much.  After all I don't live in McFarland and I don't really go for supper club fish fries.  But so long as I know people that love going here I'll tag along and have a decent enough time.  I think you'd be hard pressed not to at least be able to do that at the Green Lantern. 
 We ate there several weeks back so the details are a bit thin but I do recall that the service was good and we enjoyed the burger club sandwich and ham and cheese our group had.  Its exactly what you'd expect for a good supper club. 
 Ate breakfast here today; overall a really good atmosphere and some tasty items on the menu.  I would recommend their Wiggies a hodgepodge of hash browns cheese green peppers diced ham and mushrooms. I topped it off with a mimosa andthen my gf and I strolled out onto their dock and enjoyed some lakeside scene. 
 We love The Green Lantern. The food is wonderful and the price is great. We have never had a long wait for a table and once we are seated we are always waited on right away. All the staff is very friendly and atmosphere is welcoming. We have taken several friends here for dinner and always have a great time. 
 We love this place!  This restaurant has excellent food!  It has been family owned for years and that is what makes the difference.  Love being regulars here!  Friday night fish fries are always good.  Scallops are really worth trying.  Salads are always fresh.  Chili is very thick and meaty. This place and staff are always welcoming even when you arrive by boat!  Highly recommend it.  Be sure to  check out their specials on their awesome website!  http://www.thegreenlanternrestaurant.com. 
 Looking for \that\ spot where the moment you walk in you fit in?  Looking for a home cooked meal...without having to lift a finger? Looking for a place to pop a squat and shoot the shit?Look no further than the Greenie!  Breakfast lunch happy hour or dinner....it always fills the bill. Love taking the family there for weekend breakfast.  From the waffle sundae for my youngest to the seafood omelet for me...they have it all.  Huge portions...great prices! Swing in and ask for my favorite bartender Joy to make you her ultimate bloody mary made with Effen Cucumber Vodka.  Yeah...she rocks it.  It's all good... 
 Have eaten here several timesmost recently this morning..Food has always been good but todays breakfast was exceptional..I had eggs and walleye.Large piece of walleyeflakylightly breadedand delicious! Companion had lobster benedict special which was raved about..To top it off the service provided by April was outstanding.... 
 Life is good. In bloody mary heaven. Joy's not bad either :-) 
 Always good food. Menu seems to have been updated recently. Lake perch really nicely done. Upper dining room has been remodeled. Quite nice!  A favorite. 
 Pros:Drinks are okRib eye steak good medium rare with baked potatoService was friendly and food served warmFood affordablerelaxing environment local feelCons:Scallops was to saltyfurniture outdatedwalleye fish was eh not enough flavorsIt's very Divey not impressed even when my meal was free. 
 We accidentally found Green Lantern when another local eatery was closed for Sunday night. We couldn't have been more happy that the other place was closed as Green Lantern had friendly service tasty food and the Packers on tv screens everywhere you looked. It's a restaurant and bar and the building isn't modern so leave any judgmental aesthetic attitudes at home (or in our case the hotel room) and go enjoy something other than another boring chain. 
 This place is like an old up-north supper club. It's dark and cozy with orange light lanterns hanging from the ceiling. The upper seating level has a lovely view of the lake. I got the lobster omelet and it had this wonderful flavorful tarragon sauce over the top. Big chunks of lobster made it a memorable breakfast. My english muffin was perfectly toasted and buttered.My companion recommends trying the walleye breakfast next time.Our server was very very very nice and sweet. Several times she uttered \take your time no hurry.\ I hear that's the Green Lantern's tag line: loitering encouraged. I like to relax so this place is perfect. If I lived in the area I'd go there for drinks. 
 Never had a bad meal here breakfast lunch or dinner.  Prices are very reasonable and the people are very welcoming.  One thing that needs improvement is the coffee.  I think they let the hot water wink at the grounds.  Way to weak. 
 Good food cheap drinks great service. Breakfast is simple but delicious here- get the Wiggies (hashbrowns with cheese onions ham and green pepper inside). Sandwiches are also good and it's a great place for fish fry. 
 FISH FRY was OUT OF THIS WORLD! I read an article in Madison magazine about how this place had one of the best fish fry's in town and decided to try it out! What a gem! First The fish fry comes with salad and a side. Super Nice.  Secondly they must have the world's best tartar sauce! I could literally drink the stuff. Third I took five people here who all had the fish fry and drinks and it only set me back 60 Bucks! WOW! I will be back! 
 The man and I are on this thing now where we are trying to eat at a few places famous for their fish fry's thanks to an article in Madison Magazine.  There are a few places in the mag that I am looking forward to trying but Green Lantern was the first one that we hit up.  Driving up the place looked kind of small and beat up which was not what I was expecting and not looking forward to.  As we got closer however I realized how big this place was on the inside.  It's huge!   At least it felt huge from where we were sitting.  I'm not sure if it was the article in the magazine that attributed to how crazy busy this place was or if there was a concert or what but this place was insane.  I mean we had to wait for an hour for our table.  On the plus side we had to wait an hour for our table which meant an hour of drinking so I can't really complain.Because we had been waiting for so long we also had a chance to look at the menu so when we  finally sat down we knew exactly what we wanted; the waitress loved this.  We started with the calamari which I'm starting to find out is not one of Wisconsin's strong suits.  I don't think I have ever had good calamari here; maybe this will be my next food challenge 'The Great Calamari Showdown'!  Anyway I had a few pieces of that and let the man have the rest'' he actually really liked it.  I ordered the salad which was huge cheesy mashed potato and 3 pieces of the lightly breaded cod.  The man order the same but with cheesy hash browns.  The fish was pretty good.  It was juicy and fresh and not bad.  I thought it was maybe just a little over the top with the seasoning.  I think I would have enjoyed it more if the flavors were a bit more subtle as opposed to all up in my face the way it was.  With that said however I though it was alright.  The man on the other hand was in love.  He likened his enjoyment of this place to the Tornado Room.  Pure blasphemy.  He clearly doesn't know anything about food. All in all I am glad I tried this place but I don't think I will be making it a regular haunt. 
 Stopped in for a dinner after getting a recommendation from a co worker and we were VERY impressed!  It was fairly quiet on a Thursday night - no problem getting a table.  The location is fabulous being right on the lake with views.  The ambiance is very much a north-woods tavern restaurant type establishment - older decor a little kitschy though it suits the place well.Green Lantern has a reputation of being a surf-turf and they do it well!I had the Ahi-tuna - it was an incredibly delicate piece of fish cooked perfectly.  My wife had a steak which was also prepared very well.  We are DEFINITELY coming back!The server while young and a bit 'nervous' did a fine job and she was very pleasant.  She also provided great suggestions for food pairings!  Well done :)Hint:  Ask for a seat by the window to get a view of the lake.hint hint:  The location ambiance and setup is VERY family and kid friendly!  They were hosting a birthday party for a grandmother while we were there and the staff bent-over backwards for the family and party - including setting up a powerpoint projector for family slide show and music!  Very sweet.... 
 Been here a few times. Once for breakfast and few times for drinks/apps. Food has been very good and the service is decent. They don't have the best view of the lake but we'll still be back. 
 Any place that's located on a lake for a fish fry is alright with me.. It's packed on Friday which means you get to have a few cocktails while waiting for a table the wait is worth it... Don't hesitate to try this place out you won't be disappointed.. 
 are favorite fish fry in madison area get there before 530 if you dont want to awhile friendly staff both the bar and the waitstaff good burgers and steaks recomend the sea fod platter nice view of the lake good stop for lunch when out boating easy access pier go most for fish fry good hashbrown solid kids menu very reasonable prices can feed family of 5 for around 40 to 50 dollars with cocktails 
 The Lantern doesn't profess to be anything more than it is. Good American wisco supper club fare. Prices are very good and they know how to cook a steak to temperature. Bloody Mary's are great as they allow you to add your own seasonings to taste.  Decent wine selection by the glass.  They even have sambuca. Try the surf n turf. Very good at a great price. Also fried chicken. Solid choice and nicest place on lake waubesa. 
 We went to the Green Lantern last Friday and it was our first visit there.Several of our friends had always spoken highly of it so we thought we would give their Friday Fish fry a try. I had made reservations for us and when we got to the restaurant they informed us it would just be a few more minutes and that we could take a seat at the bar.The bartender was very nice and intuitive he noticed I was eying up the pickled mushrooms and gave me some for my cocktail.A few minutes later we were promptly seated so the wait was not long at all.We were seated at a nice table by the window with a view of the lake.So far so good.We ordered a kalamari appetizer to share three beer battered cod fish fry dinners and one breaded shrimp dinner.The kalamari came first and it was ok. Our drinks were finished so we ordered more.Finally she came with our entrees but still no beer we had ordered to go with our meals.So we reminded her again.My fish fry was warm and the fish was flaky.My moms fish fryhowever was cold and soggy and we had ordered the same thing.The cole slaw was good and tasted fresh and the hash browns I had ordered were good as well.My partners shrimp though was awful.It was greasy and mushy and tasted awful.The French fries accompanying it were undercooked and looked anemic some of them had black coloring on them like the bad part of a potato that has rotted.Our server was still no where to be seen in order to ask about our drinks or inform her about the cold fishsoggy shrimp and undercooked fries.Finally we asked another waitress if she could find her.When we told her we were disappointed in the foodparticularily the shrimp and undercooked potatoes she asked why we hadn't told her sooner to which I really wanted to respond that not once did she check in with us to see how our meal was.She did handle it all professionally in the end and apologized even took half off of our bill so that was nice.However between one of us having basically no good entree at all and this being our first time there it really was a disappointment.Like I said the hashbrowns and coleslaw were good the bartender and hostess service was good but we came there for a good fish fry and dinner service.Next time we are going to Tobys nearby instead.They consistently serve quality food along with good service. 
 I've been taking my adorable old english sheepdog here since I got him as a puppy over 6 yrs ago. The staff has always been great about getting me in for appointments even with short notice. The new clinic is very nice always clean and set up well. They willingly give you all the treatment options available and corresponding pricings which always seem reasonable. My guy has had some issues over the years (hematoma on his ear that needed to be surgically drained) and the staff treated him super well and helped him recover quickly. I no longer live in McFarland but I still drive out there to keep going to this clinic. 
 Spartan Animal Hospital is a fantastic place. I am a seriously poor college grad and I took my new cat (from the shelter) to Spartan for her rabies and FVRCP booster shots today. I was really impressed with the staff and the facility. The people were extremely friendly and were patient and willing to answer all of my questions. They gave me a folder full of good information and the home phone number of Dr. C the owner in case of non-office hour emergencies. That's dedication.The best part about Spartan is that they don't charge the regular office fee if you're just coming in for vaccinations! It's a rare thing to be pleasantly surprised at a cash register isn't it?I highly recommend Spartan to you! 
 What could I possibly say about the Beach House Restaurant and Lounge?  I guess I could think of a few things.I went there today for the first time and was dazzled by the charm it flaunted while still maintaining the gritty edge of a backwoods Wisconsin eatery.  Let's not get it twisted folks we're not breaking gastronomic ground here.  What we are breaking are your misconceptions of what a restaurant can be whose parking lot is largely composed of Chevy and Dodge trucks and whose front snow-covered lawn is full of snowmobiles.  Deal with it kids this is that slice of Midwest Americana you've been looking for in any number of wayside eateries in rural America.  Fish fry anyone?To begin let me explain that one of the many draws for the Beach House's patrons is the fact that it is still legal to smoke indoors in McFarland.  I stepped inside and was immediately made aware of this fact as plumes of smoke took up residence in my clothes and nose.  Do not fear however there is a separate dining room that is nonsmoking.  And man was this separate dining room packed (Superbowl Sunday).  Packed with large women squeezing into convention center chairs.  Packed with waitresses who wore skin tight white Jordache jeans giving you a fleeting sense of their giving nature.  Packed with the eager anticipation of an entire day spent watching football and football-related activities: drooling eating drinking and smoking.  God bless America.The AM dish to get here is the Walleye and eggs breakfast.  I would tend to agree although their limited selection of omelets is made marginally more tasty by the addition of broccoli (you heard me punk).  As breakfast wore on the dining room filled emptied and filled again; the waitstaff eagerly setting new places removing paper place settings calling people darlin' and hon'(always appreciated).So give it to me hard backwoods Wisconsin.  Give me every sinew of your being: your ice fishing snowmobiling smoking bloody Mary drinking being.  Just be.  And give me a friggin' huge piece of deep fried walleye to help me digest the spectacle with scrambled eggs on the side.  And don't you dare forget the tartar sauce. 
 Service was terrible! I will never return!!! We waited in the bar and were never greeted or spoken too. People walked in after us and were seated. Not sure what their structure is for seating but they suck at it. I will not be back. 
 This place is pretty dumpy - \Corinthian leather\ chairs crappy tables...What is worth going for is the walleye and eggs served on weekends.  It is a HUGE portion of walleye lighty fried served with eggs cooked to order potatoes and toast.  All this for something like $10.  Totally worth a side trip if you are in Madison. 
 Amazing Friday night FISH FRY! I got out a lot for fish fry's in Madison and the surrounding area and this still remains my favorite. I usually get the Cod dinner which is always cooked perfect not too soggy or too crispy which comes with a side AND a soup or salad for only $9.95. I always recommend the Beach House when someone is looking for a GREAT fish fry! :) 
 For being surrounded by two lakes Madison doesn't do a great job of having places to drink on the water. Head down to McFarland and check out the beach house. It's like a dive bar slash restaurant right on the lake. Tons of windows. Not a bad place.Can't comment on the food. Drink specials were solid. 
 I have not Yelped in quite a while and to all my fans (all none of you)...sorry.  So I will start on a positive note...So I have been to the Beach House so many times I feel dumb reviewing it but I am so deal with it and go there.If you are going for drinks...do it.  The clientele is awesome and you will always hear some great stories.  But this review is for the food.  ALWAYS AMAZING!  We went for breakfast the other day for the first time in a long time and it was as good as I remember.  The Eggs Benedict are just delicious and something I could eat every day and they make one hell of a Bloody Mary (so I am told by my wife since I do not like them) if your interest in that.So if you want some good breakfast on the weekend and in the McFarland area...Breach House it is! 
 Nasty & Dirty.  Food is okay.  They do a great steak.  The place is full of regulars drinking cheap beer. 
 We had dinner at the Beach House on Friday on our way up to northern Wisconsin based on reviews on Yelp.  If you are looking for good fish fry the Beach House has it.  I had the perch which was great my bf had the walleye which i think had an even better flavor.  The fish deserves 5 stars.  Everything else a 3 star.  I would give 3 1/2 stars if that were an option.  Would definitely go back. 
 I really wanted to like this place but it wasn't what we were looking for.They have a great spot on the lake but it is a pretty dumpy little fish shanty.   If that is what you are looking for you will love it.  There were a bunch of locals there having a good time and if we were there with a group of our friends it might be ok for a few beers.  But still way way too crowded.  Like sardines in a can.There was no one to greet us so we just took a table by the window.   Then we waited and waited.  Then someone came over and said hi.  Then we waited and waited.  I was about to get up and leave when someone came over and said \oh you haven't been waited on yet?\  So she then tried to help things along.   The menu was average for sandwiches but overpriced we felt for entrees as we ordered the Ahi Tuna and the Bluegill.   The Tuna was very good and perhaps appropriately priced but the Bluegill was not proportionately enough.  It was made well enough and had ok flavor but should have been a few dollars less.Salad was ok.  At least had a variety of greens but still needed a little more.If I ever went back it would be for a few beers and the view that's it.It's too bad because we really need some nice places on the lake and with all the lakes around here there aren't as many lakeside restaurants as you would expect. 
 This is the quintessential mom and pop bar / restaurant on a lake. They specialize in cheap beer and great food. Staff is friendly and down home but you'd better leave your big-city attitude at home.We went for a Friday night fish fry. I live in Seattle these days and was not about to miss the opportunity while in town.Started with a couple of Spotted Cows (on tap!) while the rest drank Miller Lite. (Told ya...) There were five adults plus a 12-year old.Walleye was excellent the waitress was too. We made reservations and the table was ready well ahead of time. Our one tactical error was sitting in the bar for the view. It was LOUD! Think that the dining room is much quieter.Notice that I am not saying much about the food? Here's the deal:- It was Friday- It was Hot- The beer was Cold- The fish fry was exactly what you would expect in a place like this: great walleye!'Nough said... 
 We live just down from the Beach House.  We love going there. They are super friendly. We usually do not have to wait to be seated. The weekend breakfasts are the best. Bloody Marys are outstanding. Love the crab cakes eggs Benedict. Yum! Huge portion of walleye with your eggs which is one of my friends favs when they come visit. It is a great local hangout too beautiful view easy parking for your boat from lake waubesa. We recommend it always! 
 Now I must state one little thing about the way I rate restaurants. My ratings are relative to my expectations of the experience and in no way relative to other restaurants (it just isn't fair to use the same scale for a place like the Beach House as you would for The French Laundry so again it's all relative) I've only been here for breakfast but the second time I drove a long damn way to have breakfast again so that in and of it self should say something. (another caveat: there are maybe six restaurants in McFarland that don't have drive-thrus)  I ordered the Walleye and eggs both times along with a bloody mary (gotta love a beer back yay for Wisconsin). Now I am well aware of the number of bones that a whole Walleye contains and cannot in any way hold the Beach House responsible for that. I can say that the breading was perfectly crispy and well seasoned and that the fish was not at all over cooked nice and moist. plus I think it cost $10 which was awesome (you can't get fish for breakfast at these prices in Chicago) For me the biggest highlight of breakfast here is what they do to the potatoes (their name for them is eluding me at the moment) by request they will top your breakfast potatoes with a heap of meat veggies and cheese enough to make it a hangover-soaking-up meal unto itself.To sum it all up: if you find yourself looking for breakfast and a little \hair o' the dog\ in McFarland Wisconsin because \What happens at the Beach House stays at the Beach House\ and we all love that about any restaurant. 
 I use to boat in this area alot.  I always made this place to stop for  breakfast. very good.   They are know for there Walleys and eggs  Some people even like a bloody mary or vodka and orange served with them.  Anything on the menu is good.  Nice place on the water.  You can come by boat or car.  If you come by boat a nice little ride over to Madison area makes it a fun day. 
 We love the Beach House.  We come here often.  Food is always good.  Drinks are made by some really awesome people!  Specials are always worth a look. Weekend breakfasts are very popular so come early.  Try the walleye/eggs.  Or the crab/eggs benedict.  Very very good!! 
 Food was very good and the atmosphere is the classic divey Wisconsin bar. The only way it could be better was if they added outdoor service/outdoor bar. We will be back! 
 I've been to this place a couple of times and we've always had good food. Service was a bit slow but will definitely keep going back. Love being so close to Lake Waubesa and watching the sunsets too. 
 Food and service have always been good.  The seafood dinner was done perfectly. 
 The Beach house is probably one of our favorite breakfast places. The walleye and eggs are truly a specialty. Their fish fry is also very good and they have a nice view of lake Wabesa. If they expanded food and drinks outside they'd have a 5 star. 
 I got a Groupon for here for my fiancee and mine's anniversary and we finally were able to get there a month later.  The restaurant was super easy to find and I loved how it was right on the lake.  I spent a lot of time the last few summers in northern WI on a lake so it was nice to be back on a lake again- brought back good memories!  We did not make a reservation so it was an hour wait for a table when we arrived.  We hung out in the slightly crowded bar and had a few drinks while we were waiting.  The drinks were good and the bartenders were attentive so no complaints there!  We were seated at a table that had a great view of the lake.  They had lots of specials going on that night (Friday night fish!) and we started with pepperjack cheese curds.  Delish!  They had a really nice bite at the end of them from the peppers.  I got the blue gill/lake perch combo and my fiancee got the Caribbean salmon.  I know blue gill is a thinner fish and while my dish was good there was not a lot of actual fish under the batter.  I got a salad with my fish with a tomato basil vinaigrette which was surprisingly good and coleslaw which was pretty standard.  The salmon with the Caribbean dipping sauce was fantastic but the veggies he got as a side was just some steamed broccoli and carrots- not very creative!  Our server was attentive all night even though the restaurant was super busy all night.  By the time we left I was very full and satisfied. 
 Went here for fish fry with one of my friends and we ended up sitting outside and watching the sunset. Our server was very nice and the food was SOOOO good! I had the fried cod and she had the walleye. We were both impressed and full after the meal. My favorite part - the price - very affordable and you get to pick your sides which were also really good american fries and asparagus. I'd highly recommend and I'm going back! 
 Stopped here while on a Sunday drive.  Tried sitting outside and the waitress did not make us feel welcomed.  She was rude and careless.  We walked inside to the bar where the bartenders were a lot better.  Unfortunately the same lady came in and started venting about her customers.  Seems like they have enough customers and do not need to be nice anymore.  Too bad because the beer was nice and cold.  Great views too. 
 It was ok - waitress was very good - even with 7:45 Friday night reservations no tables were available and had a very long wait - drunk patron at the bar swearing very loud with the F-bomb and other words and slamming items on the bar - first ordered the salmon special and of course it was already sold out - two of us then ordered the fish fry mine was lukewarm and the other one was cold. Don't plan on going back. 
 I took my mom and grandma to the Beach House last night for dinner thinking it would be better than getting a Papa Murphy's pizza. There weren't many patrons in the dining room. Our waitress was very short with us demanding our drink orders before taking any questions or orders for our food. I ordered scallops and when they came to the table they were overcooked but also cold. It took me at least 15 minutes to find the waitress to ask if I could get warmer food. She said that she would have the kitchen make up a new meal and about 15 minutes later she returned with my same plate with my original fork and original food. They scallops were now warm but lacked flavor and were even tougher than before. The waitress didn't seem to care about the quality of the food and seemed to be either having a terrible night or was on the influence of something. Needless to say I will not be returning. On a positive note the sunset on the lake is pretty. 
 we found this place on a groupon deal and were excited to try a new place. It was a train wreck! The dining area was not very busy even tho it was a Friday night fish fry. That should have been our first clue. We ordered the steak and lobster The steak was very good but the lobster was still raw. We sent it back to be re warmed and still returned undercooked. we decided to take it \to go\ and finish cooking it at home.My husband and I love our bloody marys & this is NOT the place to order one. blah. Needless to say we will not be back nor recommend this place to anyone else. 
 I would not have known about this place had it not been for the Holiday Groupon. I redeemed mine with my bf over the weekend and the food was delicious and cooked well (see Holiday Groupon pic).The restaurant was packed on Saturday night; I'm glad I called in a reservation. Local town folk. Not a huge place but still cozy. The servers were running around and busy but made sure that our table was attended well. Ask for Dee Dee; she's a trip! I'll be back again for more food once the snow has melted to try the other items on the menu. 
 Ate there last night with a group of friends.  The waitstaff was friendly but that was pretty much the only good thing of the night.  I hate french onion soup that was so salty it tasted like a salt lick.  Plus they put so many croutons in the soup I was only actually afforded about two small spoonfuls of soup before the liquid was soaked up.  I ordered the bluegill for my main dish.  Being an avid fisherman I can appreciate some good Wisconsin bluegill.  This bluegill however was not good.  It was cold and tasted very old.  The fries that went along with it were also extremely salty.  A couple people in the group said their food was okay but definitely not worth a trip back.  I was quite bummed about this. 
 It you're basic bar food.  Nothing more. 
 Great place on the water. Beautiful views. Good fish fry. Very reasonable prices with nice selection of fish and sides. The staff are great! 
 I have no idea why no one has reviewed this awesome B&B but i'm excited to be the first...perhaps no one wants to let anyone in on the secret...and i thought about not writing the review for that same reason but i have to share this one with my fellow yelpsters. I wanted to celebrate the wife's bday with a quick getaway but didn't want to stay in the usual hotel. so i popped \lgbt friendly B&Bs\ into google and this place came up. they had a few rooms to choose from but of course the one with the hot tub in the room caught my eye first. i emailed them through the website and the owner Craig got back to me quickly. I reserved the room and then just had to wait until the day arrived. Even though we were arriving earlier than the 3PM check in Craig was awesome and left a personalized letter and the keys to the house in the mailbox for us to let ourselves in. we put our stuff in the room and when we came downstairs the owners Craig and Cathy were there and welcomed us to the house even remembering that we were there for a surprise birthday trip. the house was clean and the room was nicely done. it was definitely more cozy than any hotel room could have ever been the bed was so comfortable we almost napped thru our dinner reservation! the hot tub was definitely the highlight of the Mentor room the massage jets were awesome and were so relaxing! in the AM Craig made an awesome breakfast complete with bacon an egg souffle and a homemade Kringle that was absolutely delish! i couldn't have picked a better place to celebrate my gf's birthday! from the second i made the reservation until the moment we checked out Craig and Cathy made us feel at home and provided top knotch service to us. If I'm ever in need of a quick getaway to Madison I know exactly where I will stay!! 
 Nice Bed and Breakfast just outside of Madison. My hub and I went there for a quick getaway after a long two months of working on projects. Craig is an incredible host and if you are vegan (which we are not but love the cuisine) he can totally accommodate you.  Funky eclectic a nice retreat with caring owners. Not uptight and very kid friendly. Good for a family gathering. The only reason I don't give it 5 stars is if you are completely uptight about absolute decorating perfection then this isn't the place for  you. The hosts make up for this in humor kindness and providing a peaceful setting. Good stuff worth a stay. Mid-week deals are worth looking into. 
 I am a huge believer in bed & breakfasts especially in the winter when you are bound to spend more time indoors.  This is a very cute one; bf and I stayed here on our visit to Madison.  Hosts were VERY friendly so we started our (very big) breakfasts around 9 and usually ended around 10.  They were very accommodating and solicitous of our feedback.  We stayed in the Mentor room which was spacious and had a hot tub but no shower so I used the shared shower across the hall since there weren't many guests during that weekend.  It really felt like we were staying at a friend's house except I didn't need to help with the dishes.Some things that didn't bother me but might other people:1)  Note that they have two large dogs2)  If you're averse to flowered wallpaper this is not the place for you. 
 Goodbye Hotels!  After this cozy little place I'm a bed and breakfast faithful.  Our host Craig was wonderful.  It was super easy to make the arrangements and the website was helpful.  The place itself gave me the same joy I remember having when I would go see grandparents as a child.  That feeling of a warm house.  Oh did I mention that when we first entered the whole house smelled of breakfast from that morning.  The bed half of the name was extra comfortable and the room was very relaxing.  We stayed in the Sorenson room which was a little larger and had a couch.  They offered a small bookshelf of books and Madison magazine (which helped us to find our restaurant the next day).  The Sorenson room also offers a private bathroom with a claw-foot tub that is over 110 years old (but has excellent water pressure).  Shampoo soap body gel bath salts (I think that's what they were) and even a hairdryer are all provided.  This was nice since we forgot a couple of those things.  For the breakfast portion we had a spinach and cheddar quiche that was the fluffiest damn quiche I've ever had.  Pardon my French! My fiance is a Vegetarian and it was extremely easy to make.  He also had a myriad of drink options.  Some ready to be poured some in waiting.  Also for me (the non-vegetarian) he made an incredible side of bacon.  It was sprinkled with brown sugar and then generously peppered.  Then it was baked.  Then it was devoured with great speed.  Seriously this was heavenly.  Also there was a delicious pear and cranberry compote for each of us. Craig and his beautiful (and friendly) dog joined us for breakfast and some wonderful conversation.  He is a true gentleman and an excellent host.  My fiance and I are planning another trip in the spring and we'll be sure to stay with them again.  I could't recommend this place enough. 
 My 8 year old daughter and I stayed at the B&B this past weekend.  We stayed in the Sorenson room which was the right size for us.  It had an attached good sized bathroom which was great and my daughter loved that she got to take a bath in a tub that was over 100 years old.  (The water pressure is great by the way).  There was an assortment of soaps shampoos bubble baths etc in the bathroom too.  The room and bathroom were clean and spotless.  Craig was extremely nice helpful and whipped up a killer breakfast.... a brown sugary apple cranberry upside down baked french toast kind of concoction homemade pumpkin bread fresh watermelon and sausage links.  He was very accomodating and asked us the night before if there were any allergies or food issues that he needed to know about.  The price was very affordable and the next time I'm in the area I'll be staying there instead of a hotel.  : ) 
 Loved staying here.  We were going up to Madison for the day and found this place through a quick Google search of Madison-area B&B's.  Craig (the owner) was so helpful and friendly when I called to inquire about prices and availability.  He was also awesome and asked about our dietary preferences (I'm a vegetarian who's also temporarily gluten-free whereas my boyfriend will eat anything) and promised to have a yummy breakfast we would both love.  When we got to The Parsonage I was so happy we decided to stay there instead of in Madison proper.  It was quiet and cozy.  We picked the Mentor room which had a big awesome jacuzzi tub in there and also a really nice outdoor patio (which was covered in snow but i bet will be awesome when spring comes!).   Our bed was SO COMFORTABLE i think i actually miss it.  Since our room didn't have a shower (which we knew when we booked - well worth it to have that awesome bathtub!) I used the shared bathroom on the second floor which was also very nice and cozy.  Breakfast the next day was so nice.  Craig made homemade cranberry orange muffins with a cheesy kale egg dish - so yummy!  Everyone else got delicious smelling bacon and Craig very awesomely made me veggie breakfast sausage.  There was also pineapple juice and a really great tea selection.  The conversation was also really nice - I like that we all ate together (me my boyfriend Craig and the 5 other guests who were staying there.  Great people and great company.  Next time we are in the Madison area we will definitely stay here.  Craig thanks for all the hospitality!  From Denise and Justin 
 Parsonage was a perfect fit for my recent trip. What it is: warm quaint charmingly old affordable homey accommodating of diet. What it is not: posh uber-modern sleek extravagant.Has wifi. Has a (very well-mannered & clean) dog. Street parking. Does not have private bathrooms for each room so be sure to check on that when booking if it's important to you.Craig the owner and Coriander the springer spaniel were a warm greeting party. Craig went out of his way to make me feel comfortable with the house the amenities where to find him if I needed something etc. I called him later that night after I realized I had accidentally left without a key and he told me exactly where he would hide one outside for my return. It felt less like paid lodging and more like staying with distant relatives. Our group had some gluten-sensitive members and some lactose-sensitive members so Craig made sure that each breakfast had options for everyone. One morning the power went out around 5am before he could cook the breakfast casserole so he ran down to a bakery and brought back an improvised meal of fruits and a kringle (?) a local specialty. The weather was nice so we spent plenty of time on his newly renovated screened-in porch listening to music while we sipped coffee and rubbed Coriander's belly. 
 Smoke-filled bathrooms gross food even if the burgers are a buck.  Expensive bowling but on the upside only one of the bartenders is a tool. 
 Its a hick bowling alley.  Cheap bar food. 
 I was there on Monday December 30 2013.  And I will NEVER be back again.  I waited nearly ten minutes for a person to show up at the counter.  I just wanted a lane and some shoes.  We were told to go to number 8.  When it was not on we went back to the counter.  No one was there.  I waited another 5 minutes.  I then went into the bar where I found our person too busy to do his job because he was drinking.  From his vantage point he could not see if people were coming in.In addition to that he kept pointing and telling me number 8 was on.  He could not see number 8 and was just aimlessly pointing.  Most likely he was drunk.  Spartan Bowl get some better staff.  Perhaps ensure that your staff can stay sober. 
 Do you like it when your bowels want to explode?  Then this is the place for you.  The sad thing is the aroma coming from the restaurant is hypnotizing as it drifts through the neighborhood and the staff is really nice but holy jeebus does the pizza suck.  Every time we went there we spent the rest of the night in the bathroom.  Awful. 
 Great little bar friendly bartenders (unlike the *other* Spartan- ahem!) and super pizza.  A little on the smoky side except for a one-day-per week smoke free Saturday so time your visits accordingly.  Decor in the restaurant could use some updating but it's a small-town family owned joint that is what it is.... 
 Spartan Pizza is going smoke-free on March 1 2010 well ahead of the ban.  Way to go Spartan!!! 
 Good pizza (not like Pizza Hut more like home-made) with a great bar with nice friendly service. 
 Good enough for carry-out in McFarland on a cold winter's evening.  Ready on time never had a wrong order and they're at least reasonably friendly.  Would be better if they delivered but not sure there's a huge demand for it in our tiny burg.  They also have a lunch buffet on weekdays for around $6. 
 Best Chinese food madison! I've tried them all and make the 15 minute drive every week :-) 
 Awful awful awful...  The worst of the worst of the cookie-cutter Chinese restaurants.  Food without flavor a menu without imagination and a staff of such profound indifference it's hard to tell they're even there. 
 Tried this because it's local.  Terrible bland Chinese food.  Not much else to say.  Will never return.  My wife wanted me to mention her sweet and sour chicken which was battered fried chicken pieces with a side of sauce in a bowl.  When she asked where the vegetables were (like the picture) she was told there is a piece of pineapple in the sauce and that is what comes with it.  As promised we looked hard into the sauce and found one very small piece of pineapple.  Bon Appetite. 
 Main Moon is hand's down my favorite place to grab Chinese in McFarland but really anywhere. No matter what time of day day of the week or week of the year - it only takes 15 minutes to get your food. Freshly made each time too. Don't order from the pictures order from you heart. The staff is so friendly I'm thinking about proposing in the near future as I hope to be a part of their family like they've been a part of mine. I just can't even talk about the lunch buffet I'll start tearing up with how amazing the deal is. Andddd I just shed a tear. Yum yum yum in my tum tum tum. Miss you Main Moon xoxox 
 Main Moon has the best lunch in McFarland buffet style. Friendly service gloriously large takeout menus and sauces like no one else. Try their fried pork dumplings crab Rangoon or General Tso's. Their fried rice is legit. All portions are generous. Until secondary Moons are established make your lunar landing as soon as you can. Delicious. 
 Leaps and bounds better than other chinese food in the Madison area. Their lunch buffet is a great value. The general tsao's is to die for.Don't miss out on this fantastic food. 
 At this point Crandall's is only a bookmark for me.  However I did stop by only to discover yet another Middleton restaurant closed on Sunday.  Middleton I love your town but you're killing me with all the restaurants closed on Sundays and Mondays.  In addition the first two restaurants I drove to were recently CLOSED for good.  I'm hoping to try Crandall's out sometime but it will be a challenge since I'm usually in town on Sunday.  Eitherway I understand the quality of your food is great and your fish fry is the best in the Madison area. The drive thru and patio are also nice features.  We'll have to rely on other Yelpers to offer a more accurate rating.  I gave the A-OK 3 star rating since a rating is required.  Check out my pics.  You can also find a PDF menu on their website. 
 Wendy C. how can you review a place that you've never been to? I'm sure the Great Barrier Reef is worth a 5 star review but I can't give it only 3 stars because its inconvenient (or any review for that matter). Anyway...saw Crandalls in Madison Magazine and the photos stood out to me. I didn't want to drive to the East Side for the Esquire Club. I was reluctant to try take out fish fry because I was worried about fried food getting soggy. I gave it a shot and I was impressed! First the fish to beading ratio was really good. Big thick pieces of flaky fish with a dense probably corn meal based and crumb-style breaking (as opposed to the extra greasy tempura- style batter). It was nice and crunchy and the breading stayed that way on my 5-10 minute drive home. Tip: crack the styrofoam container to let the steam out for extra insurance against soggy fish. Served with a lemon. The fries were coated in something that made them extra crispy and they had a good seasoning. The slaw had good flavor but lots of dressing. Purists might say it was over dressed; others might say its just right. Tarter sauce was a little sweet and tangy which was good contrast with the fish. The server gladly gave me extra. The bun was just as you would expect from a supper club cheap white and doughy. Served with a butter chip. Everything was served together in a box; everything you need except several icy cold beers.The service was fine. The take out window was nice. It takes a few minutes for the order but I think they fry-to-order which is well worth it to me and a big plus. Any you cut it it takes less time than waiting in line for dine in Friday Fish Fry.A little spendy for take out fish fry ringing up at over $25 for two dinners. That would be more than fair if I could park my fat ass there all night and eat all-you-can-eat. It's worth it though and I'll be back. 
 The fish fry is awesome.  Loved it long time.  The red potatoes with cheese are delish.It's carry out but that is fine.Take it out pop in a movie and have a brandy old fashion.The latinos working their are hot too. 
 Crandalls has moved to state street and is now serving authentic Peruvian food! We went there for dinner tonight and it was fabulous. I highly recommend the cheese empanadas solterito (fava bean and corn salad) and the chaufa de quinoa (like fried rice but with quinoa)! They make chicha morada which is a drink made from purple corn and is super refreshing.Crandalls is owned by a very sweet family from Peru and I'm so happy to see that they are now showcasing their roots with their new restaurant!!They do still have their famous fish fry and it looked like the lunch menu has cheese curds and sandwiches as well as ceviche. 
 Just fair but you learn to appreciate decent chinese food for its rarity (I know a strange concept for those of us living in the Bay Area). 
 Authentic good quality food in an old style Chinese restaurant setting.  Very satisfied overall with my first visit.  Second visit included my six year old which was not so good they don't even have crayons for a child. 
 This is a good Chinese place. Will it take you to a place you've never been? No. But you will leave satisfied. 
 Food: It's overall pretty good and probably one of the more reliable options for semi-authentic Chinese food in the Madison area.  To this Asian there is definitely some catering to Western palates.  Definitely a step down if you're used to eating at say Chicago's Chinatown (both old and new sections) and there's no extra menu in Chinese with the more eclectic stuff.  Fresh seafood options very limited.Service: Average.  Food comes in a reasonable time though refiling the water sometimes is spotty.Value: Reasonable overall.  Prices fit the portions. Most entrees $9-15 range.Overall: Good for when you crave Chinese but I'd still head to Chicago for the more authentic stuff. 
 Three stars = A-OK.  It was fine.  It wasn't great.  This place has been here for about 30 years.  Before that it was a car wash.  I always think of it as the place that used to be a carwash.Anyway.  Went with a group of 15.  Mom was buying and we got the \Classic\ banquet (the cheapest one).  It was more food than we could eat.  The food was fine.  Not awesome.  The best flavor was hoisin sauce and well that comes out of a jar.We got a sesame chicken that had nicely deepfried chicken chunks in a citrus-y sweet sauce.  Some trout that my sister insisted on and really enjoys (not my thing but everyone else liked it).  Mu-shu pork - it was good.  Delightful (?) beef kinda bland but nothing yucky in it.  Aaaannd oh yeah crispy duck.  Very crispy as in dry.  Not so great.The kids got those finger trap toys with their fortune cookies.  The waitress was cheerful accomodating and informative.  Extra help came out when needed. 
 I think some of the best Chinese food in Madison.  A little pricey but a few dishes always feeds me for at least two additional meals. 
 It's perhaps the closest you can get to authetic Chinese food in a place like Madison particularly after China Palace closed. The food is alright it's been embellished in a way to appeal to an American audience but at least the some of the menu choices are pretty real. My real problem with this place is the service: The menu was misinforming and didn't specify that some steamed fish dish was a filet as opposed to a whole fish. I politely complained to the waitress about my order not being accurate and she informed her manager. The manager only ended up refunding me 50% off the item ordered and began telling me how you wouldn't refund someone a fancy steak in an expensive restaurant!In the end I paid for my meal and tipped the poor waitress but I will never visit this place again. I'm not sure if that manager woman was giving me a hard time because I was a young college student or what but her management skills leave much to be desired. 
 This was quite possibly the WORST Chinese food (if you can call it that) that I've ever eaten in my life.We started with the appetizer platter for two.  The calamari was so stringy that I had to swallow it in one bite because I couldn't separate it with my teeth.  The egg rolls were at least crispy and well-rolled but they had absolutely no seasoning other than a tad too much salt.  The shrimp were overcooked the barbecue pork was dry and the hot dumplings were cold and under seasoned.Then came the entrees.  I ordered Imperial Chicken thinking that being the restaurant's namesake it had to be good.  I was wrong.  The breading was mushy the chicken was dry and the sauce was basically  sweet and sour sauce with added hoisan and several dried peppers that were burnt so badly they added an unintentional overdone smoky flavor.My boyfriend ordered the Ma-po Tofu.  He loves spicy food and this was just a little spicy but the spice overpowered all the other flavors in the dish (besides the scallions).  The tofu was a good texture but the unbalanced sauce flavors basically rendered it inedible.Apart from the horrendous food was the tepid service.  I had to ask several times for a glass of water.  The waitress came by with the water pitcher and had just enough to fill my glass up halfway so she returned to the kitchen for a refill and stopped by to fill my boyfriend's glass.  By this time I drank my half glass of water - and she didn't even bother to top mine off.  I tried to ask for some but she walked away.  Plus I thought it was supposed to be an authentic Chinese food restaurant - what's with the Vivaldi and Mozart soundtrack?Skip this place all together and hit up the Asian grocery and gas station next door.  On Fridays they receive shipments of Pork Bao in from a bakery in Chicago that are to die for! 
 Probably the best Chinese in Madison these days.  Unfortunately that is not saying much. 
 Took four kids tonight and we were all underwhelmed. The chicken egg drop soup was oddly sweet. We got a barbecue pork dish and some beef dish that both had a bland gravy. A huge platter of pot stickers that got everyone excited but ended up being ... bland. Even the dipping sauce just tasted like soy sauce. The calamari was not tough. I'll give them that. If this is the best Chinese food around... I'm sorry. 
 Best chinese is Madison by far but very expensive! You do always get great service though. Yum! 
 We visit family in Madison at least twice a year and always make sure to have dinner here.  The shrimp sizzling rice soup is absolutely to die for and every entree I've had has been fabulous.  Hands down the best Chinese food I have ever had. 
 This place is wonderful.  One Almost anything on the menu can be made gluten free.  Two They have about 7 different types of loose teas to choose from.  Three The food is GREAT!My favorite dishes are the Three Delicacies Sizzling Rice Soup and  the Tofu Lettuce Wraps.  I am not lying when I say that I have NEVER had a dish I didn't like here.  The food is never greasy never oversauced and never overcooked.  The seafood and veggies always have a really fresh taste... I seriously have no complaints at all.I miss you. 
 Just an update to say they don't even have the #1 spot anymore as that goes pretty easily to Ichiban on park.  Still better than most in town. 
 We only ever go for their lunch special - so that's what this review is I haven't yet gone here for dinner.The dishes are a little hit/miss for authenticity. The Imperial Chicken is really good (not breaded like someone else said but it's great) the sweet and sour chicken is definitely a \miss\ the mu shoo pork is great although a tad greasy the fried spring rolls are fantastic the egg rolls are okay. The service is FANTASTIC and the price is unbeatable for what you get. We never walk  away from lunch hungry. I suggest getting there a little early for lunch (they open at 11am) because it can get a little crowded.Also I love their spicy mustard - you have to try it!!! 
 It is not delicious but the service is good. 
 Often rumored to have the best Chinese food in the Madison area this restaurant is a major disappointment. My spicy tofu and vegetables dish was not in the least spicy and the tofu was only fried and would have been better marinated. The entree my dining companion ordered was also sub-par. The service was very quick and the food served very quickly maybe too much so. Madison has great Southast Asian restaurants but I definitely won't be eating more Chinese food  anywhere here. 
 Grilled potstickers moo shu pork cashew chicken. Yum!! 
 Yum!  Party of 7 everyone ordered their own dish and then shared with all.  Started with pot stickers and shrimp ragoon.  Grilled pot stickers were really good could have just eaten those and been happy.  Appetizers came with a variety of dipping sauces.  Best dishes sampled were crispy orange beef almond chicken and generals lamb.  Lamb was way tender excellent choice.  Service was prompt and friendly great atmosphere.  Ended meal with delicious mango ice cream.  Left happy and very full! 
 I live on the east side of Madison and I always eat at the Imperial Gardens near E. Washington and this Imperial was a let down. The restaurant itself is beautiful and the decor is lovely but the food and staff wasn't as amazing as I hoped for. For starters the food is so expensive compared to the east side and the plates are larger but the portions are definitely not bigger. Our chicken sizzling rice soup was flavor less and completely watered down. My friend loves oyster beef but what received tasted completely different and it had a weird sort of sour after taste. I had the pepper steak and I did like how the onions and peppers are more thinly sliced but my meat also had a strange after taste.The staff was very kind but a little annoying. It's was great at first to see how attentive they were to our needs but the waitress came to us almost every 10min and made awkward small talk which really bothered us. We could then see her staring at us from across the room waiting to start another unwanted conversation.Imperial Garden Middleton will definitely be memorable but for all the wrong reasons. 
 Decent food slightly more expensive than their competitors and more legit varieties on their menu.I'll give credit to Imperial Garden's decor as it is significantly more eye-pleasing than other Asian restaurants and the fact that they have a full bar. I give kudos to this place because they're the only Chinese restaurant in the area that offers peking duck a true Chinese specialty. Their seafood selection is also pretty upstanding and are cooked well. I'm also a fan of their \banquet\ specials which is for when you go in groups and they offer you a selection of X many dishes to share for a set price per person (this is available for lunch and dinner I believe though I've never been here for lunch). Aside from the aforementioned pros of Imperial Garden the other dishes on their menu (if you order without doing the \banquet\) is average-tasting at best and overpriced. 
 Im rating this more on being American Chinese then true authentic Chinese. That being said it was very nice inside. Not too formal but definitely not a take-out joint.We got a cup of the Hot and Sour soup. Which is always my favorite. To try something different we got the Seafood Hot and Sour soup also. Almost taste just like the regular Hot and Sour put of course more of a seafood flavor then pork. It only comes in a serving that serves 2-3. Which is a great value because the 3 of us easily got 2 cups each out of it.The Fragrant Pork had chestnuts green peppers onions mushrooms and carrots in a garlic tomato sauce Said that it was spicy hot put I only got a tiny bit of kick. Put still good being sweet and garlicky. The Three Delicacies Sizzling Rice dish caught me by surprise in a good way. Expecting it would come with that same bland and over salty white sauce. But I couldn't stop tasting the sauce. It was like no other white sauce I have tasted before. The waitress poured the sauce for the dish right in front of you so it was \sizzling\. The rice was on the bottom of the skillet plate so it ended up getting crunchy. Adding a great texture to the dish. The shrimp scallops and chicken in the dish were tender. Also in it were pea pods water chestnuts carrots and mushrooms.Even the fortune cookie at the end was a better grade cookie then take-out places.Service was helpful attentive and friendly. 
 For Wisconsin this is about the best you are going to get for Chinese Food.Sorry you live in Wisconsin.But the food is very good.  Huge servings enormous shrimps chicken that is tender fresh rice.Don't complain Cheeseheads this is good as it gets for Chinese in Wisconsin. 
 Yum. Check out back of menu soups. Very good! 
 How do you get voted best of for 31 years when what is served is awful? This is the worst Chinese food my entire family has had in years. We all ordered different things and none of us could eat our meals. That was $50 wasted. There was no flavor or the flavor there was did not match the dish. How do you mess up beef fried rice? I can make it with more flavor. The Mongolian beef had a flavor but it was all wrong. If you want to waste money and still be hungry this is the place for you. How do places keep getting good reviews when they are so bad. I use to trust Yelp reviews but lately I've been fooled by the reviews. 
 I had fond memories of dining at the Imperial Garden... back in the 1990s when I didn't really have access to more \exotic\ and interesting foods. I've been to this location twice within the past year or so - once for lunch with a coworker and once for dinner with friends last night.+ Huge establishment - impressively big+ Quick to be seated+ Server was friendly+ Waters were refilled quickly+ Decent selection of bottled beers/drinks- Massive menu but not really... many identical dishes on the menu with different protein options- Food/dishes very salty but otherwise bland in flavor. No spice no interesting flavors/tastes- Sea bass dish tasted extremely fishy; sea bass should be \clean\ and non-fishy- Duck was very fatty - extremely fatty- Red Pepper Chicken (\very spicy\) had zero flavor and was drowned in pasty brown sauce- Service became extremely slow/absent after we received our entrees. Took us 30+ minutes to get checks pay and leave - entrees arrived at 7:15pm we left at 8:15pm.I'm glad the four of us split entrees last night... I would've been really disappointed had I ordered something for myself. It's just... not very good. Guessing this place caters to folks who want to eat adventurously without really doing so. The food is sub-par; this place is resting on some large laurels.I'd much prefer a flavorful Thai or Indian dish. Won't be back. 
 Best Chinese food in the area. Great service and calming atmosphere. 
 What a crushing experience. My son was in town and when he is here we like to visit and spoil ourselves to a splurge of a dinner outing. This particular night was at the end of summer and there was an amazing thunderstorm about to occur. SO on this stormy night we decided on Chinese and I had recommended we drive to Middleton for what I had heard to be the best around.Ok..so after a short 15 min drive we had a great parking spot...  ran inside and were greeted with a warming beautiful atmosphere.. very welcoming large foyer nice bar area which u walk thru to get to your dining area.After the immediate seating WE were greeted  by a pleasant asian woman and ordered drinks. which turned out to be just right.Appetizers were mediocre...nothing to remember...we had the app for two...calamari was HORRIBLE  btw  I could go into so much detail but who is gonna read all that....the following is my reason for writing...My forewarning is NOT TO TRUST in ordering the Lobster dish. I wanted a decadent treat for myself and decided on the (market price) 45$ Lobster dinner entree which came with two choices of preparation. Ginger sauce or garlic butter  i ordered the garlic but the server said no the other was best.More importantly i asked her how large the lobster was and if it was sold by pound cause it was listed as Market Price. She said she would inquire before i ordered and returned to our table and said it was 2.5 pds or larger. So that made me excited and i did not hesitate in my ordering. I thought 45 dollars was a great price for a generous 2.5 pd lobster entree.What arrived on my plate was a cut up overly sauced jigsawed puzzled lobster animation on a platter which was in no way a 2.5 pound creature to begin with. It was dismantled then pieced together to look like a lobster shape. The meat was still in shell. (and I mean IN SHELL).  There was hardly any meat to be had. The tail which should have been the meatiest portion was cut in one inch pieces with shell INTACT and had yielded maybe 2 morsel of meat total.  I was shocked as i struggled to manipulate any source of goodness from the pieces of crustacean.There was literally no lobster and what was there was swimming in overpowering sticky sauce. All in all an EXTREME disappointment. Not what I was expecting in the LEAST!!As the storm gained intensity outdoors my high hopes and any thoughts of returning to this eatery were un-intensified. I will NEVER return. I cannot tolerate being misled by a server We ended up tipping and not making a fuss...just another lesson learned. The storm raged on  I did get to spend time with my son and hopefully educate you.. Not a total loss I guess.Just stay away from places like this that lie for profit and have followings that end up being ill fated. 
 Always consistently delicious! Classic preparations of Americanized Chinese. The cashew chicken is great! 
 I was in town visiting family and someone suggested IG. When I drove up to it it brought back yummy memories. It's been years since I ate there. I am glad we went there for dinner. We ate governors chicken governors beef sweet and sour chicken peppered beef and beef chow fun. Everyone ate their plates! Service was slow that night but the food made up for it! 
 There's a climactic scene in the movie Drive where the hero meets the badguy in a 'Chinese' restaurant. It's a prop for the movie to sell the idea of foreign while these two real bad American dudes hash out their differences. It's rich and exotic and mysterious and... goddamn exciting. IG is a Chinese American restaurant in the burbs of burbs that serves burbanites but man it had that feeling.The Russian friend and I went there on a Sunday night for their Peking Duck special. We got that and some appetizer platter and some wonton soup and some cocktails. None of it was particularly memorable and in fact the Peking Duck skin was *not* crispy but the presentation was spot on. There's been so much streamlining of Asian restaurants that nice chairs and big booths with lots of room is uncommon. And on top of it I am a sucker for ethnic restaurants that have good servers that can connect with customers. Do you know how rare that is? Take advantage and talk it out. Be polite and get good service.I don't think Madison's foodies would give this place four stars. But I saw a bunch of other slant eyes here with me and I imagined they were like me wide eyed and happy to be here eating whatever this was.I'd take my mom here. 
 Hands down the best Chinese food in Madison. The chicken chow mein has been a favorite since I was a child. Try the egg rolls and the jasmine or chrysanthemum tea. You really can never go wrong here! The decor is beautiful and makes you almost feel like you could be in a restaurant in China. 
 Imperial Garden has been getting progressively worse over the last few years. The waitstaff has always been attentive and professional and the wait time for food is reasonably short. The restaurant itself and the bathrooms are clean and spacious. The ambiance is relaxed and pleasant and noise levels are comfortably low.But none of these things can save the mediocre-to-bad food. That is if you get your food at all. On more than one occasion they have forgotten to include entire entrees or side dishes when I've picked up take-out. I now double-check all of my orders before leaving. The egg rolls taste like they came out of a box in the freezer. They are greasy and heavy with very little flavor until you douse them in sweet-and-sour sauce that's so sweet it might as well be syrup. The same problems plague the entirely unremarkable crab rangoon. I've had the hot and sour soup and disliked the taste quite a bit. Not spicy enough and far too sour. I usually order the ginger beef stir-fry. There's hardly any ginger flavor and the sauce is thick and also fairly sweet. If they halved the amount of sugar in everything it would be a good start. I've had more success with the sizzling black pepper beef which has a punch of black pepper and a good balance of meat and vegetables. On a recent trip a friend got the beef lo mein. It had a nice quantity of beef but an anemic quantity of vegetables. It was also very greasy and watery and tasted extremely bland. The only reason I go here as often as I do is that my grandmother (the poster child for stereotypical Wisconsin taste buds bless her heart) loves the three delicacies sizzling rice.I did discover one saving grace: if you dump sriracha on the food it blends very well with the food and elevates all of the flavors. Too bad they don't have any of it at the restaurant it could save many a dish. Bottom line: there's much better more authentic more balanced and less heavy Chinese food available in Madison at comparable prices. If you're looking for good Chinese in town check out Hong Kong Cafe on Regent or Orient House on South Park instead. 
 Absolutely THE worst!  This place won \Best of Madison\ for Chinese food for how many years??? The judge must have been completely stoned out of his mind! Customer service:  Very poor.  The server never checked back until I went looking for her wondering where our order was 50 minutes after ordering. Food finally arrived for our group of four--STONE COLD!  Plates themselves were hot but practically frostbite on the food.  Couldn't eat it. Manager came by apologized and took 50% off the bill (!!!). Should have been 100% comped. I'm one of those folks who normally overlooks a lot and actually hates to complain but this culinary travesty really needed to be reported.  If this place previously had great food and service then as of 2014 they've completely lost their \mojo\. 
 This is our go-to Chinese restaurant in the Madison area.  Hands down it's the best Chinese I've found so far.  I'd give it 5 stars if the prices were more reasonable and the dine-in environment was better.Like I said the food is superb.  My usual dish is Cashew Chicken.  It's hard to deviate from that when it's sooooo good.  Other dishes are excellent as well.  What I like about Imperial is that the meat quality is good.  The beef is tasty and tender - not tough or \questionable\.  The chicken is good as well - not some of the gray chicken-like material found at lesser establishments.  We don't dine in often or at all.  It's a little more formal than I prefer and the experience can take a while.  Just not my preference.  I keep their number in my phone and call ahead for carry-out.  That's the way to go here imho.Their location is very convenient for those of us that work in town and live in the western 'burbs.  The portions they give out are very fair - my cashew chicken typically leaves me with a nice lunch for work the next day. If you're looking for top-quality Chinese food I highly recommend getting take-out here.  If you don't mind a more formal setting and have the time go ahead and dine in. 
 Great Margaritas.But it's hard to review a mexican restaurant that's as good as the next.I still wish there was a TRULY good mexican restaurant in Madison...Still waiting.And don't come tell me ... um... the one on Park.. what's that name???....La Hacienda.I'd rather poke my eye out or eat at La Bambas.... 
 Ok Mexican like everywhere else. I completely agree with the previous reviewer \when is the authentic one coming to this town?\ The menu cover page says it's authentic but the men items themselves looked little more tex-mex ish. I had a fajita plate while my friend had a chicken dish (I forgot what it was called). My fajita arrived on a sizzling hot plate (that's takes care of the \fun part\ regardless of the quality) and it was pretty good. The portion was huge so I had to take ha;f of my plate to go and the take out became the perfect left-over dinner next day. 
 Mi Cocina is my favorite Mexican-style restaurant in the Madison area.  I have never come away unimpressed with either the food or the service.  I can't really speak to authenticity since I wouldn't really know it if I saw it but for what they do Mi Cocina does it well.  All I do know is that I have gotten my favorites here over and over without ever having any problems.  The staff is always friendly and fast which sets the place apart from several other area restaurants of the genre.  If only for consistency I would rate Mi Cocina a three and with never having a bad meal I definitely would go with a high 3.5 - 4 stars.Last time I had the fried tilapia tacos and I especially enjoyed the spicy cream-based sauce that was served on the side.  It was perfectly seasoned for my taste though it was a bit hot for my mother.  The tilapia was lightly fried and was still tender.  The accompanying refried beans were decent and served to allow for the spice from the tacos to dissipate.  I still put the blackened tilapia tacos at Tex Tubbs at the top of my favorites list but these easily jumped to the #2 position.  On previous trips I've gotten flautas which were perfectly fried and not too crispy and the enchiladas sonora which comes with an excellent spinach and a creamy sauce.  I also really enjoy the cheese and mushroom quesidilla and the fajitas.  My sister who is lactose-intolerant had found the menu a bit dairy-laden but she did end up finding a chicken breast entree that is now her favorite.  The prices are quite reasonable and given the amount of food always a good deal.  Mi Cocina probably won't ever be held up as a paragon of the style but it has always been reliable and enjoyable and for that I'll keep coming back. 
 The food is decent the service is better than your average Madison restaurant and the bathrooms were clean.  It is a bit out of our way but it is consistent enough to warrant more visits. 
 Good food - especially if you're in a hurry. The service is excellent.  If you're in Brookfield try the Mi Cocina on Bluemound - I believe owned by the same people but the food is bette.r 
 After a wonderful day spent sitting down at the Memorial Union drinking beer and reading through the Sunday newspaper hunger got the better part of us and Mexican food sounded yummy.  So our small group made our way back toward the Middleton and decided to take a short walk over to Mi Cocina.We arrived at around 6:00pm on a Sunday and were promptly seated.  The waiter brought us chips and salsa immediately and then took our drink orders.  Within a few minutes our sodas arrived along with a cheese dip.We quickly scarfed down the salsa and cheese dip; the salsa was initially mild but then had a nice little kick to it at the end.  The chips were a thicker cut chip; they weren't the slightest bit greasy.  The queso was excellent - nice and hearty white cheese delicious.We ordered our entrees and within minutes our food was available.  There was a slight mix-up with my order - I had requested chicken burritos but received beef.  No big deal; the beef burritos were decent - some chunks of potato were an interesting touch.My dining partner ordered a sampler plate which came with a chicken burrito a chicken enchilada and a tamale.  It was good as well; the chicken was far better than the ground beef.Service was beyond excellent - very fast very attentive and as such we left a nice tip.  Only complaints?  A tad pricey - our meal was $26 without any beers/margaritas and there were a ton of kids in there which was a bit distracting.  All in all a decent experience. 
 It started out as an excellent place to go then they changed the menu then they changed the menu again! The food changed names and the pricing increased but essentially it remained the same. They are now at the point where they are charging a little much for the food they are serving. I still go here because of convenience and lightning fast service. I noticed a new manager walking over the servers shoulders seemed to make the staff feeling like they were on pins and needles.Kids eat free on Sundays so keep that in mind! 
 Ate here once with a buy one get one coupon. I won't be heading back. Go to Los Gemelos off of State St instead. 
 I love their taco loco. It's a mouthwatering fajita/taco salad concoction that I a. can't get enough of and b. can't finish.I have tried a few other dishes and nothing ranks near the crazy taco.  Warm thick chips and a mild salsa are served bountifully. The chips aren't greasy and are not heavily salted which makes me happy. I like to add my own anyway.They have three versions of guacamole. Yesterday we tried the most basic which was delicious and simple. We also tried an appetizer with cheese and chorizo. It was good but quickly coagulated which resulted in an undip-able dip.MARGARITA ALERT- their house margarita... not a traditional margarita. In my opinion it tasted like watered down orange soda. And the color is a light peach color. If you want a classic lime margarita I have yet to find one I love here.  I'm not your typical margarita drinker.  The aftermath of too much sweet margarita mix and I do not get along.  I admit  I'm kind of picky about margaritas but these these should have a warning when ordering. 
 Good authentic Mexican a lot of menu options great service nice quite atmosphere. 
 I really enjoyed my dinner here. I had a fantastic fajita platter which included beef chicken shrimp and the requisite peppers and onions but also whole scallions and tomato wedges. Delicious! The guacamole was decent though a little bland. And my husband's mole sauce was just OK. But I really liked the spicy salsa they brought to the table when I requested it.The service was pretty great; there was a whole team of servers that were constantly checking up on us to make sure we were doing OK. Every time we had a special request (see: the spicy salsa) they were right on top of it.But what I REALLY liked was the margaritas; our table had a pitcher of blended strawberry margaritas and they were absolutely perfect. Blended just right with no big chunks of ice; perfectly balanced strawberry and tequila flavor. I could have consumed that whole pitcher by myself without even putting in too much effort. Yum! 
 So I've enjoyed Mi Cocina before.... but I think my tastes have matured.  The salsa was good but the sauce inside of my taco and chimichanga was a strange ketchup/bbq tasting mixture.  Beans were ok rice not so much.  I probably won't be back.  Sorry Mi Cocina. 
 I joined a few coworkers for lunch here today... I've not been a huge fan of Mi Cocina so I hoped the new location and fresh look would've improved the experience.It's still just barely passable as Mexican food.  Most entrees appear to be drowning in sauces cheese and other gooey/greasy stuff.  The salsas are extremely watery and lacking in flavor.  The guacamole (not the tableside-made) is bland and pasty.I ordered a pollo ensalada (chicken salad) which arrived as a bowl of super watery iceburg lettuce a slab of seared chicken breast 4 small slices of cucumber a spoonful of pico de gallo and a huge glob of guacamole (which I scraped off and set aside).The salad was ok but as I neared the end I literally had what looked like a small soup bowl's worth of water resting in the bottom.  My coworker's entrees were drenched in various cheese sauces/red sauces; the taco combo was blanketed in cheese.  They loved it but my guts would've been complaining for days... So enjoy the new location and ambiance - just don't expect better food.  Those who've had real Mexican food will not enjoy this place...Cocina Real/Mi Cocina = FAILFood = 2 starsService = 3 starsValue = 2 starsMISC = 3 stars 
 This is my favorite Mexican restaurant in Madison - and I think it is the best one in town.Here's what I like:The House Guacamole - Heaven! I always order this and the last time we had a table side preparation a clear demonstration on how fresh the food is here - another thing that I love about this place - the abundance of fresh food. In all its simplicity it's perfect.The salsa - I've disappointed all over Madison with other Mexican restaurant's salsa and even for that matter all over the Midwest and parts of California. I've had the best salsa here - again very simple but very delicious - and isn't that what matters? Food should be delicious especially food at any restaurant.The chips - so good so delicious. Yes seems so silly to rate the free chips but again another sign that this restaurant cares about how food tastes and only serves the best of ingredients and food.As mentioned above the abundance of fresh ingredients especially fresh vegetables in all dishes.As for the other entrees I've never been disappointed. Take your pick - they're all good.This restaurant has actually moved and is no longer located on University Ave. They are now on Allen Bvld. I think they have settled in to their new place and service is back on par.Bon Appetit! 
 Sooo... Ok. I live Mexican food. I grew up in Southern California so my standards for Mexican food are high. That being said I assume most places are gonna be bad so that if they are good I'm quite happy.... And if they aren't well... That's what I expected. This place made me happy and quite upset at the same time. I'll start at the beginning. The chips... Kinda bad. They were super dry and weird. Super weird consistency and zero salt. Our second basket was better but still lacking. The salsa was ok... Not amazing but not bad. Margaritas were good and seemed to be on the strong side which no one should complain about....ever.My burrito was actually alright. I had the carnitas burrito and it was good. It needed a bit of spicing up so it asked for hot sauce and another margarita when the waiter checked back. He said no problem. A few min pass and he brings my margarita and says he'll be right bam with the hot sauce. Ok... I'm eating very slowly because I want that hot sauce. It's now been probably 10 min since my margarita came. I don't like eating slow... And I finally say screw it and finish eating. He comes and takes my plate away... And then he brings me the hot sauce to the table. I mean really?Bottom line Drinks: Yay! Food: Ehh. Service: Booooo! 
 On 12/26/11 our 2008 Acura TL broke down in the Wisconsin Dells. We had just purchased it earlier that year. It was a certified used vehicle so it was still under warranty. We called Acura Roadside Assistance and they sent out a tow truck that jumped us so that we could drive to the nearest dealer to have the car looked at and fixed. The closest Acura dealer was Zimbrick of Middleton and we dealt with Shane (the manager) in the service department. They replaced the battery in our car and then informed us that our car now had a check engine light on. We asked if they could pull the codes and tell us what was wrong or even clear them and see if they came back. He told us that we would have to take the car in its current condition with the light on because he said \It's the day after Christmas and I just don't have the manpower to deal with it.\. My Husband reiterated to Shane that he please just pull the codes so that we have an idea of what we were dealing with Shane refused. We were worried about taking the car as we were traveling from Minneapolis to Chicago and it already broke down on us once. Plus with the delay of the battery ordeal we'd be getting into Chicago during rush hour. We decided to cancel our hotel reservation that we had for that night in Chicago and called Acura of Brookfield. They said they could get us in first thing the next morning to scan it and see why there was a check engine light on. So we spent the night in Brookfield and that dealer took great care of us! They even reserved a rental car in case it was needed. I just wish that's who we would've went to first. Oh and I forgot to mention earlier...Zimbrick of Middleton put a three inch black scuff on the drivers side rear quarter panel of our white car while it was in the shop. When we noticed it and went in to ask Shane to take a look at it he became extremely short with us and was down right rude. He implied to us that it was there from before and it clearly was not. His level of customer service was appalling. 
 The sales people in this place are the rudest I have ever seen! I walked in there and I was ready to purchase a RDX after doing research online; all I needed was a test drive to make my decision. First I was waiting for 30min so somebody would help me and then when they did they treated me very badly and were hesitant to let me do a test drive. Then once we finally went to test the car the sales man that was helping me made a comment like - this car was fully redesigned and Acura wants to target young and successful people - as if we weren't successful enough or good enough to buy the car. EXCUSE ME? So because I look young you assume I don't have enough to buy the car? I was very offended and disgusted since I was very interested in that car. In the end I went to another zimbrick in town and purchased another car. On fish hatchery road they treated me very well and aided me with all my needs.I am very offended and was never mistreated in such way in my entire life. 
 I love Zimbrick Acura. I love every Zimbrick in the city for that matter. I have never had a bad experience here. I have come here for every little item I needed done and have never felt cheated or had the blanket pulled over my eyes. There have been a few things where I was expecting a HUGE bill for things like the stabilizer for my rear suspension that had been slightly bent. I bought a new one and brought it in thinking well Labor will be $100. Zimbrick got me right in said it would take an hour had it out in half an hour and didn't charge me a dime. Another time I have come in expecting to replace all my breaks and rotors and Zimbrick saved me about $300 without having to replace everything. I have worked with a few guys here and they have ALL been extremely professional and treated me like family. The guy I usually go to even just chats with me about cars and such while i'm having service done. (Mainly getting my oil changed). The facility itself is nothing less than perfection in my opinion when it comes to dealerships. It is clean well layed out they have a great lounge with a Big Screen TV leather chairs FREE WIFI and the best of all... Free Starbucks Coffee. I have had nothing but great experiences from Zimbrick and not just Zimbrick Acura. However BECAUSE of Zimbrick Acura I expect to buy another Acura and stay with them for a VERY very long time. Thank you Zimbrick Acura! YOU GUYS ARE THE BEST OF THE BEST.P.S. When I was having major service done they let me choose what I wanted to drive while I waited for the day.  NOBODY does that. So I had some fun with a brand new TL one day on a secret \test\ road Zimbrick European showed me when I was buying my car just off Rimrock Road. 
 This is going to sound very weird:  I actually look forward to bringing my Acura in for service here.  There.  I said it.  Why? They are extremely efficient and they manage to make me feel like a rockstar every time I go in.  Now I love my little Acura--but having a fling with one of the brand spanking new sporty little numbers they provide as loaners makes the whole experience feel adventurous and decadent.  Even though I'm dropping lots of moulah on a brake job.  And I have to give the car back. 
 The outdoor sand volleyball courts are nice and there is an outdoor bar area for spectators celebrating a win or drowning your sorrows after a loss.  There is also a playground right there which is nice for people that bring their kids along.  The outdoor soccer field looks nice but they don't have a scoreboard so you can't tell how much time is left in the game or keep track of the score.  The facility seems well kept and the staff has been very nice.If you have a serious team and are competitive Keva is a great place to play sports.  If you are looking for something more laid back and social there are plenty of nice bar leagues around which may be a better fit. 
 keva is a large sports complex with indoor and outdoor soccer volleyball and basketball courts. it is hands down the nicest facility i've played volleyball at in the madison area. it would get more stars from me if it weren't for a few things: 1. their leagues are much more expensive than others in the area (and the seasons are shorter as well). pooley's and mscr don't have the same facilities but their seasons are longer.2. it's in the middle of nowhere. the location is only convenient if you live in Middleton or on the far west side. driving there from anywhere else suuuucks especially in the winter.3. it is always cold in there. if they're going to charge what they do for leagues the least they could do is turn the heat up a bit or do something with their insulation. 
 My wife and I have played in the volleyball leagues (sand and indoor) and our kids do some of the kids programming.  Facility is very nice and great atmosphere. Instructors have all been really nice and referees do there best but very nice. :) Only reason I have it 4 stars instead of 5 was because of the high costs. As someone else said in their review it is more expensive and sessions are shorter. But overall  very good. 
 I really enjoy this shop. Its definitely. Pricey but high quality so i feel its worth it for the bird seed maybe not the feeders. But backyard birders should definitely check it out 
 Best birdseed in town. Love their feeders but they ARE overpriced a bit. 
 Great selection of birdseed birdhouses books and other fun wildlife-related gifts. Yes they may cost more than eBay but you get great service from the staff who are helpful in answering questions. They are knowledgable and happy to help. 
 I recommend you stay here if you need a hotel in the area. Comfortable and clean. Stayed here two nights. Breakfast is always really good and really well stocked and FREE. On certain weeknights they serve FREE BEER. FREE BEER. The service at Staybridge is always stellar and this location did not disappoint. Kenny deserves major props. He was really cool.Internet worked great (free too) and everything in the room was in working condition and clean. The sitting area in the lobby was a happening place and very relaxing to kick it and watch sports. Nice place. 
 I recently spoke with the manager regarding extended stays at this location and he provided a tour of the facilities and a couple rooms. I'm extremely impressed with the service and facilities and plan to go here for future visits while in the Madison area. 
 I've stayed here a couple times now.  If I reviewed my first stay if probably would have been 2 or 3 stars. Lucky for them.  Back to my most recent stay.  It was the best experience ever.  (Second to the Double Tree in Carmel IN.)  I walked in the lobby around 1PM and was greeted by Bobbie.  He was handling the desk by himself and I explained that we would wait in the lobby until they had a room ready (since we were 2 hours early for check in).  My husband was anxious to watch the Bears game so he found a spot in the cozy waiting area with a big screen TV.  Bobbie offered to check us in early and I asked about our accommation request to be near the elevator or an area that would require very little walking.  It appeared that he may have had a challenge with our request.I explained the huge inconvenience with our last visit.  The lady that checked us in sent us to one of the farthest rooms along the zig zag cooridor.  AFTER we requested a room that required very little walking (due to traveling with a family member on oxygen) and THAT was the best they could do for us?  My husband was exhausted before he was half way to the room.  Needless to say he didn't want me to request a \closer\ room after that.  This is why I give them my request when I book the room.Fortunately for all of us the extra planning helped. An extra bonus was that Bobbie ask if I was Priority Club Rewards member.  Well I wasn't but I planned on asking...and of course it slipped my mind.  Thankfully because Bobbie asked me about it I am now a Priority Club member! This is great because we will be coming here a few times a year.  Bobbie was really good about explaining the details of the membership and even let me know how I can get extra points online.Did I say how great Bobbie was?  Well...he was everywhere!  He hand-delivered our new membership information to our room (with chocolate and a beverage). Whenever he saw me in the lobby he always asked if there was anything I needed.  He also helped out with the breakfast buffet in the morning.  He literaly was everywhere!  It's not like he was leaning on the counter when I saw him.  No he was very proactive in genuinely making his guests feel comfortable.  He's definitely a keeper.  Whenever I'm in the Madison area I will continue to book at this Staybridge because of my experience and the excellent service that Bobbie provided. 
 So I used the \CHAT ONLINE with an agent\ option today.  You can find this link near the top right side of the screen on the main Overview page on thier website.  I've used this feature with other organizations in the past - so it wasn't really new for me.  I chatted with Vivian and she answered my quick question about dog fees in a timely manner.  That's all I could ask for.  Thanks Vivian!  Since I wasn't able to find \Dog Fee\ information on the website I offer the info here:\Pets allowed with nonrefundable fee of 75 USD per stay. No larger than 80 lbs. Pet agreement must be signed at check in. Call hotel for details. Record of complete and up to date vaccinations required.\I hope this helps all the dog lovers out there.  :) 
 I can't say enough great things about this location in Middleton.  Earlier this year I had a one-bedroom suite for almost three months.  A family member was in the hospital at UW-Madison during this time and this hotel was more than accommodating for the specific needs in our situation.I'm not going to go into the specific details of the accommodations partly to protect individual privacy.  The other reason not to get so detailed is simply because I think the staff went so far out of their way that these \favors\ may potentially be abused by other guests if they were aware of the extreme kindness.  As I mentioned this hotel offered many special accommodations.  This allowed us to truly  feel like we had a \home away from home\.  Most of the staff knew me by name.  They were sensitive to the fact that I had a loved one who was in the hospital and critically ill. I wasn't alone in this though.  There were many other guests in a similar (if not same) situation as me.  This hotel could be a pilot for partnering up with hospitals in a win win win scenario that benefits the hotel hospital and the guest/patient.  In addition I would not be surprised if they have special training for their staff in the area of customer service and handling special accommodations.  The manager Brad is visible and on-site on a regular basis.  He and his staff organize and manage a social for their guests three nights a week.  The social offers a free meal and drinks (including beer and wine) for a couple hours in the evening. And as the name describes it allows their guests an excellent opportunity to socialize.  There are several hotel options recommended by UW and we tried three of them.  This one may be five miles away from the main UW hospital but it is a straight shot along University Avenue.  Now that UW purchased the Best Western Intowner there is much more of a push with them recommending their newly owned property to UW patients.  The Intowner is fine but the best thing going for it is how close it is to the hospital. The Staybridge-Middleton outshines them in so may ways - indoor pool hot tub laundry facility garage large suites kitchenettes socials breakfast buffetand most of all...the staff.Unfortunately I can not remember all the names of the staff that I would love to thank.  Our housekeeper was perfect.  She cleaned only when we needed it and got to know our preferences.  For instance she asked if we could use an extra box of Kleenex because she remembered us requesting an extra box the week before.  She always did a great job cleaning and freshening up our room and never invaded our space. I noticed how well the staff work together as a team and support each other when the need arises.  It's obvious that the staff members are cross-trained to manage various work areas and different shifts.  For instance I first met Bonnie on the shuttle.  She arrived at UW Hospital to pick me up.  She even showed me a quicker route back to the hotel during rush hour.  During my stay I also saw Bonnie at the front desk at the breakfast buffet in the kitchen area in the dining area managing the socials and even came to our suite to fix the television!  It turned out that the remote needed new batteries - which she was prepared for.I also feel like I got to know Ana pretty well since she worked the breakfast buffet many mornings.  Between her and Bonnie I just don't know how they always seem to make everything run so smoothly.  There is another lady with short blonde hair (sorry I can't seem to remember her name)  that always worked the socials.  She was so welcoming and learned what I like to eat and drink.  She even encouraged me to take food \to-go\  when I needed to rush back to the hospital.  It was like being with family.Jan Justin and Bobby are always a pleasure at the front desk.  Not only are they welcoming but they go out their way to get answers to your questions and take care of any requests.  My final comments are definitely not the least important.  During my stay I noticed that there was a team of about three housekeeping staff members who appeared to have cognitive/mental disabilities.  I was so pleased to see this and know that this hotel and the manager recognize the need to utilize talents that are so often overlooked. There may have been moments of inconvenience for the guests or perhaps mistakes made by these staff members.  However this is how they learn and become an integral part of society.  I commend Brad Cook for making diversity a priority.Until my next stay... 
 Location location location.  Great place in downtown Middleton.  Close to all of the places you just need to visit such as the Mustard Museum (yes you need to go there) Hubbard St. Diner (try the pies or the carrot cake) and definitely go to the live band at the Capital Brewery a block away on Friday night.  Fantastic place to walk and just enjoy the ambiance of a great little town.  Oh and free breakfast free food and drinks on Tues-Thurs free morning newspapers and spacious suites are all wonderful. 
 I came to Madison and tried out this club.  VERY  NICE for the individual price.  A warm pool lap pool two hot tubs cardio/weight room upstairs weight room downstairs raquetball courts you name it.  Had a great workout and and an awesome protein shake at their smoothy bar on my way out!  Really nice staff too! 
 Harbor Athletic Club is great.  We use it all the time - swimming classes for the boys and yoga pilates and cardio classes for my wife.  No classes for me but I still enjoy the club.Membership dues are right in line with other major clubs in the area.Highly recommended! 
 Look I love this place and I don't want you to join. It's the antithesis of the meat market known as Princeton club. Sadly smoothie bar/cafe is gone. Harbor is a really laid back health club that has everything that I need and more. The only downfalls are that it's super old and kind of put together like a corn maze.8 years and counting! 
 This is a well-run club that has seemingly unlimited choices for its members at a very reasonable price. The strength and cardio equipment is modern and always in working condition and you rarely if ever have to wait for anything. The group fitness options are plentiful and the instructors are engaged and motivating. I don't partake but there are a ton of yoga Pilates and Barre offerings in the wellness center across the parking lot from the main facility. The pool areas are clean and well-maintained and the water in the pools is kept at a comfortable temperature. I've worked out a Harbor for a year now. The club has the appearance of a facility that has expanded multiple times as best it can given the architecture of the building and the space available. It's not easy to navigate as there are many separate rooms but the staff is friendly and helpful and it's easy enough to figure things out once you get the hang of the layout. I wouldn't mind an update of the facility but not at the expense of higher prices. It's clean and friendly and doesn't lack options and to me that's most important. 
 I hate myself for reviewing Dominos but I have to give props to this location for their awesome service and incredible speed. A++++ service - friendly helpful and enjoyable.  Definitely not what you'd expect from a carryout chain pizza place.The \all new\ pizza that the commercials boast about tastes exactly like the \old\ pizza to me.  Perhaps there's a bit more garlic flavor to the crust but otherwise seems to be the same 'ole Dominos pie.Pricey too. A 14\ Brooklyn with 3 toppings and a pair of chocolate lava cakes was $25. Ouch!!! Same deal from Papa Johns would've cost $15.I usually eat Dominos pizza about once every 2 years. Even with the \all new\ pizza I don't think I'll be sampling with any more frequency.Summary:Service = 5 stars (awesome folks working here seriously!)Food = 2 stars (despite being \all new\ it still tastes the same to me)Value = 1 stars (extremely pricey for take-out pizza)Misc = 5 stars (online ordering is the best system ever) 
 Somehow amid 18 credits both semesters of my senior year I also managed to find time to do a whole lotta scrapbooking.  And this place pretty much carries everything and anything you need.  Printed papers solid papers pens and markers and pencils stickers die-cuts acid-free adhesives scissors punches and a great selection of albums.  I think they have classes too but being the *expert* scrapbooker I am (brushes hair off shoulder) I never checked those out though I'm sure they're a lot of fun.  Their workroom is well-stocked and (*nerd alert!*) it is really fun & satisfying to lock yourself in a space like that with all the necessary tools and make an entire scrapbook in an evening or afternoon.Middleton is really close to Madison/the UW Campus and convenient to get to.  The store is spacious and well laid-out; really a photo-fanatic's dream! 
 I have had too many negative experiences with the staff in this store.  Today I tried going back after a year and again the staff is so unhelpful unknowledgeable and downright rude.  I called to talk with the Manager and her attitude is just as bad.  Which I guess explains the attitudes of the staff.  There are plenty of other places to shop that actually appreciate and help customers. 
 Pricey but plentiful. Since all the local independent scrapbook stores in the Madison area are now gone this is really the only option for good scrapbook supplies (apart from the small amounts at places like JoAnn's or Michaels) and they have most things you would need. Recently I've been in a few times to use their workroom. It's free of charge Sun - Thu and you can have access to their tools and such. The chairs are very comfortable too. Very friendly staff though they sometimes get a bit too chatty and aren't anywhere near the register when you need them. If I could improve Archiver's it would be to have a more attentive staff in regards to sales and more reasonable prices (for a large chain they have prices on many things that are higher than small stores - bizarre). 
 Never again will I shop this store!  I have been an extremely loyal customer for well over 5 years.  Several weeks ago I made a very large purchase of many items in order to make a scrapbook for my daughter's bridal shower.  During the course of that shopping experience an associate kindly offered to keep my selections at the checkout desk while I continued to shop; however inadvertently another associate also added another customer's purchases to my pile as well which I did not discover until a few days ago when I proceeded to put together the scrapbook.  When I attempted to return about $20 worth of merchandise that I had paid for but had not selected I was told I was past their 30-day policy and I was simply out of luck. I later discovered however that I had returned these items WITHOUT a receipt I would have been given a store credit--which I had expressly requested but been denied because I was careful enough to save my receipt!  Nope...no more of my business and I'm telling my story to every woman I know! 
 I make jewelry...for myself and for others. I am always looking for a great deal on the finest beads and findings. My first visit to this Michael's came on the day after Thanksgiving. Hell? No really. After elbowing through a few rows of ladies I reached a mongo wall of strings of beads. Heaven!They have the best selection I have seen really anywhere. There are always coupons to be found...on their website in the Sunday newspaper on your door step or sign up to get them delivered to your mailbox. It makes a major difference on your wallet. Now that's what I call a finding! 
 Friendly staff...tons of great ideas and products!  I came here after a disappointing experience at Archivers in the same mall.  From now on I'll happily come here instead! 
 Well it's a Michaels. Nothing particularly special there. Normally I'd give most Michaels stores 4stars but this one tends to be a bit messy and has the wonkiest layout of any craft store. Also if you pop in and don't find what you're looking for you have to loop through ALL the checkouts to exit (not just pass by one like at most similar stores). This makes me feel a bit uncomfortable if they happen to not have what I'm looking for or if I just stop in to price something etc. Overall a decent place. Greenway Station on the whole is a bit of a weird shopping center but I do love that a craft store is in the mix. 
 I differ on the previous review on Greenway Station. I wouldn't take the time to go to a traditional mall. First you have to park and then find the store you want to go to. This has wasted 45 minutes of my life. I guess if I had time to loiter and wander about I would share your view. Malls are dieing across the country and life style centers are the future. In and out quickly. 
 I find the Greenway Station Shopping Center to be a nice retreat from the Towne Malls where I often feel claustrophobic breathing in recycled air dodging oncoming traffic and avoiding all the kiosk vendors...blech! Conversely Greenway is never over-crowded parking is easy to find and during the spring/summer seasons you can get your daily dose of vitamin D while you shop.The selection of shops is much smaller yes but the Center also houses the higher-end but still commercial boutiques that you can't find elsewhere in Madison (e.g. White House Black Market - one of my favorite boutique shops from back home). Solo shopping at Greenway is definitely one of my favorite ways to spend a sunny Sunday afternoon. :) 
 This mall was adjacent to the hotel where I was staying. It seemed to have some nice stores (Loft) and the general mall stuff. I was excited that it had a World Market (my favorite store of all time) and it was Wednesday Double Coffee Points Day! However nothing else stood out to me and I wasn't impressed with the restaurant selection. In fact that is a theme for Madison in general. I had to drive a bit away to get something other than a sandwich for lunch. 
 I have mixed emotions.  I love coming here because it has locations of store that I can not find in other malls in the Madison area.  However the parking lot situation drives me crazy.  I am not sure what they were trying to do but it is annoying.  Some days I find it impractical to walk the entire length of the area.  However parking is just as frustrating.  Between the winding roads and entrances of restaurants I feel like it is only a matter of time before I accidentally hit a patron.  Admittedly this is not just a problem for their venue.  So please take that with a grain of salt.  Otherwise I appreciate their wide range of stores from little box (like Michael's) to the Loft.  I also enjoy that the Irish pub and Cheeseburger in Paradise are set a little ways away.  This allows them to be open air restaurants without dealing with the mall congestion. 
 Greenway station is a total joke.  It seems like the management can't keep businesses to stay more than six months.  They don't have really any good stores that make me stop and shop.  There really is no big draw.  The resturants are worthless.  No men's stores what so ever.  On top of all this the location is horrible.  Make this a dead mall and it will be more exciting. 
 The whole chain of Barriques around the Madison area are wonderful.  This one boasts a fireplace that my friend and I spent hours in front of trying to stay warm last weekend.  The staff was friendly and the atmosphere is cozy.  The extensive wine and liquor collection made me almost salivate. 5 stars. 
 i agree with kelly. the staff is really knowledgeable about their wines and i love the variety. the atmosphere is excellent. depending on when you go you can get good baristas or not-so-good baristas. but when you get a good one the whole place is absolutely fabulous. 
 I love almost everything about the Middleton location. Big tables to study at or meet friends great selection of wine and beer free internet access and busy enough to not feel strange but slow enough that you can almost always get a seat. Also their wine tasting is a lot of fun and interesting when I want to play adult for a night. The only downfall is that the service can tend to be somewhat indifferent to you standing behind the counter. Overall a great place. 
 Barrique's in general is great - they know their wine and they serve Milwaukee's own Alterra coffees and baked goods.I've been to two of their other Madison locations and enjoy the laid-back atmosphere and comfortable seating areas. However this morning on my way out of Middleton the staff at the Middleton Coffee Trader location was dismal. At 7:30 a.m. the assumption in a coffee shop three blocks from a major freeway entrance should probably be that people are on their way to work or just generally not interested in a leisurely 15-minute wait for a latte!When I entered the store there was one person already waiting for an espresso drink one person ahead of me and no one behind me. After one of the three employees rung me up I waited several minutes as the barista VERY leisurely made the person in front of me's cappucino. She was literally pulling an espresso standing for a few seconds talking to the other girl then steaming the milk then standing and so on.After she finally finished the other guy's drink she wiped her area down and took her sweet time to start my drink. It was very obvious I was there waiting and very obvious that she was just wasting time. Meanwhile her and one of the other employees started to argue with one another all the while she does nothing. Finally I tried to make eye contact with one of them because I really was in a hurry to get back to Milwaukee. Finally she made my drink slooooooowly. As an aside I'm not that uptight or fast-paced of a person but customer service with no customer focus really gets on my nerves and there is simply no excuse for ignoring a customer in a coffee shop at 7:30 in the morning. The whole experience left a bad taste in my mouth. 
 I'm going to say that I like it better here than the downtown Madison location for a very simple reason: Seating. It's also a great option to have when stuck out in Middleton for the holidays. This place helps that little Middleton stay classy and it helps me stay sane when I make my annual return to the west side.Otherwise I'm staying in Madison for my coffees. 
 I love the concept of a coffee shop/wine & beer store in one. The tea selection was nice & the atmosphere quaint. The lattes were better than Starbucks (but really- is that saying much?) 
 Coffee is fine although I agree with Laura F. below. Service has always been VERY slow despite 3 baristas working at the counter. I'd recommend not stopping here on your way to work but its an OK place to pick up a latte on the weekend or get a bottle of wine. 
 I was intrigued when I heard that there was a place that combined a liquor store with a coffee shop. I don't know that the 2 necessarily compliment each other... In fact the counters for both have their backs to each other.In any event they have a good selection that is fun to browse through and they make a decent cup of coffee. 
 They should call it S&M Wine & Spirits. The worst of the Barriques around.... The attitude from the girls working there! They do everything they can to make you feel you are beneath them. I work in Middleton and was stopping daily until I could not put up with the attitude any more. The final draw was when I stood there at the counter for 20min with other customer behind me waiting while I got to listen to. \You know\ \Oh my god\ \She didn't\. \really really\ \Oh my god\ \He hooked up with who\. The girl working the cash register would look over at me and the others waiting and roll here eyes as she kept on talking with the barista.... When she did take my order she got it wrong. This is basically what I got for service for weeks so I don't chalk this up to a single rotten apple. 
 I have yet to walk away from this Barriques location NOT disappointed. Horrible horrible horrible service. Slow unfriendly staff who refuse to even talk to you sometimes! I have the unfortunate fate of working in the same business district as this location and it is the ONLY coffee shop within a reasonable distance. I now drive 10 minutes out of my way to work to get coffee and breakfast because I refuse to give those people any of my money. Please stay away from this location - this warning comes from a girl who has NEVER written a bad review of any place! Boo Barriques! :( 
 This review is for one thing only: iced coffee.I travel a lot for work and try to seek out a local coffee shop to get my iced coffee fix. Normally I'm disappointed...not so with Barriques.  The iced coffee (listed as cold brewed for 12 hours) is delicious.  Dark and strong just as I prefer. 
 Great place to chill...  always quiet and can get lots of work done... 
 Pretty stoked that although salads are pre-made these guys dug out ingredients and made me one from scratch sans dairy. Mucho appreciated! 
 Tips for meeting at Barriques on University Ave/ Cayuga Court:A. Make sure your friend is meeting you at this one and not the Barriques on Old Sauk.B. Parking can be tricky but they have spots in the front back and on the street.C. Grab a spot near the fireplace in the winter.  Can be a bit breezy in there.D. Perhaps get a fortified coffee drink (as in with some special ingrediants) Daddy Grasshopper Irish Coffee etc... they make them up right.E. If you have to pass D. there are still plenty of good options for coffee & tea drinkers.F. Not as many food options at this location but they do have cookies scones bagels etc..G. Plan on getting some good people watching in.  Turns from business crowd to mama yoga crowd back to business to the student crowd during the day.  Take your pick.H. Hard not to pick up a bottle of booze to take home with you.  Lots of good local options or plenty others.I. And if you checked in with Yelp you'd notice it's 20 % off whole bean coffee. YESREPEAT!Repeat!REPEAT! 
 Nice overall atmosphere the fireplace and comfy chairs are very inviting. Coffee is always good and the Cowboy cookie is a round slice of ambrosia.  Huge wine selection and wine accessories are also a draw. 
 Any place that serves both caffeine and alcohol then gives you access to reliable wifi and leaves you alone for five hours is good in my book. 
 The china wok buffet is the best Chinese buffet I've ever been too! I only give it a 4 instead of a 5 because if i find something better(very unlikely) i won't be able to rate it as such. This buffet has everything you could want from Chinese food. It has a delicious array of chicken's pork and seafood. My personal fav's are the Tso's peppered chicken crab cheese bake deep fried shrimp and the baked salmon. Their crab Rangoon egg rolls and soup are fair. Finally their desert. Unlike most Chinese buffets I've been to this one buckets of ice cream. You serve yourself but you get a decent assortment of Mint Chocolate chip strawberry butter pecan and birthday cake. If your ever in the mood to over indulge on food at a really good price. I definitely recommend going here. 
 I typically hate and do not recommend Chinese buffets but this is totally the exception. I have been going to this buffet for a few years now and it is great every time.  They don't overstock the buffet so they keep the items fresh all the time.  From the soups to apps to the main dishes is very good food.  Remember its Chinese so stay away from the sushi its not up to par with the rest of the buffet.  Finally there is ice cream kind of hidden in the back.   Put a scoop or two on top of a hot doughunt or two and you will finish in heaven. 
 I went to this place at 7pm. And most of the food was cold or warm some hot fresh food. That was good but not for 10.75.  The only thing was great was the ice cram. 
 Went there on Saturday night to get some food to go. On of the worst Chinese Buffets I've seen. Half of the trays were empty and other half were almost empty. Very little selection. The worst pay is the take out prices: $10.50 to get a to go box(should be under 2lb) and 40 cents for every ounce after WTF is that!!! So we just went somewhere else that night and didn't dine there at all. Bottom line: EAT SOMEWHERE ELSE. 
 Not good not BAD this place is a fine choice if you're looking for totally mediocre but plentiful food. That being said I would not recommend the place to friends. 
 this place is great for what it is.  i've never been disappointed - even after the lunch rush is over the food is kept fresh and rotated.  i can't speak for dinner but lunch is as good as chinese buffets get in the madison/middleton locale.  jade garden is good if they are busy but they let the food go to pot when they slow down a little. 
 This place is average. Lots of food. Speedy staff. It's a casual buffet. Great for business lunches 
 Some of the food on the buffet is quite good. The Szechwan pork and barbecue pork stand out in my recollection. The fried rice is memorable for its blandness and frozen peas and carrots. Cabbage was apparently the only ingredient that they could find to stuff their egg rolls with.This gets lows ratings for staff and service. We were barely acknowledged upon entrance and completely ignored when attempting to pay. One drink refill arrived at all and even then it was about 7 minutes later than desired. The manager chatted quite loudly on his phone while we and several others tried to settle our bills. He grunted in lieu of speaking and made his best effort to lob the receipts over the counter to avoid ever being within 6 inches of his customers. 
 Not sure why I keep deciding to come back here. Rice is rock hard and has no flavor along with most of the other food on the half-empty buffet trays. $10.50 for a plate of stale food and a drink that they forget to refill? No thanks. 
 A completely unexpected find. While on a trip to Madison we wandered into this cafe after checking out the local grocery across the street (it's an odd obsession of ours to check out grocery stores when in a new town). When you're starving and pop into the first place you see you hope for a sandwich with no mold on the bread and a halfway clean glass for your soda. This was light years beyond that.I had the special salad of the day. It was delicious a mixture of greens with just a sprinkling of crunchy celery and full of huge chunks of the tastiest creamy blue cheese I've had in a very long time. My lunch companion had soup which she declared to also be delicious. Decor was a tad dark and since we were there for a late lunch we were the only ones not sitting alone playing with laptops. However the tchotkes and lending library helped create a friendly neighborhood hangout feel. 
 If you need a tasty breakfast for cheap saunter in here(well the sauntering might cause some dirty looks--it's pretty low key). This place has tasty treats behind the glass case and a variety of breakfast dishes on their menu. I love the vast bread choices and the fact that they serve Alterra Coffee(our fave). A bit of interesting art to view and a nice sunny place to sit outside if you choose. Yay for Sundays. 
 I had stopped in to the Prairie Cafe & Bakery several times since it opened to buy scones for the office and I hadn't really given it much thought beyond this purpose.  I really liked the scones but I didn't like the fact that they didn't open until 7 which usually made me a bit late.  I didn't even consider that they might have more than bakery goods and every time I had stopped the place seemed empty.  This was of course due to the fact that it was 7:01 AM and I was the first person through the door.  So this weekend based on Chris & Kelly's recommendations I stopped in for a nice leisurely breakfast before heading into the office.  I found out that all this time I was seriously overlooking a great place right in my neighborhood.I was a bit taken aback by the number of people inside.  The place was pleasantly crowded with the warm buzz of morning conversations and a relaxed atmosphere.  I walked up and ordered the breakfast special - I was used to just picking out scones so it took me a minute to get my bearings and find the menu board.  The price was OK not under $6 but not more than I would have expected anywhere else.  I was given a number and found a nice table along the bookshelves.  I'd never really taken the time to look around the place before and I was really impressed by the decor.  I got a cup of coffee from the self-service area which is a great idea - I love diners where your cup is constantly refilled but I tend to keep drinking so long as there's coffee in the cup leading to the over-caffienated jitters.  The coffee was excellent truly delicious and fair trade to boot.  I savored it while I read a magazine and waited on my breakfast.After a bit of a wait the breakfast special came out.  The wait wasn't especially long considering the amount of people there but I was into my second cup of coffee by the time my food came.  It was served on a fairly large plate so my first impression was that there was not much to it but this was a mistake.  The special which was basically a Denver scrambler was completely satisfying filling but not heavy.  The wheat toast was much better than the average bread you get with breakfast quite possibly highlight of the food.  I was pleasantly surprised by the whole breakfast experience here.  I wasn't planning on finding such a great place for breakfast in the Prairie Cafe.  Maybe one of these days I'll get a chance to try lunch here too. 
 I have visited Prairie Cafe several times and love it. The breakfast/lunch menu is varies from great egg dishes to tasty sandwiches and salads. Vegetarians and non-vegetarians alike will find somthing satisfying. Good selection of in-house serve-yourself coffee. I tried the \Health Shake\ --sort of a cross between a shake and a smoothie. Very tasty and a perfect breakfast. Very comfortable atmosphere with free wireless. Seems to attract a \usual\ crowd. Overall a very positive experience. 
 I've been back here several times since my first review and have been continually impressed with Prairie. The food is always spot on and the atmosphere is so comfortable. The cafe sandwiches take one step towards gourmet--the tuna and egg salads are made in-house with a little twist from the same old. All are served with a choice of side; I favor the black bean and corn salad. Breakfast is no exception to Prairie's perfection--my scrambled eggs with spinach and pesto were fresh and filling. And it's hard to go wrong with any of the real fruit smoothies or coffee drinks. Prairie is exactly the way a cafe should be. 
 I've only been here two or three times and I agree that this little cafe is a well kept secret. The food is good and healthy the fireplace cozy and the original art on the walls is a nice touch. Great place to meet a friend for lunch. Haven't tried breakfast or bakery but the chai latte was warm and tasty. They also have some vegetarian choices. About a year ago we went and the lobster bisque was really salty but I wouldn't hesitate to order soup from them again. I picked up the fabulous Arts Commission calendar there last year and this year. Just found out they have free Wi-Fi. Check their hours before you go and bring cash or check no cc. 
 Delicious food.  Good prices.  They serve Alterra coffee - awesome!  My only complaint is that they don't accept credit cards. 
 A solid little place for breakfast and lunch - my experiences have been good but not \outstanding\ - it's pretty difficult to have a bad breakfast (although Perkins seems to have mastered the art of the worst breakfast) so I'm going with 3-stars: A-OK.The place gets a little busy on weekends; I've been there both during the week and on weekends.  It's largely a \self-service\ type place which is fine by me.  You place your order at the main counter get your own coffee and condiments find a table and wait for the food to arrive.  When you're done eating you clear your own table take the dishes to the \dish basket\ and head on your merry way.The pancakes aren't anything spectacular - just your regular \mix made\ pancakes.  They're cooked well with nice color and are \plate size\ so one or two should be plenty for most folks.  They're not obscenely thick; in fact they're a bit on the thin side come to think of it.Breakfast sandwich is decent - an egg your choice of meat some cheese and served on a muffin.I've also had the Wright Breakfast and today I had the special which was two eggs scrambled with tomatoes peppers onion ham cheese and a choice of toast.  Again - it was good but not \out of this world great.\They're currently serving Alterra-brand coffee; another review references Ancora but it looks like they've switched to Alterra.  It's good coffee nonetheless.Staff keeps largely to themselves which is nice - no one bothers you throughout the meal.  They don't take credit/debit cards - it's cash or check only.  There's a fair amount of seating indoors and a few metal tables and chairs outside for when the weather is nice.  There tends to be a lot of families that meet here on the weekends so if kids aren't your thing steer clear on Saturday and Sunday.  I had the joy of listening to two screaming kids during my entire meal this morning - the parents were oblivious... My biggest gripe?  Price.  My breakfast this morning (\special\ plus two pancakes plus coffee) cost $14.10.  That's a little steep for standard breakfast fare...Breakfast is served all-day long on Saturday and Sunday; during the week it's served until 11am at which point it's lunch only until closing time (around 3pm I believe). 
 I happened upon this charming restaurant and loved the simple and warm feel of the place. I had visions of an egg breakfast but it was too late in the day so the wait person suggested the quiche which did not disappoint.  I was on the road so stopping at the Prairie Cafe was just the right thing to do. 
 The coffee was delicious.  The food was good.  It wasn't the best breakfast I've ever had but it was solid.  Cash only. 
 Marvelous little breakfast spot. My husband and I spent the weekend in Middleton and came here twice because it was so good! Really enjoyed the ambience ordering at the register and having our food come out to the table. The fair-trade coffee was outstanding as were the oatmeal with berries and breakfast sandwich. I was particularly blown away by the chocolate croissant which I couldn't imagine could trump my favorite at Bennison's in Evanston IL but it was deliciously buttery flakey and had the best chocolate filling I've ever had in pain chocolat! My husband swore that his mocha was the best he's had in his life. Kind of makes us want to move out here! 
 Just got back from having breakfast with the girls! It rocked! Excellent breakfast! Two of us had the scramble special & one had a scone - to die for! Great atmosphere! Easy place to meet family & friends and/or work! I'll be going back very soon! :) 
 I used to love this place - I came here once every week or two for breakfast and to sit and write for an hour or two (I'm a grad student working on my thesis). The food is expensive (~$12 for two eggs toast bacon coffee) and the coffee isn't great but the atmosphere is nice and I didn't come all that often so it seemed like sort of a luxury. The staff also isn't particularly outgoing though not downright rude... until today. Today is Sunday and I arrived around 8am. I usually try to get there kind of early and leave before it gets busy so I'm not taking up a table. I bought a big breakfast (as described above) and sat down to work. Just over an hour later I was approached by a middle-aged man whom I assume is the owner or manager but whom I've never seen before. He asked if I was aware of their \new policy\ about Wi-Fi on Sunday mornings and how they don't want people just hanging out using the internet when it gets crowded. (No sugar coating that's almost verbatim what he said.) For the record I wasn't actually using their wi-fi I was writing. Whatever. His point was obvious. I stared at him for a few seconds because I couldn't believe that a proprietor was actually asking me a paying customer to leave when I had been there only an hour and in fact still had toast on my plate. He suggested it was fine for now but that when it started to get crowded I should get out. I said that if that's how they felt I would leave now and he responded \That's exactly how we feel.\ I was shocked and still am. I have never NEVER been treated so disrespectfully in a place of business. And I'm a regular paying customer!! I always leave a tip! I still can't believe I was treated this way.I will no longer recommend this place now that they've shown their true colors. If the food was exceptional I might try to swallow my pride but it's really nothing special. There are several other breakfast/coffee shops in the area (including a Starbucks across the road) and I will be patronizing them instead from now on. 
 My food was surprisingly good but the tuna salad had some odd ingredients. Read my full review! 
 Prarie Cafe & Bakery exists in one of those cafe/restaurant purgatories in which nothing is offensive and nothing is remarkable. 
 I must say I rather like this place even though I wish they took credit cards. Great pastries and tea as well as good veggie breakfast options. Not the fastest service but worth the wait. 
 I'm soo confused.Am I in a post office sit down restaurant or casual coffee shop? If you were going for the blend of all three then heck I guess you nailed it.Seriously. There are postal boxes in this joint.The best things I can say about this was that the coffee was hot. The breakfast burrito I had was \meh\. Nothing great nothing terrible. It was warm but took fooooooooorrrr-eeeeeeev-errrrrrrrrrr.  It was just okay. They don't accept plastic. I can understand your local dive bar or small coffee shop not wanting to accept plastic but for what (I think) they are trying to do here I would expect them to accept cards. But they don't. If you think about it it almost seems like they are going back to the good ol' days of the general store. Middleton's one-stop shop.  You can check your postal box get your coffee get your paper and buy random goods. Besides a hitching post for your horse what more could you need?Take it. Leave it. Whatever. 
 From scratch pastries breads breakfast lunch dinner optionsCozy coffee shop atmosphere fireplace plenty of tables.Cash only. Pay at front and they will bring the food out to you.Free refills on coffee.Never dissapointed. 
 I've been here at least 8 or 9 times since the August 2010 review; time for an update.Pros:+ Solid breakfast food especially the special scrambles. Can't miss.+ Great breads - I've tried nearly all of them and they're excellent+ Altera coffee + Friendly staff+ Bakery items (cookies/pastries) are superbCons:- Cash only- Slightly expensive- When busy seating is hard to come by; small spaceNo complaints with the food - it's always been high quality. We were there today as part of a team outing and several folks commented about the pancakes - they are truly great with a good sear excellent flavor and perfect texture. I had the scramble and it was as good as always. 
 I ate here twice this week. The first time with 5 others for a lunch meeting; the second time with my wife & daughter for a light brunch. Both days were warm and muggy so I started with an iced coffee. Well done. Can't go wrong with Alterra. For my work lunch I ordered the CBLT a nicely toasted BLT with a thick cut of bacon and some cheddar melted in. The lettuce and tomato are fresh as is the \fresh fruit\ on the side. Today my wife had an egg sandwich with ham. It was huge like an omelette on the same toasted bread as my BLT a few days before. The yogurt parfait my daughter ordered had fresh fruit and crunchy granola. The power was out while we were there today but the staff worked hard to serve everything on the menu. Kudos to them all and to this great little place in Middleton. 
 As always excellent locally sourced food. 
 Such a cute place!! I was there for breakfast and had eggs bacon homefries toast and a pancake. I like variety what can I say?? Eggs were good. Bacon and toast ok. Homefries were kinda greasy but tasted awesome. Totally looked like they would be gross but were delicious. Pancake is where it's at. Seriously. Just perfect. Also I believe they make their own pastries. Several coffee options too. The outside seating is so cute too. I was there on a weekday morning so there wasn't a whole lot going on but it was still fun to sit outside on a perfect day and watch the traffic and people go by. 
 Coffee was good corned beef hash was OK but not great. Service was very friendly and prompt. Nice area outside to enjoy the sunshine while having breakfast. 
 Great Place. Just good quality breakfast and lunch foods. 
 Seemed like a nice place. However after waiting in line for 20 minutes and taking quite a while to give our order (because it was VERY loud) we were told that it would take about 30 minutes to get our food. Not exactly what I wanted to hear after waiting 20 minutes but fine. When I try to pay I am informed that they do not accept debit/credit cards. Cash or check only!! No where on the door or while in line does it say cash or check only! There apparently is a very small sign on the register that says that but there is so much other crap posted in that area 99% of the people there probably never saw the sign. This is just ridiculous in this day and age to not accept cards. Even worse is the BS sign on the register. I will never eat here again just because of this! 
 Nice atmosphere. Like an upscale Starbucks. We ordered coffee chai a breakfast sandwich and quiche of the day. Was told drinks would be out in a few minutes but food would take 40 minutes. Don't know if its always like that or if they were just short staffed. But seriously 40 min for a slice of quiche and a breakfast sandwich? We told them just make the drinks forget the food. Even so the drinks took 11 minutes. This place has potential but a wait like that is crazy. Would not recommend until they work their production issues out. One star. Disappointed. 
 Looks great. Smells great. When they told me it would be a 30-40 minute wait for a breakfast sandwich I cancelled my order. Seems like an unworkable business model. Hire another cook and install another stove. Came all the way here from Spring Green--sad face. 
 I think this is a good place to come for breakfast or lunch. The food is definitely homemade and tasty. Straightforward and good quality. I've often had the salads featured on their board and have really enjoyed them. Additionally I've had soups and smoothies - also tasty and homey (in a good way). I would certainly recommend this place. It can get busy. Cash/check only and open until 2. 
 Nice place for meetings. Many tables spread out through the space. Food is very good. Cup of soup included bread AND pieces of fruit which was a sweet surprise. The salted pecan pie latte is also a nice fall diversion from pumpkin latte. Nice to have another local establishment. Bummed they only take cash as I rarely carry cash and for me that's why a star was lost. 
 I had the Tuscan chicken & 3 cheese.  Very yummy and served with a side choice.  I chose the sliced fruit.  I can say it was worth the $10...not for just the food but the ambiance.   I'd come back here to try another hot sandwich.   Just keep in mind at this moment the caf\u00e9 is still cash only.  Walk across the street grab yourself some cash and get here for a nice sandwich. 
 Great location nice atmosphere good food. But very slow service and overpriced. I ordered a breakfast sandwich with no meat --  it took 20 minutes and cost $6.75. 
 Weak food for yuppies. Overpriced. Underwhelming.  And you're surrounded by West Siders who should really know better... but of course don't. 
 After reading the last few reviews I had pretty low expectations for my lunch at Prairie Cafe & Bakery. I assumed I would have to wait a long time for my food and it would be just okay. I was pleasantly surprised. Our food came relatively quickly and my husband and I both enjoyed our sandwiches.  I had a CBLT which was excellent. The bread was perfect and I loved fresh ingredients and the special mayo. My husband really liked the special of the day which was  a tuna melt.  My bean and corn side salad was very fresh tasting but could have used a tad more flavor. We also had a key lime coconut cookie that was AMAZING. I might have to go back next week just to get another one!!  The servers weren't overly friendly but they definitely weren't UN-friendly. My only true \complaint\ is that it is a bit pricy for what you get - it was almost $30 for our lunch of two sandwiches two drinks a cookie and a kid's meal- at least the kid's meal included the drink!  I will definitely be back to the Prairie Cafe! Don't let the other negative reviews scare you away! The sandwiches are definitely worth it! :) 
 Nice atmosphere and great food especially the breakfast!  The stuffed French toast special is fantastic.  I may be a bit biased because I've gone there growing up 
 May be one of Middleton's best kept secrets... I had run past Paul's on numerous mornings and always figured the illumated \Open\ sign was an oversight.Turns out they really are open at 7am each morning and that they do indeed serve breakfast including a prime rib breakfast on Sundays! While I haven't had breakfast from Paul's yet I can confirm that it smells great!We did enjoy a few rounds of drinks while at Paul's last night and really had a good time.  The establishment is smoke-free (a HUGE bonus in our book) and is laid out in such a manner that the place doesn't feel crowded even when it's busy.The service was top notch; we never waited or wanted for anything and we enjoyed watching the cook prepare a wide variety of bar fare with impeccible precision and ease. The chicken tenders looked amazing as did the bacon cheeseburgers with grilled onions. Portions were astronomically huge and the most expensive menu item was $6.75. I can't wait to go there for dinner some night.We finished our drinks paid our tab thanked the staff and headed home. We were thrilled with Paul's and will definitely be back. We'll update with a report on the food quality as well but I have a feeling that it won't disappoint.Go here for: drinks after work gatherings breakfast and to enjoy what appears to be excellent \bar food\ (burgers fries onion rings chicken tenders etc). 
 This is a local bar and not a fine dining restaurant but they have a very friendly staff and serve a great Friday night all you can eat fish fry. If you can get past the noise level and the plain and simple accommodations you will enjoy the food and the service. 
 If your looking for bar food that is what you will get. Average price average food. 
 All you can eat fish fry for $11.75! Of course Friday night. NICE Um yeah... lots of seating TV's and Fish fry? you CANNOT beat it... This place is great! (Bit of a drive from downtown madison) but isnt that what Yelp is all about? Seriously cheap food cheap drinks. And PLENTY of it... plus this place has been around for quite a while! (longer than people might think) 
 It delivers on the name. I stopped in after work for a drink and never tried the food but this is not my kind of place. 
 Good food drinks are priced decently super friendly staff.  We stop in at least once a week. 
 Far better then Bennett's for breakfast.  Very clean.  Barkeeps very friendly.  The other customers bunch of ole timers.  Gotta love the stories they tell and banter back in forth.   You walked a stranger but you leave there as family.And the food is good too. 
 Great neighborhood bar! There definitely isn't anything 'special' on tap here but sometimes all you need is a PBR tallboy to quench your thirst! I don't come for the drinks anyway- the burgers are delicious! The local Knoche's beef and fluffy buttery buns are SO GOOD. And this is the place to come for your no-frills all-you-can-eat Friday night fish fry! You're served a dinner roll coleslaw and potato (I always order hashbrowns!) and a choice between fried cod or perch or baked cod. Do yourself a favor and order at least one round of the baked cod! It absolutely melts in your mouth! 
 Fish fry was great.  One helping was more than enough.  Crowd a little old for us but they were very friendly. 
 Eclectic (but down-to-earth) Upbeat Friendly Inexpensive Near-healthy (see menu) Kid-friendly Fast Clean Variety.What more could one ask for? 
 Okay sorry guys..but I was NOT impressed. Just happened to be in the neighborhood...so I decided to go to Chin's because I could sit outside. I ordered the lettuce wraps and the fried rice. The meat in the wraps was sub-standard and reminded me of dog food. The sauce was pretty much the only good part. The fried rice was described to have veggies and shrimp and crab...when it came out it was so obviously KRAB. Ugh. I won't be wasting my money again. 
 Chin's is my go-to \fast food\ stop in my neighborhood. I fell in love with Chin's when I was living across the street from their downtown location.I usually go with a selection from the kid's menu the Smiling Lotus Plate. A battered chicken breast with your choice of sauce (lemon sweet & sour and teriyaki - though I'm sure you can pick any sauce these are just the kid-friendly flavors) choice of rice (white or brown) two cream cheese puffs a chocolate-coated fortune cookie and soda or milk all for $4.17 including tax.The SLP is by far the best deal around for my thrifty needs. The adult entrees cost twice as much and though they offer more meat they do not include any of the other goodies. One chicken breast is plenty for me. Despite being inexpensive the chicken is fairly good quality - I've never had any gross bits (like the weird slimy string you find in chicken tenders at a lot of places). Occasionally the rice is on the dry side but that's why man invented sauce.Though 9 times out of 10 I opt for the Smiling Lotus Plate (with lemon sauce & white rice if you're wondering) occasionally I'll get the Sesame Chicken. Lots of chicken plenty of rice two meals easy. 
 I'm confused why anyone would choose to go here.  To be clear my expectations were that it would be an all Asian version of Noodles & Co.  Cheap decent fresh food.  Cheap - yepDecent - noFresh - maybe at one pointI ordered the Thai curry noodles.  Not impressed.  I've never tasted something that claimed to be curry with so little flavor.  My vegetables were obviously charred and they still sent me the dish.  Yuck.  My boyfriend ordered the teriyaki udon and the noodles were too skinny to be udon with the same flavor issues.  Not even the chili garlic sauce did much to it.  Chin's - good concept but a waste of money even at $6. 
 Ashley V said it best \why would anyone choose to go here?\ I am still traveling and the indignities of the Midwest continue. I didn't think it was cheap. I knew I was not going to get real Chinese food I knew I was coming in to get a pseudo version of Americanized Chinese food. My first indication that I was not in Peking was the Hispanic girl struggling to understand my English ordering and the POS system which was also in English. Damn oppressive society.Anyway I really should not disparage global initiative the restaurant is embracing. We are all going to be working for Indian companies as Obama went specifically to India to procure 15 million jobs to alleviate the unemployment crisis in this country. I welcome TATA motors and their cardboard framed cars. I digress.....Rosa or whatever her name was with the help of her friend Miguel (probably not his name and he was clearly only working there because it was too cold for his primary profession that being a jockey) managed to screw up my order twice overcharged me twice and never apologized. Almost thought I was in Los Angeles again.The cream cheese puffs were soggy greasy and about as far from \puffy\ as one could get. The chicken was white but it was also fatty and grisly.The Thai spring rolls were not bad flavor but they too were greasy and not very crispy. The fried rice was disgusting just a greasy mush of dirty looking rice mushrooms and egg. Finally the pot stickers ah the pot stickers they should have stuck to the pot. The filling was some processed mash of something while the outside was supposed to have been lightly pan fried let's emphasize the word \lightly.\This is not very good Asian food. I would suggest that there must be a better choice in Madison. I am sure there are Asians in Madison. I have not seen them but somewhere in this land must lay a pocket of Asians. There is a university with a math and an engineering department . There has to be Asians somewhere I would suggest to find them and ask them where to eat. I am sure Chin's would not be on their list. 
 For what it is a fast food Americanized Oriental restaurant it's not overly bad as long as you don't order shrimp.Service: I've never had a problem here. While not always the most outgoing service they are friendly. My order is always ready in a decent amount of time. I've never dined in so I won't comment on atmosphere.Their menu and nutritional info is easily accessed on line. For the most part I've had OK experiences with the food selections. I don't expect spectacular food from this place it is after all 'Fast Food' from a restaurant chain. It's nothing really special. However today I had an experience that sort of turned my stomach a bit. I ordered a Shrimp and Veggie Stir fry to go. When I got back to work and went to dig in I was a little disgusted to find that the shrimp were not deveined prior to cooking. For those of you who don't know what that means: The Shrimp's digestive track (seen as a dark brown 'vein' along the spine of the shrimp) wasn't removed which means that the digestive track and it's contents were left in place. Yes I know it's not horrible to eat it but if you know what it is it can turn your stomach. I assumed that a restaurant such as this would devein shrimp prior to cooking. I pulled all the shrimp and deveined them myself but I'd already lost my appetite. I did put the shrimp aside and ate some of the brown rice and veggies but with my stomach already feeling a bit nauseous that didn't go well. So now I'm left with an $8 meal sitting on my desk (soon to hit the garbage) with only about 1/8th of it consumed and having to find an alternative for lunch. Lesson learned if I'm craving a good stir fry with shrimp shell out the extra cash for PF Changs.**** I thought eventually I'd go back but I haven't been since then. We had some of their food catered in for work it was overcooked rubbery and chewy. yeah next time I'll get my own lunch. 
 I've definitely had better. The overall quality of all the food....veggies and chicken was definitely poor. I ate it but will definitely not go there again! 
 My husband and I went out here on our date night. Walking through the door we instantly thought Noodles and Co. due to the menu layout on the wall. It being our first time here we made it through the typical awkward stage of processing the scene to figure out how to order and the drink situation.(they have a soda fountain that is hard to see to the left)   My husband was very satisfied with the place but I'm still a little reserved. I got the stirfry which was okay. I think the crunchy vegetables were the best. The stir fry sauce was a little bland for my liking. As usual my husband shared with me a piece of his sesame chicken and I instantly got jealous. I wanted his plate. LOL For two people w drinks two appetizers (2 spring rolls 3 cream cheese puffs) plus each upgrading to 10 ingredient fried rice $1.75 it to $27 and change. We had a living social coupon for $20 my husband still wants to come back but if I do I'm ordering off the classic menu as he did. Live and learn I guess. :) A plus they have an outside patio. 
 We LOVE this place. Food is excellent service fast huge portions reasonable prices. Egg drop soup spring rolls bourbon chicken with veg fried rice--fantastic. You will not be sorry you visited. On nice evenings or lunches eat outside . 
 The food was alright the service was alright the portion size was generous the prices was alright. 3 stars for a decent place to grab food if you're in a hurry but nothing special. 
 I was in the area.  I was about to go to Pho Nam but decided to try Chins.  My first impression was that this was a lot like Noodles and company with a Chinese decor.  It felt it fell short in ambiance and flavor for me.I ordered the Thai Noodles.Thai Noodles: wide Asian noodles with bok choy red onions pea pods and waterchestnuts in coconut curry with Thai seasonings garnished with limered pepper and sprouts.I didn't feel like this had a lot of flavor.  It was barely coconut curry and actually had a flavor that was different from anything I have ever had before.   The vegetable were fresh and the portion was good.My overall experience was so so but I still ended up having a good time because I was able to witness an exchange between some people that was something like a scene out of the movie Slacker by Linklater.  It was awkward.  A true cringe moment.  Bizarre. Some people can be so cold and insensitive.  It went on for about 5 minutes and really made my stop there interesting.There were a lot of people here from what it looked like they were on lunch from nearby businesses.  The folks here really work their butts off.  But the food and the restaurant could be so much better. 
 Much like it's former State Street counterpart this place used to be awesome. The food is still good but it's not so fast anymore and the ingredients seem to be a bit skimpy. My 10 Ingredient Fried Rice had about 4 shrimp. Lame. Still - it's all delicious. But I never used to have to wait 15 minutes and it all-around used to be shinier. 
 We love Asia Fresh. bourbon chicken with veg fried rice-perfect. Take away done quickly. service great. Great price. 
 We did takeout from here and both thought our dinners were awesome.  We ordered: - Chicken wings with Sesame Szechuan sauce (you can get them with any stir fry sauce choice)- Hot and sour soup- Thai spring rolls- Sesame chicken- Sweet and sour chicken. Then we got stuck in rush hour/post blizzard traffic and had a 40 minute commute home.  We were both impressed how well the food held up after that amount of time! The flavor of the wings was good but they were obviously no longer hot.  Next time we will try those when we dine in.   Everything else had lots of heat and flavor.  The hot and sour soup looked different than any other I have eaten but it was still good and plenty hot.  I did not detect much sour in it my only small complaint.  We both felt we had more than enough food for $23 and the quality was great.  We will definitely go back.  I am actually a little shocked at all the bad reviews on this place after our dining experience.  Not sure if they have improved things or we just hit it on a good night.  Service was fast friendly and accurate...no complaints there. 
 The food here is quite good actually. Not 5 star restaurant quality but for the price and service it's decent. The staff was friendly and I didn't wait long in line. The teriyaki chicken and cream puffs are my favorites and even though the chocolate covered fortune cookie was meant for little kids I still have the balls to ask for one lol. Overall not a bad choice at all.Oh and I'll say it straight off the bat this place is not authentic asian food. But for what it is (which is pan asian fast food) it did not disappoint me. 
 Fast food Chinese is generally not that exciting but I must say this place really was quite impressive. Very fresh tasting ingredients with a lot of good flavors all served hot and with a smile. What more could you ask for? 
 A fast-casual spin-off of a Minnesota-based fast-food Chinese-American chain that likewise serves nothing special Chin's gets one star for being the only Asian-American place I know of in Dane County that serves fried cream cheese wontons without crabmeat. I require a side dish of epinephrine if I eat crab so I appreciate this omission. Now that I have established that I go here just for the cream cheese puffs it should be clear that I'm far from an expert on Asian food. So take the rest of my review with a grain of salt; there should be plenty to spare in your entree. I used to think this place was ok -- it still has plenty of variety a very friendly staff good chili-garlic sauce decent potstickers above-average lettuce wraps no grisly or fatty pieces of meat -- but lately the preparation has been sloppy and the presentation just as bad. I suspect the quality of the ingredients has come down a notch. After cream cheese wontons Pad Thai is one of my favorite Asian entrees. My last order looked like Goldilocks's porridge in the \Three Little Bears\ Golden Book I had as a kid. Dull gray soupy greasy salty and watery yet somehow sticky. The chopped peanuts added no crunch at all which is too bad because other than the chicken pieces I picked through the mess to find I was hoping to find something else edible. Epic fail on this entree. On my next visit I ordered the Firecracker noodles with chicken as a side to my beloved wontons. Slight improvement from last time but still salty as the Dead Sea and enough grease to de-squeak every door hinge on the west side. The bag was so heavy I skipped my biceps workout for a week. The red peppers had no life left. Again I hunted and pecked for the chicken which is consistently decent-quality well-prepared white meat. My wife's veggie fried rice would have been ok -- they ease up on the salt and Valvoline for this entree -- but the vegetables were overcooked and charred in places. Fresh veggies should present as a bright spectrum of colors -- orange from the carrots bright green from the scallions broccoli and pea pods yellow from the corncobettes. Instead however they were the same brown color as the fried rice. My last fortune cookie said I'll probably return to Chin's. It's on the way home from work the food comes out fast and I can't resist those damn cream cheese wontons. Maybe I'll throw in some potstickers or wraps and call it dinner. 
 We tried to order for delivery because we are 4 miles away. On their menu it says $15 minimum. We called to place the order and we were told today it's a $75 minimum. We found that insane so never ordered. 
 I always get the lemon chicken and it's delicious! Nice light batter and very crispy with a good amount of sauce. The potstickers are also very good. 
 Only thing less disappointing then the food is the staff.   Ordered Chin Wings Hot & Sour soup and Sesame Chicken to go.. What I get in return is Chin Wings with the wrong stir fry sauce a cup of hot & sour and lemon chicken.  They charged me for what I ordered yet they still refused a refund me or to replace my food.. Avoid this place like the plague. 
 The food was decent.  But yet again the staff managed to screw my order up and ended up charging me more then what I should of payed for. 
 We come here a lot and the food is never consistent. Sometimes it's really salty. Other times it's too spicy or not spicy enough. There must be several different cooks because the sauce is never the same either. We still like the adventure of what we may get today. Stop for quick bite on the way home. If you tried it and didn't like it you may want to try again you may be surprised at how much better or different the next time may be. The servers here are friendly enough but some times they difficult to read. Place is not always clean but it's clean enough. I don't like the fact that some of the tables are falling apart but there is always customers here so they must be doing something right. 
 Good food and prices are reasonable! 
 I will never order from there again. I called to find out what was on the hot and spicy chicken. The person who answered informed me that it was both hot and spicy but it was serves with broccoli snow peas and onions. Once I got my entree it was neither hot nor spicy. On top of that there was no broccoli. Too many onions barely any snow peas AND a very small amount of chicken. Did I mention that I don't think the chicken was actually chicken? It was cut so thin and had no chicken flavor. The white rice that accompanied my dish was mushy and clumped together. I've made better rice boiling it. My mom had the Kung pao chicken and she was also dissatisfied with her meal. The crab Rangoon was ok... Fairly basic. I won't return there. I would prefer to give it a ZERO 
 Hubby has been eating here for years but since I only occasionally visit WI he never convinced me to give this little dive a try. Now I'm sad about what i've been missing! Cannot understand how they do it for SO cheap - amazingly fresh tasty generous Chinese. Clean open kitchen very fast and large variety. Liked it so much that I got a lunch special to go for the bus ride over to O'Hare. They packed it up tight but remember to take napkins condiments and utensils. I loved the shrimp with broccoli (also had carrots) and the shrimp were large and plentiful. Wonton soup (4 big dumplings) on a cold day was delish and included in the lunch special. Also got chicken egg foo yung which included large well filled egg roll - also tasty mustardy sauce OK (not as good as the brown sauce I'm used to). All lunch specials include roast pork fried rice which was good enough to buy on its own. Seems like a mom/pop place so support your local Chinese joint - down with PF/PW/PE. 
 We go here pretty regularly. The food is good but by no means great. It is pretty divey looking (photos of food etc) and they mess up our order abt 20% of the time but still a good value for the price. General Tso's chicken is great. I asked for brown rice once and they gave us fried rice... to their credit it was brown :) 
 I take my westie to Lori's and every time they are super friendly and do a beautiful job with her. I'm very picky about her haircuts too. She jumps out of the car to run inside - which she doesn't do at some other groomers. I love they have daycare so she plays all morning and then gets groomed in the afternoon. Last time I accidentally showed up on the wrong day and they never even mentioned it - they just fit her in anyway. And..their prices are in-line with everyone else in town in fact they might be a little less. 
 Lori's is a great facility with wonderful confident and friendly staff.  As a veterinarian  I am comfortable referring my clients with grooming needs to Lori's Pet Agree!  She and her staff do a thorough and professional job.  The pets enjoy the day care and play time that she has available as well.   Lori's Pet Agree is highly recommended! --Dr. Kristine Collins 
 I had taken my terrier here for grooming before he passed away nearly two years ago and finally was ready to get a replacement pup.  My new terrier is about 8 months old now and is a Lori's devotee!  Their staff are all gentle and caring and her grooming has always been just want I've asked for!  Not only are their staff welcoming and always remember your pup when you come they also offer doggy daycare!  The doggy daycare is perfect for tiring out a young puppy in a very homey setting (their facility is an old house in downtown Middleton).  My vet advised against one of the larger dog daycares in town due to her smaller size and it being possibly overwhelming so Lori's is the best of both worlds!!!!  In fact I'm on my way to pick her up this afternoon from a grooming and play day! 
 Went to Denny's this morning for breakfast with my twins and fiance. We walked in the door and their was no hostess which is understandable if they are busy but they really weren't. We had at least five servers look dead at us as well as cooks and stood there for a good five minutes and still no one said anything to us so we walked out and went to the McDonald's across the street. 
 always great food with great service.  Nothing too fancy but fills you up and gets you on the way. 
 it's a starbucks...what can I say other than it's as great as every starbucks I've been to!  Friendly service and a consistant product.  yay! 
 I haven't been to this location as much as I have some of the other locations but I do enjoy this location. Again they are all kind of the same in a sense but its about the interior and the experience. I actually quite like the people who work at this location. I have seen the same people working here for a while now and they always make me feel so welcome. They are usually a couple of early 30's to middle aged women working here that make ya feel like mom is welcoming you home. \What can I get ya hun\ \How's your day going sweety\ that kind of stuff. And some people may not like that but I enjoy it because it makes you feel way more comfortable to be somewhere. They are always fast and efficient and any extras you may want are stocked plentifully. The one small thing I don't like is that they are tucked away and really have to be looking for it to know where it is and it is sort of a small building. It can get really cramped if there is a line in there and pushed against some of the valuables. Nice place to stop after some shopping if ya know where it is. 
 I am always iffy about chain locations.  Usually you can not mess up a Starbucks too much.  This location was missing something.  The staff was busy having conversations behind the counter so service was slow.  The customers were not being attended to.  I had an event near this place so I went two mornings in a row.  Each morning something catastrophic occurred. Day one while handing a venti coffee to a patron the barrista was handing the coffee while securing the lid which resulted in the coffee tipping over and hitting four people.  While cleaning up I mentioned that coffee was still under the counter and you would have thought that I told the barrista he was completely inadequate.  I would just hate for someone to lean on the counter and get residual hanging coffee.  Day two - They ran out of something.  Not sure what.  But something.  I know this because they were all milling around talking crap about someone who was not doing their job.  The funny part is that no one was attending to the people in front of the counter.  Just saying.  The caramel mocha was completely average.  Nothing special.  Definitely glad my event was over but I am sad to see no other competitors in the area but McDonald's. 
 It is so-so.   I went in on  a Sunday morning so it was pretty slow.   The employees were busy talking so they did not great me when I came in and then I asked for them to clean some tables.....I got a sigh and the guy went and cleaned the tables.   Not a single clean table in the place.   You would think if it was that slow the place would be clean! 
 It did take a while to get our drinks here but they were super apologetic. It wasn't a big deal as we realized there was someone new that was also training so it took a little longer to get all the drinks ready. Not a big deal.Drinks were tasty and I had happy kids. 
 Pretty darn expensive for custard but it is really good possibly the best I have ever had.  Been there over 15 times and have yet to see an adult working in the place.  Service is hit and miss.  Our last trip the IQ level of the help was very low.  Bathrooms are usually clean. 
 The ice cream is excellent but a little pricey.  The service is less than stellar.  Our daughter bought a cone and discovered a hair in it.  When we returned to the counter and informed the employee that sold us the cone she actually said \We've been getting that a lot lately\.  Great!Also if you order anything to be picked up later like a birthday cake or cupcakes make sure you call before you go to pick it up as they seem to be less than organized with their orders.I gave them a 2 star rating based on the excellent flavors... it should have been at least a 4.5 with some attention to customer service. 
 Agreed with Dave's review about the staff and service being a hit or miss. I normally don't make stops anymore to cold stone restaurants because their ice cream is so expensive. Plus I don't care for the taste of their ice cream. Maybe it is just me but I think it's overrated. 
 Time has not been kind to this Cold Stone Creamery location.  For a while it was the next great thing - there always were long lines of families anxious to get their butterfat and sugar fix.  The buzz has faded and now those same families flock to the local froyo joints to get their frozen dairy fix.  I stopped by this weekend while shopping at Greenway Station and found the store devoid of patrons.  I know it's been a long cold winter but we Wisconsinites love our ice cream and Babcock Hall was standing room only when I visited later that same day.So why does my ice-creaming loving family now generally eschew Cold Stone?* Texture - I really prefer a firm scoop of ice cream and that's not what you get at Cold Stone.  The texture is far too gooey for my liking.  It's not terrible but I much prefer the denser texture of the product at Babcock Dairy or The Chocolate Shoppe any day of the week and twice on Sunday.  The other textural problem is that Cold Stone ice cream melts too fast so bring a gross of handi-wipes when bringing the kiddos here.  * Flavor - The ice cream here is too sweet.  At Cold Stone it is all about excess whether it be about the butterfat content the sugar content or the oversaturated flavorings.  Again it's not terrible but it's just not my cup of tea.* Serving Size - The theme of excess carries over to the over-the-top serving sizes.  While I am not a huge fan of froyo at least I can control my serving size when I visit the near-by Menchies or Orange Leaf.  In addition while I'm on the topic of serving sizes can I just add that I detest the cutesy \Like It\ \Love It\ and \Gotta Have It\ serving size names.* Service - When the place first opened the staff was energetic and responsive.  I admit it was hokey but I kinda liked the dorky songs they sang when you left a tip.  But now a trip to Cold Stone is more like visiting a gulag.  Leaving a tip rarely triggers a response much less a chorus of \Ice cream baby\ sung to the tune of Ice Ice Baby.  My other pet peeve is that the tables always seem to be sticky thanks to the soupiness of the ice cream.  It's really kind of a depressing place to visit now.* Pro tip: If you have a peanut allergy have them clean the stone before they mix your ice cream or you risk cross contaminating your treat.  (I learned that the hard way.) 
 I don't recommend going there.  My wife and I decided to go there for some dessert after a very nice dinner.  I wanted an \Apple Pie A la Cold Stone\.  I have had this before and it is normally very good.  I was told that they had been out of the pie filling for a while.  Yet this is one of their \Signature Creations\.  I would expect that if this is something that they always have that they would have on their menu they would have the ingredients for it.  Then My wife ordered their seasonal \Funnel Cake Sundae.  My wife ended up waiting 15 minutes for this.  Jacob and Chad told us that they had to reheat the Funnel cake for the sundae twice.  This made is rock hard and she had to throw most of the funnel cake away because she could not eat it.  As we were waiting I noticed how dirty the entire interior was.  It looks like the floors and base boards have not cleaning in months.  Tables and floors were dirty and sticky-GROSS.  I did not check the bathrooms too scared to try.  On top of all this the price for their \Creations\ is way too high!!!  I am tempted to call the health department for an inspection.  DON\T GO THERE!!!  it is a waste of time and money. 
 Really good but it took a long time and $$$$ for what I know there are only about 10 flavors no line but still good clean 
 At its best the Bristled Boar is a great place to go with friends for an after-work drink or three and maybe a game of pool or darts or just watch the game.  At its worst it is the epitome of a townie joint.  I've seen both over the last five years.  When I first visited the Boar it was a dive.  My college roommate had a job tending bar and we would from time to time take up his offer of free drinks in return for keeping him company.  The barstools were often filled with the usual regulars drinking under a thick pall of smoke.  There is a certain charm to dive bars and I'm sure for some the old Boar had it but not for me.  Fortunately the owner completed renovated the entire bar and this happened right about the time I moved out to MIddleton.  In place of the dingy walls was stylish wood paneling and tile floors instead of linoleum.  The ceilings were raised and the ventilation was improved and while it can certainly still get smoky my eyes don't burn anymore.  There is a sand volleyball court out back and bar leagues during the summer.  The jukebox is relatively standard but there are a few gems tucked in amidst the usual country & hard rock options.  The regular crowd is still around but a good deal more young people can be found at the Boar these days.  Some nights are vibrant and fun some not so much.  I can't say that I've tried much of the food.  I know from my old roommate that there is a small grill in back which was added during the renovation.  The Emil's pizzas are good as always.  All in all the new Boar is a complete improvement over the old one.There are still a few things that keep the Boar from being my favorite in Middleton namely the tap selection.  I am a beer snob and proud of it so when the only local tap option is Spotted Cow I call foul.  I can't think of another Middleton bar that doesn't have at least one Capital tap or at least Esser's Best.  What really seals it for me is sometimes the Spotted lines aren't even clean and the beer comes out flat and a bit funky.  Another complaint that I frequently have is some of the bartenders know next to nothing about proper drink mixing.  It is usually the same bartenders that act put upon to even mix a drink as opposed to just grabbing a bottle.  Some of the older bartenders are very good but you almost have to know the schedule to avoid the others. 
 I just went there for drinks with friends this past week (either Weds or Thurs I can't remember which right now).  They had an excellent drink special--$2.50 Absolut mixers.  Woohoo!  It's an odd place.  It's got an \up north lodge\-kind of vibe in one part of the bar; wood paneling  complete with a boar's head with glowing red eyes.  The other part I *believe* had a different theme without wood paneling and a linoleum floor with a pool table.  There was a volleyball court outside.  The crowd was a strange mix of middle aged drunks and skanky-dressed younger girls.  Overall I have nothing against the bar and would go back if I was at my friend's house again. 
 Not gonna lie....Its a dive. But its the lesser of the evils of the surrounding bars(Club Tavern and Branch St. retreat are much worse). The bar is usually not packed they have a decent selection of tap beers and almost always have decent drink specials. I was there a few weeks ago and the special was Jameson mixers for $3.50 on a Friday...not bad.Overall if your in the area its worth stopping at but nothing spectacular. 
 I have been a fan of the Boar for several years. They have a great staff and atmosphere.  Customer base is a good mix of young and old. A great place to chill with friends have a drink and play some bar games. They have darts pool touch screen games and volleyball. 
 Nicer than I expected. Great place for trivia. Very good fries. 
 First offI feel I am friendly and easy to get along with but this was the worst \bartending experience\ I have ever encountered! [It was Thanksgiving Eve 6:15 in case the owner/manager might read this]. Either I was 1] not a regular or 2]a bother. NEVER again! 
 Free tacos for packer games!  free touchdown shots!  great prices calm atmosphere 
 I knew I had to check the place out as soon as I saw the name in the yelp app.  I was impressed by the large interior and overall layout. It was pretty tame when I was there but after looking at a few of the pictures I can tell that this place gets pretty wild. Awesome. I had a nice conversation with some locals and enjoyed a few local brews that were a perfect end to a long day. So next time you're in the neighborhood come check this place out and give a nod to the stuffed boar head on the wall it's seen a lot more action than pretty much everyone. 
 So the Boar as we affectionately call it. It's good for a lot of things. Darts pool Tuesday blues night (live blues band!) fun times decent beer waffle fries and fried cheese curds (if you don't mind the sort that come from the freezer). The food? Not so great. It's not so bad but it's just not that good.I think everything is frozen at this place. Everything. We had pizza there the other night and I could taste the freezer burn. We still had a blast but it would be nice if the food wasn't so obviously frozen. Everything is ordered from the bar which is fine but a little weird.There isn't too much to say about this place other than what I've just said. I'll go back because my friends at work like it but it wouldn't be my top choice. There are definitely other places that can fill my dart needs while providing me with at least decent non-frozen food.Sorry Boar - the truth can hurt. 
 This place is actually pretty neat. I loved the Boars heads on the wall and the old western type feel to it. The drinks were really good well made and strong but for some reason I really enjoyed the food. For being bar food it was actually pretty spectacular. Any drink ya like at a cheap price and some cool stuff to look at. Whats not to like? They got big TV's and fast service. (eBay style) A++++++++++++ Great Seller!!!!!! Will do business again! 
 Definitely a place I could frequent...nice and open and live blues music every Tuesday night.   Be sure to check out \Blues and Brews\ 
 Waffle Fries!!!! Nice rustic log cabin atmosphere and great outdoor porch. My first time here was the Badger/Arizona game last Saturday night and we had a blast with friends. I'd definitely go back. 
 My family has been going to Dr. Killian for years now and he has always been an extremely good dentist very kind professional and comforting when it comes to some of the more serious procedures. Not only that he has just recently updated his facility via a $1 Million investment! He now has luxorious massaging dental chairs state-of-the-art equipment and even a moveable LCD TV above the chair so as to relax you while you're worked on! The lobby is gorgeous with a massive 60\ some odd LCD HDTV etc. This is an EXCELLENT dentist. He has been in the business for well since before i was even born! which is over 20 years so he knows exactly what he is doing. Also his son just moved into the building so there are now 2 great dentists working in the same building. 
 Dr. Killian is our family's favorite dentist including my husband the dentalphobe and our two young daughters. We appreciate the beautiful facility private rooms gentle hygienists and top notch dental care. 
 The clinic itself is very very nice. They had Frozen playing and just about any good magazine you'd want to read in the waiting room. Everyone was very friendly and went out of their ways to make sure I was comfortable at all times. Dr. Brent could have easily said I need a few new fillings--how am I to know? That makes me feel like they're serious about their work and not in it for the money. I know a few people who have been told they need work done when they didn't. I trust that the Killians don't do that. Dr. Brent also seemed to know his stuff. I don't even like the dentist and I'm looking forward to going back! 
 Hard to rate a McDonald's well.  I go through the drive thru most mornings for coffee and will eat lunch there from time to time.  Drive thru service is always great and restaurant is always clean.  They hire and retain good help. 
 This might be the best run McDonalds in the Madison area. The drive-through runs incredibly fast! Plus it's a throw back McDonalds with a displayed old milkshake machine that triggered Ray Kroc's involvement in the company and resulted in him bringing in a franchise model that facilitated the restaurant's world-wide domination. However who checks for a McDonalds rating? 
 I ate here on Dec 1st (big mac combo) and it did not feel well after words. I learned that they and all Mc D's use ammoniated beef it is frank'in food. Madison is full of privately owned restaurants that serve real food not chemical and byproducts dressed up as food. Save your kids save your self. Just say no to the evil fake food 
 I've been really happy with All Pets.  They have nice convenient hours and the staff has always been great.  Being open until 6 p.m. on weekdays is really helpful; the extra hour makes a big difference.  My two cats regularly see  Dr. Haroldson and both have seen Dr. Erickson for injuries/infections. I've had no trouble making appointments for regular check ups and vaccinations.  When either cat has had unexpected problems (eye infection infected cut etc.) they've been able to get me in within a day although I was not picky about what vet I saw.  Both Drs. Haroldson and Erickson have patiently and carefully talked me through what I needed to do for home-care and answered all of my questions.  I've never felt rushed or talked down to. 
 I absolutely love the staff at AllPets. They do an extraordinary job of taking care of my dog. I am impressed by their knowledge as well as their patience and clarity in explaining care options. 
 Love All Pets!  We drive all the way from McFarland to Middleton to go here because the staff from the front desk to all the Doctors truly care about the animals.  I've seen Vet Techs carrying sick animals around in slings to give them extra attention and care.  I've had them stay open waiting for me to arrive they work you in for appointments as necessary.  Seriously can't say enough great things about this clinic. 
 Shortly after we relocated to Madison our dog began having seizures. It's a scary thing to experience and figuring out how to manager her epilepsy has been a challenge but I cannot imagine going through it without the care we have received at All Pets. Getting in for an appointment has never been difficult and the response time to questions has been extremely quick which is much appreciated when we're anxious about our pup. The staff has been great at helping put some of our fears at ease. We have only seen Dr. Haroldson who is unbelievably patient helpful and kind in answering our numerous questions whether it be over the phone by email or in person. When we bring our dog to All Pets she never seems anxious or fearful as she had occasionally at our old vet's office which I can only attribute to the genuine love and care the entire staff seems to exhibit towards all the animals that come in. to their clinic. I would recommend All Pets to any pet owner I know with no hesitation. 
 Decent hotel in the area.  Staff was great and my room was clean.  The location is near a mall and a bunch of restaurants which is great for someone visiting on business.  There are a number of other hotels in the area so you might want to do some comparison shopping before booking here. 
 great hotel for the price. the rooms are more like a boutique hotel with mid century modern kind of look and feel. decent breakfast and friendly staff. 
 Hotel staff make this place a good strong 3 stars other than that that's it.  The shower leaks and the walls are pretty thin. Towels hurt ya if you like soft cotton towels.....uh it's good for the price is a good area to eat and do your Middleton thing. It's a decent hotel for the price. Could use a face lift bit it's all good (: the geese are not friendly do not touch! FYI another last tip is that the windows are not double pane so the noise level is high from outside. Great price and staff but noise level sucks :( 
 The rooms were clean and all of the furniture was very new. Water pressure in the shower was excellent. Quite a selection of channels on the \idiot-box\ and free internet in all of the rooms.The breakfast buffet in the morning was one of the best I have seen in these small travel motels. Lots of food choices and they kept it well stocked through the rushes.We will stay here again next time in this area and would definitely recommend if you are visiting Madison WI 
 My group of 12 runners and 1 driver spent the night here before Ragnar Relay Chicago which is a relay race from Madison through Milwaukee and on to Chicago. The race began Friday so we arrived late Thursday afternoon and left in the morning.Reservations were made months in advance and were honored when we got there. Check-in was simple and the employees seemed to enjoy our enthusiasm and joking around. They even welcomed us with fresh cookies. How can you hate on a hotel with cookies? You just can't.The location strangely enough was both ideal and not. The nice thing was that we were close enough to the starting line that it wasn't a huge issue for our first group of runners to leave at 5am and get there on time; however being somewhat closer to where the race started might have been nicer and we're looking into that for 2013 because it was a bit of a haul for the second van (my van).On the other hand we were far enough away that this hotel did not fill up immediately and it had no problem blocking off some rooms for us and we were right off the highway very close to restaurants for an easy group dinner and there is a shopping center right next door. I took full advantage of stocking up on anything I might have missed by going to the local Erehwon and running shop. That was incredibly convenient. They also have a really good continental breakfast.As far as the hotel room: the beds were incredibly comfortable but the shower drain was backed up. I ended up in a couple inches of dirty water which is never fun. However I had some of the best sleep of my life. The area remains relatively quiet and the curtains keep out most of the light.Prices are very reasonable so this is a great place to stay if you want to be near Madison but don't need to be right in the city. 
 This a pretty standard Fairfield in. Free breakfast free wifi nice staff. The usual... I was working at the University of Wisconsin and chose this place because I like building Marriott points. It's not in Madison at all so just be aware if you are doing lots of things on campus you got about a 20 minute drive. The good thing is it's pretty close to the road that leads to campus downtown and the airport. Downtown Middletown in kinda idyllic too. I will warn you this is the type of hotel chartered bus passengers like. Cheap friendly and next to a Denny's. 
 Rachel is the best ever and I love staying here.  It is on my company but they are worth every dime.  The breakfast was wonderful everyday and the shuttle service is always on time.  The drivers are so awesome and they love taking care of us.  It is always wonderful to get great customer service and this place sets the bar. 
 They have decent drink specials. However the bar is sometimes filled with older trashier drunks. Its defintely an older crowd where Cougars are lurking. On the weekend they have free live music. Its usually too loud to converse with your group but the bands usually arn't terrible.  Ive never had their food but Ive heard its pretty decent. Overall it an ok place to go to get a few drinks. Sadly its one of the better bars in Middleton. Not as much of a dive as the Club Tavern or Bristled Boar and not as Towny as Pauls grill ....And if your into older trashy women this place is for you. 
 Just had to review to mention my addiction. The Hody Club. Its a club sandwich with a fried egg on it. Most will think it sounds gross. They do something to make this sandwich just magical. SO good - I want one every time I hear Hody. Yum. They also have awesome Quesadilla's too. We usually get ours with spicy but I think you can customize. Otherwise a decent bar with average prices and service. Good TVs and a very local crowd. I think they have small bands on the weekends. 
 Absolutely the best club sandwich I have had in a looong time. I order it everytime I go and it has never been less than awesome. And it's priced really well. Anytime I've gone at night the crowd is a little rough looking and the music is too loud. But going in the early evening or for lunch usually works pretty well. 
 Went here for lunch because we had coupons for bogo sandwiches. The food was pretty good for a little WI bar! The biggest downfall was that their freezer had just broken so we could not get any fried apps. The waitress did let us use both of our coupons even though she said they were one per table (that was not printed on them) but still nice of her! SO CHEAP! Out bill was around $20 for 4 people!? 
 I'm from a small town in Kentucky. I likely won't attend my 30-year high school reunion but I imagine it will look exactly like Hody's. Lotta flannel shirts and fiddle playing in here tonight. Cowboy hats beards and MILFs a'prowling. God bless America. The only drawback is that there seems to be a raspy sideshow bob type of lady chain-smoking outside. I guess that comes with the territory. The skating rink cheese sticks more than make up for that spectacle. 
 Happened to be here for a recent Packer game partly cuz they advertise half price apps during the game and partly cuz of their presence in 'Madison Cocktail' book.Service was sketchy at best.Waited 10-15 minutes for a beer and then was advised only 'select' apps were half price [2-3 of 16 on menu]?! Hmmm.Also use of the cocktail book was viewed as a nuisance. I say if you sell them readily accept them ...In summaryfelt like the customer catered to the server rather than vice versa To their credit Hody club sandwich was very good. 
 A wide variety of people mingle at this bar...classy trashy young old professional you name it.  The band was o.k. the beer was not very cold but the prices were ok for the area.  This place needs to place more emphasis on bartenders that are courteous and clean in appearance.   Probably the longest wait for a drink in an unpopulated establishment!!  Tip accordingly 
 My boyfriend and I headed out to Louisianne's on the recommendation of a couple of his friends. We were encouraged to make reservations as the couple noted how this place is frequently filled to capacity every night. Well Sunday night it's not so. And that's when we went.Louisianne's is located underground and the atmosphere below is warm and inviting. To the left is the bar with the piano and stage for the jazz bands that play nearly every night. In front of and to the right are small white-clothed tables. Our service was excellent. Because there happened to be so few people there that night the host and the waitress were both quite talkative and welcoming. The meal was delicious (you don't need appetizers here - the entree portions are QUITE large). I highly recommend it and can't wait to go back for the nights of live jazz. 
 BEST.CREME.BRULEE.EVER!!And the food the piano bar the service is ABSOLUTELY to die for.Louisiannes is the kind of place that you can GENUINELY never go wrong.  It's in an underground cave very \Adams Family Values\ (Ok isn't it bad that I compare it to a movie) their wine list is VERY extensive and if you go at ~6ish there's always the piano man ready to delect you with a rendition of a bluesy jazzy tune...While I think reservation is HIGHLY recommended (there's like 10 tables at MOST) it just so happens that everytime my husband and I go we can get in.. Lucky us!!!Seriously by far one of the BEST restaurants in Madison (whoops Middleton). 
 Grade: CSkip the overpriced nasty Cajun food and go for the desserts! Very pricey. I plan to give this place another try soon. 
 One of my favorite dining experiences in the Madison area. The underground atmosphere at Louisianne's is quaint yet not unsophisticated; we went on the eve of a snowstorm so the pianist didn't make it in to play--though I'm sure he would have made a nice dinnertime addition.Service was friendly and efficient. Our lemon artichoke appetizer was excellent--akin to bruschetta but minus the tomatoes and plus pine nuts and a decadent lemon-y parmesan topping. For an entree I ordered the blackened catfish with spinach mashed potatoes and wasn't disappointed... though I will say my fish was seasoned on the heavy side. I didn't mind the additional kick but you may want to let the staff know if you don't like the sensation of blackened fire-breathing between bites.I was also pleased with the wine selection. And really how can you go wrong with the chocolate creme brulee for dessert? Thanks Louisianne's for a warm inviting dinner--and for heating me up with enough cajun spice to temporarily make me forget how blustery it is outdoors! 
 Tops: Ambiance particularly on a cold winter night.  Wine list - well balanced and fairly priced.  Sitting at the bar listening to music - you could do it all night. Food: Good but can be a bit over-rich at times and it is not cheap. Desserts are uber. Service: For me it has always been good. 
 Not knock your socks off but good. Atmosphere in the downstairs dining room is nice quiet. A good place to go with friends and have a conversation.  I had the escargot which was good -- could have had a little more garlic. Red beans & rice was especially good. Salad was average. For out of towners staying at the \big box\ motels at the edge of town this place is way better than the chain restaurants around the motels and well worth the short walk into town (maybe not in winter). 
 I was really excited to come here and usually really like cajun food. What I got was a plate full of super-salty rice and beans. I couldn't finish it and left hungry. I'm hoping it was just a mistake. I'll give it another try one of these days. 
 I decided after much positive feedback from clients of mine(and a peek at my fellow yelpers reviews) to surprise my BF with dinner at Louisianne's for our third anniversary tonight. From the moment we walked in I was really charmed. It has this cavernous feel(in a good cozy romantic way--not a dank moldy creepy way) with nice lighting and just all around nice ambiance. Our waitress was good if a bit overzealous...and I loved the fact that she automatically brought me a small carafe of iced tea when she brought my filled glass. Nice. I'm a heavy(tea) drinker so this was great! I enjoyed my shrimp and corn chowder but I would have liked to have seen a bit more shrimp(but when is TOO MUCH shrimp ever possible). I also had roasted shrimp for my entree which were delicious! Nice spicy flavor with a ton of rosemary. I wasn't too impressed with the side of spinach and tomatoes however. The Cabernet reduction that they came DOUSED in was a bit too rich. I wish it had been more of a glaze than a heavy sauce. No matter I was too full to eat much of it anyhow. My boyfriend seemed surprised and delighted by the coffee roasted chicken with the orange-ricotta sauce( the bite I had was quite tasty). Also I love the fact that they have live jazz on the piano tues-sat nights starting at 6pm(although tonight he started more like 6:30). It was really nice. We said that we would definitely go another night for drinks and appetizers(which looked tempting) in the bar/lounge area with friends. 
 Louisianne's has seared it's place inside of my restaurant experience. The food is so good that every time my girlfriend and I consider going to any other restuarant we would have to consider the huge opportunity cost of not going to Louisianne's.The place is dungeon-esque but not in a bad way. It's dimly lit underground but often times has a pianist setting the New Orleans mood.The food is incredible. Every time we go there we try to get something different and we're floored by how good the meals are and how much of it you get. The appetizers were delicious (we've had the platter for two and the pulled pork crepes) the soup we've had with our entrees were amazing each time with an intense flavor.Their specials change every time we've been there and if they don't interest you their regular menu is always exceptional. We've had the roasted shrimp the tasso and shrimp fettucine the maple-cured duck the steak the seafood au gratin and each time not only did we get one delicious meal but enough to have an amazing lunch the next day.The only con I can give Louisianne's is that they give you so much good food that you can never get to the desserts. This restaurant is the one that my girlfriend and I benchmark all other restaurants by and before we go out to eat anywhere else we have to strongly consider the consequences of NOT going to Louisianne's. 
 My boyfriend and I went here on a whim one night.  I was totally underwhelmed.First of all the service was REEEEEALLY slow.  from the appetizer on down everything took forever to arrive.The lemon parmesan artichoke hearts were delicious!  the flavors were all perfect.  That was my favorite part of the meal.  My salad was good.  My boyfriend didn't like his soup so we traded.  The soup was just okay.I ordered the maple cured duck and I was surprised at how fatty and tough my duck was.  I really had a hard time eating it because the texture in my mouth made me kind of gag.  the veggies it came with were good and the flavor of the duck was good.  I'm not normally one to order duck and I really wished I didn't (I was torn about the coffee chicken.  I normally get chicken but it seemed like an odd combo of flavors). My boyfriend got the seafood au gratin which was much better.The best part was that I was so full on bread by the time my entree arrived that I didn't feel like so much of an ass asking for most of my meal to be put in a doggie bag.  I'd be willing to give this place another chance though. 
 Met some friends here for drinks at the bar which is shockingly small and not suited for groups larger than 4. The house wines are excellent. I got the lemon artichoke hearts - which were awful and overpriced. The bread crumbs were drenched in butter and had a greasy feel to them and the lemon was overpowering. The piano player didn't know any of the songs my friends or I requested - and we weren't making ridiculous requests - what piano player doesn't know Irving Berlin? It's a great place to sit and talk and drink wine AFTER you've eaten somewhere else. 
 All our friends had raved about the food & ambiance so my wife & I finally decided to try Louisianne's.  The decor is indeed cozy- like a nicely made-up cellar.  There was plenty of room at the bar so we sat there before our reservation time arrived.  Only two beers on tap but both good local brews from Capital. Eventually sat at our table & perused the menu.  Found many appetizers that sounded really good (including one of the specials that night) so we decided on sharing 2 apps and one entree... seemed like a good way to try a few items without getting too much food.App #1 (the special): gnocchi in a savory cream sauce with crawfish was very tasty.  Seemed a bit light in the gnocchi (I think there were 5 or 6) but made up for it in sauce.  Two thumbs way up.App #2: mussels in cream sauce... I had asked about the size of the mussels ahead of time and was told they were medium to large.  They were in fact medium to small which was a bit of a bummer because we probably would have gone with a different app had we known.  But the flavors were good & we enjoyed sopping up the sauce with the bread.  And the bread they serve is quite good.  Two thumbs up.Entree: Crawfish Etouffe... I was excited to try this as I hadn't had etouffe in years.  It wasn't bad but it wasn't great either.  If you went to a friend's house for dinner and they served this you'd be psyched but at an upscale Cajun restaurant for $20 you may be left underwhelmed.  Two thumbs halfway up.  The salad that came with was fresh mesclun greens with a bleu cheese dressing that was chunky but bland.Midway thru our meal the jazz combo started up and sounded really good- definitely added to the atmosphere.  For dessert we shared a slice of key lime pie... nice-tasting but no great shakes.  It seemed to be thickened with gelatin and I suppose I prefer mine to be creamier plus it was lacking in zing but only mildly.  Again if your friend served it you'd rightfully congratulate them but for $6.50 it should be REALLY good.Our server was very nice & professional.  Absolutely no complaints there.The nicest surprise came with the bill- only $70... and that included 5 drinks.We have concluded that the next time we go we'll sit in the bar area and have drinks & apps. 
 Crazy good food excellent wine list text book waitstaff. Best atmosphere for date night!  Not good for kids. Make a reservation!! 
 I don't care about \ambiance\ or \decor\ anymore.  I hit 40 and it doesn't matter to me anymore.I am more concerned about food.This food is awesome.Go it is incredible. 
 Good food I would call it New Orleans inspired rather then real creole cooking. That said I have never had bad service or bad food here. It is really nice setting for a date or dinner out. Not too spicy to scare the native Wisconsin's including my wife. 
 The raspberry vinaigrette salad dressing had actual raspberries in it. Ok. Just had to get that off my chest. The dressing surprised me and I'll go back for more than just that. We arrived on a Saturday night without a reservation.  I believe we took one of the last tables available until 9 or so. I would have opted for the bar if a table hadn't been available. There are a few high top tables that are seated in an area with live music.  The place is small and intimate. It's the perfect place for a first date. We started with the Lemon Parmesan Artichoke Hearts which were nothing like I expected but were rich and flavorful. We weren't terribly hungry so I ordered and appetizer for my entr\u00e9e and my boyfriend ordered the special. I tried the Crawfish Cheesecake which is basically a cheese ball in the shape of a piece of cheesecake. It was tasty and would make the perfect appetizer for a table of four but I wouldn't recommended as a main entr\u00e9e.The special was the highlight of the meal. I couldn't repeat it if my life depended on it but I heard the words: scallops shrimp and sweet potato  ravioli pecans lime something and zucchini... I forgot about the rest of the menu entirely.  I'm not doing the plate any justice with this but please trust me it was delicious. The vegetables were perfectly cooked with a lime (something slightly spicy but still let the veggies shine) sauce that complimented the sweet potato ravioli. Then there were scallops. It was one of those dishes that I couldn't comprehend. All I know is I am anxious to try more of what this chef has to offer. 
 Had a reservation at 7:15pm but when we arrived we were told we needed to wait 15 mins. That was annoying because that defeats the purpose of making a reservation. After that they found us a tiny table next to two large tables. The atmosphere was loud and cramped. The food however was great. I had the Bouillabaisse which felt like something from Louisiana because it had a thick earthy and spicy base. The seafood was fresh and it came with homemade fettuccine.  If the atmosphere had been better I would make myself a regular. 
 In case you don't know Louisianne's has started serving lunch The good news is that it is inexpensive and delicious. I had a cup of shrimp bisque that was outstanding and the grilled chicken po'boy tasted very fresh (the shredded romaine lettuce was much appreciated). The only bad news is the general ambience of the upstairs lunch area . . . rather dark and uninviting. 
 I've been to many restaurants in Middleton but this is by far my favorite and for a number of reasons. The food was excellent: I had a scallop and shrimp special. The service was excellent: Seated promptly waitress prompt professional and spoke very clearly when it came to the specials. The atmosphere is unique: In the basement of a building but you wouldn't think so when you're there. Piano player Great Martini! So when you're in Middleton I suggest you stop here! (And Marnie is correct on the raspberry vinaigrette dressing with actual raspberries in it!!) 
 Think upscale semi-authentic Luisiana with a romantic jazz overtone. The food is really quite great and I would never pass up the catfish. It was blackened and served with a sauce that was indescribable. For a starter I got the stuffed mushrooms with tasty craw fish filling. For desert... yeah that wasn't going to happen I was stuffed! The total bill for me was $37 which was reasonable considering the quality ambience and how friendly the service was.The only missing star was that we had trouble finding our server as we were trying to pay our bill (it had already been dropped off but then he was gone!) 
 Was visiting Madison for Epic Training last year and came here with some coworkers.AWESOME!! Everything I had was delicious. Tried escargot for the first time and it was wonderful. It was drenched in some savory buttery sauce and topped with a puff pastry...OMG. We also tried the crab puffs they were also delicious.Can't remember exactly what my entree was but it had bacon in it and was great too. The chocolate creme brulee was lovely.Back in Madison this week and will be going here tomorrow. 
 We met another couple here for dinner.  Love the ambiance the smell the courtesy of the staff.  It's all good.  But the food was especially excellent.  I ordered the Pecan Catfish.  Wow!!!  It was baked to perfection with darkened spices making it the perfect spiciness!!!  I loved it!  Veggies were fresh and crisp.  We had an excellent Pinot Grigio off the list.  The others ordered tenderloin cordon bleu which was raved about.  There was a shrimp and pork loins special.  That got thumbs up and then another shrimp dish that came on a bed of fresh spinach which I think she wished she had rice or pasta instead but she did like it.  Love coming here and always recommend it to friends! 
 Went again and it was AMAZING as usual. Went with a group of coworkers and we started out with escargot crab puffs and stuffed mushrooms...YUMFor the entree's I had some pork masterpiece that was a featured dish and it was divine. For dessert I believe I had the dark chocolate creme brulee again. It was another great experience! 
 If you like spicy drinks try the Cajun Martini. Lots of nice offerings in this cozy place but Cajun/Creole cuisine is their forte especially the seafood. Romantic subterranean dining room unlike anything else you'll find in Madison. Hard to believe you're in beautiful downtown Middleton. 
 if you're looking for a nice night out keep looking... 
 Be careful as you enter this place the steps are steep as you are going in the basement. Also the carpet on the steps is very dirty makes you wonder what the kitchen looks like. Four of us had dinner and overall the food is good. Service a little slow but very friendly. The place is cramped and the music was loud so it was difficult to have a conversation at the table. For the price of the meal you can do much better than this restaurant. 
 Awesome food. Definitely a good place to eat if it is your first time in Madison WI. 
 After hearing great reviews of Louisianne's my husband and I decided to give it a try.  We went for appetizers and drinks rather than a full meal.  We sat at the bar and had excellent service by the bartender.  When we first arrived it wasn't very crowded but after 10 minutes the bar was packed with people. The atmosphere was cozy and very welcoming with the live piano music.We had the \combination for 2\ (crab puffs barbecue shrimp and stuffed mushrooms) and an order of the mussels for a total of $20.  The mussels were filling since they are in a cream sauce and served with yummy bread.  The combination plate was also excellent.  We were pleasantly full and enjoyed a nice bottle of wine for around $55.  It is nice to see a high quality restaurant in Middleton!  We will definitely be back again! 
 My Experience at Louisianne's was JUST OK. I have heard a lot of people talk about this place so I gave it a try. I went on a Friday night by myself and Sat at the Bar. Not really the type of place you can sit at the bar.  It's very small there is no television and hardly any stools. They have live music on the weekends so the place was very loud. My Bartender was the only one behind the bar and the restaurant was pretty busy. So as you can imagine my service was slow. I had the crab puff pastry and BBQ Shrimp as an appetizer. The Crab Pastry was very good. The BBQ Shrimp however were not. I was surprised they left the shell on the shrimp when they serve it. For my main entree I had the Coffee Crusted Chicken and a half order of jambalaya. They wouldn't let me have jambalaya as a side so I had to order half a plate of it If i wanted to try it. The Chicken was very moist and flavorful.  A lot sweeter than I had anticipated but good. The jambalaya was very disappointing. Overall I would say it was just ok. 
 Best place in the world I cant endorse this shit enough. Best meal is as follows (although ive had other things here all good nothing touches this one)App: Crawfish cheesecake sounds weird but is best of Wisconsin and Louisiana at once. Cheese and crawfish. Done. Entree: Their special filet basically take everything that is great and put it on a filet. Nothing more to say. Goat cheese and sun dried tomatoes makes this.Desert: Chocolate creme brulee exactly as it sounds would choke a homeless person for this (wont be missed).Live music also sometimes. 
 The moment you walk in you are transported into another time and place. They had live music that fit the scene made the atmosphere and stayed background enough to have a conversation - check it out Tuesdays through Saturdays.Order the pecan catfish with the crawfish BBQ on top aka \Maria's special\. It sounds wacky but the pecans really go with the blackened catfish. The tasso and shrimp fettuccine - a combination of shrimp smoked ham and mustard cream sauce sounds like a questionable combination but it is soothing hot soul food at its fanciest. Everything we ate had depth richness and finesse. If you are a soup snob definitely get the soup over the salad option. Presentation was lacking but I don't think that's the point of soul food.  Service is sassy but whole-hearted. We walked in without reservations at 7pm on a Friday and when we asked if we could sit at the bar we were told \yeah if you can find seats\.  We found a couple stools and ordered dinner at the bar. It isn't bend over backwards service but they are real people and sometimes that's better. Maria our bartender who's worked there 13 years gave excellent food and drink recs and was really attentive despite the rush - she basically made our night. It's a great place to bring guests if you want to head off to a chill and unexpected place. Even better if you're prepared to stuff your faces with well-executed comfort food. Try the Sazerac if you want a stiff sweet drink and the Hurricane if you want a fruity refreshing beverage that punches like a Long Island. The crowd here is mature and casually well-dressed. 
 We had a wonderful experience at Louisianne's. We had reservations for dinner but happened to be seated next to a rather loud group of men. Since the restaurant was completely full we asked if we might be able to be seated in the bar area instead (which was much quieter). They quickly accomodated our request and we had an enjoyable conversation throughout dinner. The food was excellent and a musician softly played piano in the background. The service was prompt helpful and friendly. Terrific night out! 
 Quiet quaint and awesome. The place is tucked away and underground. Piano man in the bar area playing jazz and lounge tunes. Had escargot wine and barracuda. At how many other places can you say you have all of those at once AND underground. Zero! This place is good. Priced well for what you get too. Couldn't finish it all. 
 Good food but not authentic and quite overpriced. $38 for 1 entree and 1 dessert served by a snotty teenager? Really? 
 Wow!  What a find!  Outside of the worn carpet on the stairs on the way down this place is pretty awesome.  Very quaint very very quaint as you are literally underground.  I loved the feel of the place and the atmosphere.  The food did not disappointment either.  The escargot were absolutely perfect perfect one of the best I have yet to have and I have had them in many different place.  For my entree I went with the Crayfish etoufee and I am glad I did.  Excellent roux plenty of crayfish perfectly cooked rice.  Excellent overall.  I would give it 5 starts but the dessert menu is very very pedestrian and not inspired.  Would go back again though and again. 
 Emeril Lagasse would have been disappointed. There was no Bam! during our visit to Louisianne's on 9/10/13.The good: my wife's company the wine list the evening's piano player the salad and the crawfish corn chowder.The bad: the thick yellow and salty cream sauce our mussels swam in and the worn out carpet on the stairs leading down to the restaurant.The ugly:  The not so special blackened swordfish entr\u00e9e with salty sides and the shrimp etouffee.  The classic Cajun dish was a generous amount of white rice with salty ketchup sauce.  :-( 
 Steps are a bit hard for us oldies but the food made up for it. Three of us our son has been there before thought mom and dad  should too..Started with mussels and crab puffs both were so good we went through  three baskets of bread with them. The raspberry dressing on salad was a bit tart my only complaint and one had soup.I had the duck  which was super good one had the seafood au gratin and one etouffee...we were all pleased and all took home left overs.........We split a piece of the peanut butter pie...and one had coffee..we had a fun time drove 70 miles to get there. 
 We enjoyed our visit to this restaurant however the waitress makes or breaks the evening.  More on that later.We started at the bar and the bar tender was super cool.  He made a fantastic Sazerac one of the oldest cocktails in the USA.  The four of us admired the decor of the establishment in addition to the fun columns throughout that separated the patrons making it a more private experience.  This place is in a basement  and the columns separate everyone different than all the open air structures these days.We had reservations and were seated about 10 minutes late however we were flexible.  The waitress was not very friendly and did not smile.  She was making the motions.  Likely tired because it was Badger Homecoming Saturday and they were busy.  We were celebrating a birthday and asked if they did anything special.  She said I don't know and can check.  When she came back she said if you buy a desert we can put a candle in it.  What??  What restaurant does not do something for a birthday.  Oh well move on...Each of us DID enjoy our meal.  We had the Crawfish Cheesecake for appetizer.  It was like a cheesecake?  Different and good.  Two of us ordered separate specials and the other two ordered items off the menu.  None of us could finish and we enjoyed leftovers the next day.  The food was rich and heavy comfort food like.  If you are on a diet you'd need to be selective because no calories are spared here.In summary a happy waitress and a little birthday treat and this place would be through the roof! 
 Fun warm lively catacomb place often with piano music. Food is always really good. I want to hang out here more. 
 I've brought business contacts and executives from my firm to Louisiannes'.  Always they have been impressed with the quality of the food the ambiance of the facility and the attentiveness of the staff.  It compares well with top quality restaurants all over the world. 
 Dined here recently with friends and had an enjoyable experience but not so great food. The pros:  Inviting and cozy atmosphere. Really friendly and attentive service. Excellent live music. Great cocktails ok wine list.The cons:The food was boring and inconsistent.  We had the artichoke hearts crab puffs and escargots for appetizers.  I didn't get the sense that the seafood was fresh.  Rather it was definitely of the frozen variety.  And everything was made with frozen puff pastry.  Even the escargot were covered with puff pastry. I think it was to cover for the frozen seafood?  Anyway the appetizers reminded me of Pinterest recipes.  A big red flag for me is when there are too many components in a dish.  That usually means that the ingredients aren't good enough to stand out on their own or the chef doesn't know how to edit.  I think we experienced a little of both.  My husband and I both got the special. It was a blackened pork tenderloin with shrimp accompanied by mushrooms in a sherry sauce with red potatoes.  Each component sounded good.  However the presentation and preparation was a train wreck.  The tenderloin came on skewers.  What?  The shrimp were over cooked.  The meat and shrimp were served in a jumble of quartered red potatoes and mushrooms.  Everything was covered in some sort of Cajun seasoning that was reminiscent of Durkee or McCormick.  Then it was all topped with some sort of cornstarch thickened sherry sauce.  The whole thing tasted like it was straight off the Sysco truck  and reheated. One of our companions ordered the filet.  She let us have a taste and the steak was good.  But it came with a buerre blanc dipping sauce.  I'm not sure what chef would pair buerre blanc with steak to begin with but just like my meal it was clear that the buerre blanc was another corn starch imposter.  Dessert was a dark chocolate creme br\u00fbl\u00e9e.  It was dry and pedestrian.  Really I think this place deserves 2.5 stars but Yelp doesn't do half stars so I'll be generous.  Lousiannes clearly has a loyal customer base and is a popular place.  I would definitely go back for the cocktails and even the appetizers because the price point wasn't outrageous for all the puff pastry and I could still enjoy them now that I know what to expect.  But I would not return for dinner.  If I'm going to spend $30 for an entree I expect fresh ingredients sauces made to order and a chef that knows how to cook.  Madison has too many restaurants that offer far superior food to Lousiannes and that's what will drive my future dining decisions. 
 Just ok because my bar for New Orleans food is quite insurmountable!  But I give honest reviews.  Whoever is in the kitchen can season food like nobody's business!  It is great food.  Seafood was not fresh though and they really do not have Bread Pudding on the menu!  That tells me that the chef is not from Louisiana at all.  Prices are too high way to high!  Jambalaya for $20!  Ridiculous really.  A pot of that for 10 people cost $20.   But if you want great atmosphere and good food that is just seasoned well go.  Drinks are reasonable and service is fantastic. 
 We went here for my sister in law's birthday. I was anxious because my last time here was so unappealing but this time was a whole different story! We ordered four appetizers to split and all of them were delicious. I had a steak which was cooked to perfection. The service was excellent. The wine they recommended was delicious. We split several desserts and they were delicious as well. I'm still on the fence about the place but our last time there was good enough that I will give it another chance to make my final decision. 
 My husband and I went to Louisianne's recently after we sold our condo and got a Middleton Chamber of Commerce gift certificate from our real estate agent (Leslie Blum she's great!).We wanted to use the opportunity to have a special date night and go somewhere a bit more upscale than we usually do. Having never been to Louisianne's in the 5 years that I've lived in Middleton I suggested we try it out.I give the atmosphere of this place a solid five stars. Although it has an rather bland looking storefront the inside of the restaurant is anything but. You walk into Louisianne's and immediately head downstairs. It's all stone and looks like you're walking into a cool cave or something. It's dark but there's a lot of ambiance. I've been to New Orleans and it definitely has that sort of vibe to it. It's romantic fun and not what you'd expect from the outside. I felt like we were on vacation while we were there. Also there was a live jazz band playing and they were really rocking. It was awesome!We went at about 8pm on a Friday night had to wait about ten minutes for a table which was fine. While we waited we ordered drinks at the bar and watched the band. I had red wine and my husband had Jameson on the rocks. We were seated and ordered the Pecan Crab Cakes as an appetizer. They were good probably just 3 stars though as they tasted a lot like other Midwestern crab cakes that I've had before. They were heavy on bread and light on crab...with a lot of Old Bay seasoning. Again they weren't bad at all but not spectacular.Next we ordered some more wine and our entrees (more on those in a minute).  We were given a choice of soup or salad with our entrees and we each ordered soup. They had two soups of the day: a shrimp -corn chowder (which I got) and a tomato-based pulled pork stew that was like chilli (which my husband had). Both soups were fantastic! Definitely 5 stars for the soup. I'll take a minute here to comment that I enjoy going to traditional restaurants from time to time places where soup/salad and bread are included with your meal instead of everything being ala-cart. (It reminds me of dining in Wisconsin supper clubs as a child). By the way the bread basket was delicious and was quickly replenished by the waitress after we ate all of the bread within 30 seconds of sitting down because it was warm and toasty (and served with soft butter) and we were starving! Onto the entrees! My husband absolutely LOVED his dish. He claims that it was possibly \the best thing I've ever had in a restaurant\. He chose the Coffee Roasted Chicken which featured a bed of (homemade) fettuccine topped with a coffee-crusted bone-in grilled chicken breast in a \hazelnut orange ricotta sauce\. I think there was spinach in it too. The pasta was perfectly al dente the grilled chicken moist and the sauce was rich and creamy. It almost reminded me of a Thai peanut sauce but with hazelnuts instead. Although it sounded like something that could become cloyingly sweet it was not. It had a nice subtle umami essence in addition to the sweetness. Delicious. 5 stars.The reason that Louisianne's is not getting a five star review from me however is due to my entree which I felt was very underwhelming. We don't eat pasta at home for health reasons so I usually get it when we go somewhere nice as a special treat. I chose the tasso and shrimp fettuccine because it was homemade pasta and because it featured authentic New Orleans style ingredients (for the unfamiliar tasso is basically spicy ham). The shrimp and tasso pieces in my pasta were well-cooked but they were sparse. The dish also featured mushrooms and they were fabulous...probably the best part. However the pasta was supposed to have a \Creole mustard cream sauce\ and it didn't really. The sauce was very light and had little flavor. It was kind of sad because I was really hoping to be wowed and I wasn't. I'd say my item was probably 3 stars and would have been awesome if only the sauce had been a bit more pronounced and flavorful. The service was adequate. Nothing remarkable in either a good or a bad way.Summary: I'd definitely return. I think Lousianne's Etc. is a decently nice restaurant overall and is great for special occasions. Their primary issue from both my own experience as well as the reviews on Yelp seems to be consistency. Some menu items are fabulous and others are meh. The major problem with this is that Louisianne's  menu is at a price point where people only go occasionally...so the restaurant basically has one shot to impress and if they fail at that guests won't return for a second chance. I think this explains why the Yelp reviews for Louisianne's are so polarized. 
 Came here based upon Yelp reviews. I was expecting a dive place like all the other cajun places I've been to but that's not this place. Dark mood lighting in the basement of an old house. Small menu and very pricey. Not what I was expecting at all. I ordered the blackened catfish and a beer. The catfish and the jambalaya  were the two least expensive entrees in the low $20's per each. Pleasantly surprised by the large portion of grilled vegies and handmade mashed potatoes that came with the catfish. Amazing flavor and worth the money. The menu didn't mention the sides included. Friend ordered the jambalaya and let me try it. The blackened catfish was way better. 
 I love this place.  I love the ambiance the food and the drinks.  It's even better when they have a lounge singer in the background. 
 This is the first Marriott I have ever been a little disappointed in.  I thought initially it was going to be an amazing hotel since I totally screwed up on the reservation (made it for the wrong day) and the girl at the desk was so cool to work with me and get me a room when the whole place was fully booked.  Except the place was fully booked for the \Little Miss Junior Miss\ Pageant or some other stupid name like that which meant HELL for Andy and I as the entire place was infested with pre-teen beauty queens their scary domineering mothers and other random siblings that came along for the ride.  Can you say O. M. G.  Now normally this would be a non-issue as we are rarely in our hotel room except to sleep and once in the room you couldnt hear a lot of hallway noise.  But this 10 story hotel had a grand total of 2 elevators which were packed at all hours of the day with girls in gowns and tiaras groups of girls in heavy makeup or wet children dripping from the hotel pool. This made getting in and out a bit challenging since we were on the top floor. I realize this is hardly Marriotts fault that the Junior Misses had descended upon Middleton since they are just trying to turn a buck in this economy but the design of this place was not user friendly in the slightest.  Also hey brilliant idea guys put the pool across the hall from the elevator and then make that whole area tile so people track water out and the floor is slippery!  Nice.  And also understaff the dining area so noone can get in and eat because there is noone to clean off the tables and take your order.  Nice planning!Man that whole experience left a bad taste.  The worst part will be trying to convince Andy to stay at a Marriott ever again as he is just now getting relief from the migrane he got on Saturday. 
 Had an okay stay here at this Marriott (which looks to have been an Embassy Suites at one time judging by the interior).  I was traveling on business and appreciated the quiet rooms and very comfy bed.  Some of the interior could use some updates especially in the bathroom.  One major annoyance was that the blackout drapes were for decoration only and couldn't be closed all the way to make the room dark.  What a pain!!Other than that friendly staff and mediocre breakfast in the morning.  There really isn't anything around of note (all chain restaurants and office buildings) so I think on my next trip I'll drive a little extra to stay in Madison and bypass Middleton! 
 My boyfriend and I Pricelined a room for our anniversary trip this weekend. We were super excited to get a \3.5star plus\ hotel for a really good deal. It's too bad there were so many things that worked against making this a truly awesome hotel: - The fact that there is no carpet between the pool and the elevators so the floor is often dangerously wet. - The fact that the bathroom door opened onto the toilet - you had to sidestep it in order to close the door. - The fact that the night desk clerk when counting the register set the cash tray on the counter nearest the customers. It would have been an easy quick jaunt out the front door with it.- The 20min it took to get extra towels- The empty ice bin in the vending area- The desk clerk who came out to talk to customers while still chewing foodBy far the worst offense was the fact that check-out time was noon yet housekeeping tried to enter our room at EIGHT IN THE MORNING. I can't imagine it's that hard to find out which rooms are ready for cleaning and which are not. The only real pro was the bedding which was luxe and fluffy. Not even close to being worth the $2800 they sell it for but fun for a night. The room ended up being cheap for the name-brand but more satisfaction could have been found from a lesser-name place. Lesson learned for next time. 
 I got my room off priceline for 75 so i was happy with the price. I would not pay the 150 the hotel was asking for. The room was clean and pretty big. The toliet wouldnt flush but after stopping by the front desk it was taken care of. No free breakfast so we didnt eat at the hotel. We didn't use the pool so nothing to say about that. I do agree with the other reviews that the design of the building is not good. There was a wedding going on the one night and it was pretty loud late into the evening. Good location right off the highway. We were into madison in 10 miuntes. 
 Although most of the workers were very pleasant the customer service by one female during check-in as well as another at the breakfast buffet was so unprofessional that I will not be a patron at this location again. After complaining of the rude service for which we were given the excuse of a busy weekend we asked to be connected with management who never followed up. Unacceptable! 
 I can't stand to sit here and read these horrible reviews. When my son was receiving treatments for spine/ brain cancer at UW Hospital we did not  have many choices at that time of where to stay during and between treatments. My son would become so ill from all the radiation plus chemo and the radiation treatments were at two 6 hour intervals every day So we couldn't venture far most days.Altho we had spent time at the Ronald McDoanld house after a time I needed to make my son feel less a patient and more like a celebrity for a day. So I decided to take a paycheck and chose a day between visits to get a suite at the Marriott West. Altho my son had to use a mobile IV unit and was scarred on his  head from radiation burns this Marriott was most accomodating and incredible.We had a gorgeous suite exquistie room service and gracious attentions.These attentions were NOT triggered by my sons illness but sincerely born from true proffesionalism and great training. This is a beautiful establishment and I personally cannot stand the voices of spoiled whiners on these previous reviews. This Marriott will hold dear to me always and is worthy of your travel time relaxing time and most of all your needs no matter to what extent.Stop being so ridiculously spoiled and realize. This Marriott is above average. 
 Was here for a gala at the adjoining conference center.  Service was terrible. The waitress kept slamming food and drinks on the  table. She only brought dinner for half the table and the rest had to wait for 15 minutes. One of the guests had to wait about 20 minutes for the meal. Horrible!I've been to many Marriotts before and hold a frequent visitor card but this one has been the worst experience so far.I know this isn't a review that completely reflects the hotel or any restaurants inside it but the fact that this service was under the Marriott name prompted this review and rating 
 Before I booked here i was about to stay at a crappy hotel off the highway that look like it was about to fall apart. I just happen to browse online on priceline and got this place book. I was already happy at this point that I am staying at a Marriott because I have always had great experiences at all the Marriotts across the country but what happens next makes me love this location even more. I am extremly happy I didnt let some of the previous reviews deter me from booking here. When i arrived my check in process was easy the front desk was friendly and I was able to check in early (which I was on a 16 hour drive cross country so i was ready to rest). My room was clean the bathroom is immaculate and it had everything i needed. Even the smallest things such as hair dryer ethernet wire and the ginger orange smell hair products made this stay VERY pleasant. I wanted to bring my work computer up to my room and the front desk gentleman was very helpful in assisting me with all my questions and helping with the cart so i can take it upstairs. When I travel I dont expect hotel staff to wait on my hand and feet and I am not a needy guest as long as they are professional and willing to help when i ask for it I am satisfied with my stay. I asked for a different coffee maker since it wasnt working and they brought me another right to my room within a few minutes thats what i call attentive and prompt service. All in all I highly recommend this Marriottt. 
 Booked the room on Priceline for our anniversary getaway.  2 days before we were to leave I called to check on the reservation.  I was transferred to the hands down single most rude man in customer service.  He told me to call back when there were not kids in the background and when I had my reservation number because he didn't want to look it up by last name.  I called the hotel and asked to speak to a manager.  She was wonderful and apologized and I felt better about staying there knowing that not everyone was as rude as that man.We checked in and the man at the desk wished us a happy anniversary and informed us that we would be staying in the honeymoon sweet and had access to the concierge floor and snacks were being served.  Every time we saw him that night he asked if there was anything that he could do to make our stay better.  What a surprise and proof that good customer service does exist!  The bedding was very nice and the housekeeping staff was always so nice.We had a wonderful time and we will stay there again! 
 I stay here for several days every year for a conference that's held in this hotel. I've always had decent service here and the rooms are average size but clean! My only wish is that they had rooms with kitchenettes! For economical reasons I like to keep food in the room and it's frustrating staying somewhere all week and having to have the front desk microwave your left-overs for you. They did however move a mini-fridge into my room at my request which was nice. Also really great restaurants in the area which I have been very pleased with! 
 If you've ever wondered what it would be like to attempt to sleep on the infield of the Indy 500 while the race is in progress and you don't care to spend the money on race tickets just book a room at this hotel.The property is immediately I mean immediately adjacent to the infamous \Beltline\ highway and the sound attenuating properties of the windows are non-existent. I thought the heavy curtains that frame the sheer might help to reduce the mind numbing highway noise.  But guess what they're decorative only and can't be closed.I spent $65/night through Price Line and that was about $50 too much.A few annoyances in addition to the brain gelatinizing cacophony:1) What the hell is with the 30 lbs. down duvets that these hotels seem to think add a half star to their rating?  They're excessively hot on all but the coldest nights they weigh a freaking ton and when they end up on the floor (as is always my deal) you have nothing left but the thread bare pallid dirty sheet. Which isn't enough.2) Setting the alarm clock requires an advanced degree in electrical engineering.  Seriously you really expect people to use these pieces of junk? Which leads me to annoyance number 3:3) When I tried to use the dirty circa 1981 phone to set my wake up call and I successively pressed all four of the \At your service\ buttons I got nothing.  I messed around with the phone for 15 minutes before I finally reached a guy working in the bar (I could never hope to duplicate this feat).  He was kind enough to transfer me to the front desk.4) I was going to use the in-room coffee maker but it had been filled at some point with sour smelling water.  On my worst day of caffiene deprivation I wouldn't have used that disgusting and antiquated little machine.A flat screen TV and a weighty down (or down substitute as it where) duvet do not make a 3.5 star hotel! This place needs a major capital infusion.  Thank you for your time. 
 I don't think I've been to a dirtier Marriott. I've been here for three days so far and i don't think the cafe in the lobby has been vacuumed once as I've monitored the pile of crumbs underneath the tables and am finding more crumbs (and wrappers and chicken wing bones) each night. My room was dirty (including large stains on the bedskirt and chair) upon arrival and since I was here for a week for business I decided not to look around my room too much to save myself from being completely grossed out. Some of the shuttle drivers think they're Indy 500 drivers swerving around corners so fast that everyone grips the sides of the vehicle. Our driver also asked two people to share one seat in the van never mind the rules about seatbelts.  Also if you come in the evening hours and want to eat at the bar expect to wait no less than 1 hour for your food. 
 Stained sheets hair and food byproduct on nightstand When we got our replacement sheets there was no offer to change them as they were thrust into our hands. Burned out lightbulbs and towels that look like what I use to dry off the dog. 
 Great rooms great rates. I've stayed in Middleton before but this location can't be beat. They have a shuttle that will even take u to the convenience store. Spacious clean an very friendly staff. 
 Service was great including providing a local 3-mile and 5-mile running maps  Breakfast was excellent. We will be back. 
 Bedding was stained on pillow and comforter.  Asked front desk to have this changed upon leaving for dinner.  After arriving back at the hotel bedding had not been changed.  Called front desk and was told that housekeeping was gone for the night.  At check-out I mentioned the issue and was simply verbally told \Sorry.\Not acceptable.  My 2nd Mariott stay this year and I am not giving up my Priority Club Platinum membership to ever try Mariotts again. 
 Stayed at this Marriott while I was attending some training sessions at Epic. The hotel has everything a modern hotel would have. The rooms and decor a bit dated but that maybe because it's Wisconsin???The rooms are good sized. The King single had a king bed a 32\ LCD TV ipod charging alarm clock but a really small bathroom. I did have troubles with the heating during my stay here. It took the engineers two days just to get some heat into the room and they continuously had to check on it while I was out during the day. There is a breakfast buffet in the morning (not complimentary) and this is where you can have lunch/dinner or enjoy a drink at the bar. The bar had a good selection of local Wisconsin beers as well as your typical domestics. Bar tenders were super friendly and made the stay a little more enjoyable.If you're a Marriott Reward member be sure to have them add your access to the concierge lounge. Here they have free continental breakfast snacks during the day and a light meal at night. They have some type of honor system bar too in the evening. Also in the concierge lounge you can use their computers for Internet browsing. 
 Would recommend this hotel. Beds are comfy rooms are nice and clean staff is very accommodating and goes above & beyond what's expected. We loved Tomeka at the front desk :) 
 The room was fine obviously outdated but it looks as though they are upgrading currently. The food on the other hand was overpriced and gross. Do yourself a favor and do not order room service. It looked as though it was prepared at a truck stop nuked and then brought up to my room. I complained they said sorry and that was it. No new food no help from the front desk and still charged me for it. Platinum member service my butt. 
 Overall experience was good. Not fantastic just good. We were a large group and had some special requests that were handled (somewhat) well. Many hiccups later we had a successful stay. This hotel is pet friendly which was GREAT! The facility was clean and overall very accommodating. I was very impressed on the staffs professionalism and calm attitude when I brought some problems to their attention. They ultimately won my good review by extending our check-out (letting our dogs shack up) while we attended the sporting event we came to enjoy. 
 This is the second time I stayed here with my b/f.  This time I was less impressed.  The staff as usual was fantastic.  They always are as helpful and as kind as ever.  Great job to you guys!  This is a business hotel so it's generally empty on the weekends which is nice.  We had a king room on the 10th (top) floor.  Room was large enough.  Clean.  But the heater was LOUD.  Squeaky.  So we messed with it... nada.  So we changed rooms not a big deal.  We went right next door.  That room was the same as the last.  Downsides to this room though the phone was dirty... I knew this cause the phone was tan/beige colored.  It was yucky.  Also the tub liner in the first room was filthy.  Another thing I wish this hotel would change is installing fans in the bathrooms!  My boyfriend also pointed out that the sheets on the bed were super starched.   If you moved it sounded like sandpaper on sandpaper.  Madness.  I did have a odd triangle shaped hole in the sheets on my side of the bed...so that was less than plesant too.  Oh also the hot tub was down for maintence when we were there :( Bummer.  But the pool was open and no one was in it.  They also have a stellar gym.  To recap:PROS:Great StaffGreat locationLarge RoomsNice TVGreat GymHas a pool/hot tubCONS:Outdated BathroomOutdated/Dirty PhonesOver Startched Bed Linens (both rooms had the same issues) 
 Stayed here  on 4/7 prior to a business meeting.  It had many of the usual Marriott niceties but no Starbucks or availability of coffee that was any better than Folgers or Yuban.  Maybe it's a Wisconsin thing but I thought that nearly every Marriott had reliable dark roasted coffee.  The room was OK except that they put me in a second floor room that had windows which started at about 5 feet above the floor and the only view was of air conditioning/heating units and I am a lifetime Platinum.  I am not sure if the desk clerk felt it made little difference or what but this is not a crown jewel by any means.  I understand that this place was a Holiday Inn previously but usually hotels converted to the Marriott brand are better than this one was. 
 I would imagine things would be different if I stayed here when they did not have a convention in town but I did!Checked in to a room on the 6th floor (out of 10).  I had pounding and banging all round me due to remodeling.  They did finish by late afternoon but the hallways were full of beds and other room furniture.  Besides being unsightly that wasn't a big deal.  My problems started at night  and the next morning.   When the meeting in one of the ballrooms ended apparently most of the people didn't have enough!  Because of the set up of he hotel every room in the hotel faces the bar.  Even though the bar is on the ground floor the noise funnels up and it becomes a big echo chamber!  Noise continued until about 1am.  I'm not sure if I was pissed because I couldn't sleep or if I was just jealous that I sounded like they were having a lot of fun!The next morning was a JOKE!  Trying to leave wad impossible.  Why they would build a hotel with 10 floors and only 2 elevators is beyond me!  With people checking out going to breakfast or just moving around it was Impossible to get on an elevator unless you were on the top 2 floors.  People were lined up on every floor trying to get somewhere.  The smart people started getting on using the \up\ button and just going for a ride.  I finally have up and lugged my bags down six floors of stairs. What I found has a huge line of others doing the same.  I felt like a refugee!!!  Some women a head of me were having troubles because they had multiple bags.  Eventually one of them fell.... I wasn't pretty.  I found that this hotel looked nice had a nice pool.  But I would never stay here on a weekend or when it was busy ever again!  They need to find a away to build another elevator and bite the bullet and shut the bar down much earlier or move it into one of the ballrooms. 
 ***This Marriott definitely feels dated and it is not in Downtown Madison; it is a comfortable enough hotel service is good and room rates are reasonable; however the hotel has kind of a depressing look and feel to it; it needs an update***This Marriott kind of feels like an airport hotel.  Airport hotels tend to be very outdated and there is typically little incentive to do a renovation because the hotel has a steady stream of customers due to its proximity to the airport and convenience of airport shuttle transportation.  This Marriott has a similar look as the Philadelphia Airport Renaissance.  Both hotels feature an open atrium that goes up 9 to 12 levels high.  You do get a nice look onto the open atrium as you ascend on the quick glass elevators at this property.Unfortunately this hotel is very out-of-date.  The lobby and cafe looks like something from the early to mid-80s.  The rooms are a little more contemporary though parts very dated; at the kitchenette sink there was a bottom cabinet that may have been a dishwasher at one time; instead it was empty with lots of dust and exposed piping (not nice to find at any hotel).The breakfast buffet did not inspire freshness either.  The food quality was not horrible but a lot of the food was quite salty.  Food options included bacon sausage breakfast potatoes scrambled eggs smoked salmon continental breakfast options and an omelet bar.  In addition the poor lighting in the lobby and throughout the hotel made the food and other stuff maybe feel worse than they actually were.This Marriott is still a comfortable place to stay and has good customer service.  The rooms are comfortable with good beds and linen.  The room temperature was fine though the unit did not seem to consistently keep the room cool.  The shower was fine.This Marriott has many suites so you have a good shot of getting upgraded if you are a Marriott Rewards Gold or Platinum member.  The suites are spacious and the bedroom is separated from the living room area with a door.  Their suites are outfitted with a mini fridge kitchen sink (as mentioned) and a microwave.On weekends Marriott Rewards Gold and Platinum members get an offer of full breakfast buffet for two per Saturday and Sunday or 750 Marriott Rewards points per Saturday and Sunday.  This is a new nationwide Marriott benefit for Marriott Rewards Gold and Platinum members and the hotel is only obligated to offer a continental breakfast.  I have been to a few properties (Santa Clara Marriott Minneapolis Marriott City Center) that are only doing the bare minimum--continental breakfast--so this Marriott is definitely going above and beyond in this area (though the quality of the full breakfast buffet as already mentioned was not that great).The front desk was nice and helpful.Room rates are good but this hotel is not in Downtown Madison.  It is only a 7 to 10 minute drive to Madison though.  However I am not sure if getting to Downtown Madison on a Wisconsin football game day is challenging.This Marriott would not be a good property for a long stay.  This hotel just does not feel fresh enough.  It is a comfortable enough spot for a short stay though due to their comfortable rooms and good service.  If you are a Marriott Rewards Gold or Platinum member they do treat you well here and maybe even better than some Marriott properties.This Marriott has its own free parking lot.  It is easy finding an open space. 
 I. Like. This. Hotel. If no shuttle is available to pick you up from the airport they pay for your cab. The front desk staff is quick and attentive which is exactly what you want after a day of air travel. Room service was very friendly and the food was YUM. The toilet handle was misbehaving and while it took some time for engineering to fix it they were beyond apologetic and did all of the things you'd expect a good hotel to do - either offer a room change/upgrade or other free stuff. The hotel is in Middleton so don't book a room here and then complain that it's not downtown. Look at a map. How is it the hotel's fault that you are in need of additional IQ points? So many Yelpers like to complain about every dumb little thing without understanding that it's not about perfection it's about how a business responds to a problem. This Marriott is not as modern as some others but I'd pick a clean room and good service over some spiffy wallpaper and Berber carpet any day. 
 I was torn on how to rank this. There is part of me that wants to go a little lower but the management on a couple occasions and the general kindness of the concierge lounge attendants made up an extra star. This Marriott is about the level of a nicer Courtyard Marriott. The ONLY way our stay was bearable was because we were upgraded to suite. If we had not had the door to separate our bedroom from living space we would have been unable to rest with all of the noise coming up from the atrium..and we were on the 9th floor. A cocktail reception on a Tuesday night in the vast open space of the lobby was incredibly loud but no problem due to our suite.   However a gathering of incredibly loud rude teenagers whose director used a BULLHORN at 9pm at night to address the entire hotel of teenagers was the last straw for us. We had a two week reservation...we left 5 nights in.  Additional issues with this property: the concierge lounge is very very limited. Every other Marriott (including most Courtyards) have coffee and tea in the lounge throughout the day not to mention during the cocktail/dessert hours. At this one there is none during the day and most frustrating in the evening you have to ask the concierge to provide you with a cup of coffee or hot water. Not at all convenient for a business traveller who takes calls in the lounge. Plus the coffee is not high quality. The attendants were very kind but just not a well executed lounge in comparison to other properties.I also want to thank the management who alerted housekeeping when we were leaving in the morning to service our room for the last couple days we were there. Prior to that the room was not being serviced until about 2:30pm which is our daughters naptime and she was along with us on this trip. It was a little frustrating.  As for the ACTUAL service it was hit or miss. One day was great replenished our towels toiletries took out the trash. Another time our daughters blankets were thrown into a ball in the corner of the bedroom zero toiletries replenished and two of her toys that were drying in the bathroom were thrown away. A call for extra towels went without towels ever materializing one night.  Also the in-room fridge does not fully work and our hummus juices and other snacks were spoiled. I get that this is the area's biggest conference center so maintaining business is not a problem for them. However for those of us who travel frequently and experience many Marriott properties this one does not come up to scratch but again the friendly demeanor of most employees we encountered did help the spotty service of this hotel. 
 I was there for the Wisconsin Bar.  So you can just imagine how tense all things were.  The staff was really friendly and understanding of hundreds of law grads flooding their venue.  The Falling Water restaurant is a convenient locale and located in the lobby.  If I had no vehicle I would eat there and be okay with it.  I ordered a sandwich for lunch and it was a bit \buttery.\  I do like that you can order your food ahead of time and have it ready at a particular time.  The rooms are very typical.  Nothing outstanding but it is nice to have a window to look at something besides a brick wall.  You get a parking lot view but you get motion.  The banquet rooms were gorgeous.  The hotel is nicely decorated.  It even has a small waterfall hiding the elevators.  I was annoyed by the parking situation.  It is downhill.  Not a huge hill but enough to make the walk precarious during these icy times.  Perhaps a little more salt could be expended for visitors.  The location is nice as it is near restaurant and a mall.  Forget something at home?  There is even a costco within ten minutes driving.  It is about 1/4 mile off the beltline and just outside of Madison (by one highway exit).  If you want to stay in Madison but avoid the high prices of downtown and the congestion of rush hour this is the place to be. 
 This review of the Madison Marriott West focuses on the group event services of this facility and not the guest rooms.  I recently attended an evening Board meeting and a one-day conference at this hotel.The majority of the sales and catering staff at the Marriott were wonderful to work with.  This was the first time we hosted at event at this location.  The responsiveness of the staff was superb in setting up the event.  There were proactive in keeping our group on track with logistical issues leading up to the event.  On the day of the event they checked in on us frequently and promptly addressed any concerns our group had.We had some problems with the reservations agents indicating that no rooms were available at the conference rate.  The other problem has to do with the layout of the conference rooms.  There is one conference room (the Monona Room) located by the front desk far away from all the other meeting rooms.  On the day before the event you guessed it; the Marriott staff moved us to that room.  The calendar of events is not conspicuous so on the day of the event all the conference attended entered the facility through the conference center doors and wandered about searching for the Monona Room.Like most conference facility the food was a mixed bag.Things I liked:* I enjoyed the caesar salad served with lunch with fresh greens (no iceberg lettuce) tangy dressing and herbed croutons that did not go overboard with the salt or garlic.* Other than the overcooked noodles the penne pasta with mushroom spinach goat cheese pine nuts and roasted red pepper cream was a well-executed dish.* While the filling had a bit too much citrus flavor kudos to the kitchen staff for serving us a cannoli with a crunchy shell a rarity on the conference food circuit.Things I didn't:* The rigatoni with fennel sausage roasted peppers and arriabiatta sauce lacked the finesse of the aforementioned penne pasta dish.  With its mushy noodles overcooked sauce and under-seasoned sausage there was little to like.* If you enjoy a heavy does of garlic powder on bread with the texture of a teething biscuit you would love the garlic bread served with the pasta course.* My least favorite dish was toasted cheese sandwich served during the planning session the day before the conference.  For $14.95 I expected aged cheddar served on gently grilled slices of artisan sourdough bread.  What I received was very different.  Served barely warm the bread was soaked in butter and toasted to a brick-like texture that left cuts on the roof of my mouth.  The institutional grade cheddar and provolone cheese had started to congeal by the time the staff served it to me.  The server did not check in with us because she didn't want to interfere with our meeting preventing me from sending this dish back for a replacement.  The roasted tomato soup though cool was the redeeming feature of my meal.Overall the experience with the Marriott Madison West was A-OK based on the positive interactions with the staff which offset the spotty food quality. 
 A nice (unassuming) place to throw a few bowling balls and drink beers with your friends.It's not the embodiment of the latest in bowling technology but who cares? The food is greasy the beer is cold and it's your turn -- let's see what ya got!Also the fact that this is the only alley in town that has helped me procure balls for Mondo Croquet (http://twurl.nl/gqx3il) easily outweighs their lack of cutting edge scoring systems. 
 Got invited here by a few friends the other night. It's primarily a softball/volleyball/recreational center although I spent my time inside in the bar.The bar area is massive and includes a stage and dance floor. When I inquired as to whether there were ever any bands I was told that they only do karaoke every so often. Seems like a waste of a nice entertainment area.Very limited taps; most beverages are served in bottles and cans. Prices are super cheap; tall boys of most anything run in the $2.25 - $2.50 range.Very limited menu; only a few easy-to-prepare items.Best suited for grabbing a cold one after a game of softball than as a destination point. The bartenders were friendly and super fast - a bonus in my book. Thanks to Gretchen & Staci for the excellent service. 
 I've been playing softball at Bowling Green for well let's just say \a long time\.  While it's not a modern athletic facility it's got a niche market.  If you enjoy playing ball having a cold beer and having fun with some friends - this is a good place for a league.  The umpires are excellent - I've known a few for many years and they do a great job.  The fields are smaller but \good bats\ are limited keeping home runs down a little (but it feels good to get one - it still goes plenty far!).I hope they stick around for a long time - I love playing there on Tuesday nights. 
 I have shopped here for about 2 yrs now. The quality is fairly consistent and so is the high price. =P  The selection is wide and during holidays they push out special desert cakes.  I have yet to try their bread and chocolates though.Things I've tried:Candied pecan cookie chocolated-coated mascarpone cookie morning bun almond croissant French cheese braids chocolate truffle cake etc. The big pluses are the right amount of butter and sugar in their pastries. It is never too sweet or too oily.  The right use of butter also gives a desirable texture as well.  The cakes have very fine layering (4 layers over 2.5in height) which makes the flavors of the cream blends very well with the cakes when you warm it up to room temperature. 
 After spending a month in Europe I was very excited to come back to Madison and rediscover Clasen's European Bakery. Though the shop is about ten times bigger than any bakery in Europe you can find some pretty authenic goods and the kitchen is said to be staffed by German master bakers. Of course nothing tasted quite the same as the real European thing and you are sure to find some pretty standard American bakery there as well.Clasen's doesn't look like too much when you first walk in but who cares when you have a warehouse of good to gawk at? There are shelves and shelves full of cookies desserts breads sweetbreads etc! Everything I've tried is quality and very fresh. Be sure to come early for the best selection.Prices are decent but the staff can be grumpy. There is ususally a sale or special deal to look for on one of the store's front tables and a wide selection of holiday items. Also don't miss the sampling area near the back. 
 This one is a big fail. After having been told numerous times that I had to go to Clasen's Bakery I finally went. What I found was a large room filled with unappetizing boring baked goods. Nothing in here did I want or have any desire to try. There were loaves of bread but the selection is better at Whole Foods or Willy Street Co-op. The cookies had the panache and flair of the garbage that is sold in Starbucks. Chocolate chip peanut butter sugar? What is so European about any of this? Greenjim H said about high prices? I am not sure what he bought I saw nothing that would be classified as high priced. The pastries were as boring as the cookies danish morning bun?I don't know how this classifies as a European bakery. This is an average bakery in a very far out of the way place. I am sure there are better places to go to grab a loaf of bread and a cookie. 
 This Place has noting on Italy but for Madison is gets a pass. They server free coffee have good bread and baked treats. 
 I was pleasantly surprised at the wonderful selection of candies cookies pastries bread to be found here! All fresh and ready to eat. Staff was very helpful and professional and friendly. Place was bright and clean. A mouth-watering experience! Already looking forward to my next visit. 
 I ordered a birthday cake for the first time through Clasen's. Due to the flu going through our house I had to reschedule the party and the cake for the following week. the Baker did not get my cancellation and baked the cake. Clasen's said they were sorry and not to worry about it. When I picked up the cake the following week it was stale. my guess is they just kept the cake in the fridge until I picked it up the following Friday. I called to let them know they apologized and said they would call me back. I never heard from them. :( Disappointing. 
 OMG. Go early and get everything you have ever wanted in European carb form. Yus Yus Yus. 
 Mmmmm....morning buns with coffee.  I had no idea this place was here and I felt like a kid in a candy store. I'll definitely be back for the artisan breads. 
 Best cupcakes and sourdough bread I've found in the Madison area.  They have several varieties and all we've tried have been excellent.  The cupcakes were much better then any cupcakery we've tried in the area.  The bread is perfect for grilled cheeses.  The rolls make the best hamburger buns. 
 After walking around & viewing their huge selection of goodies I had to look  up to avoid temptations hahaha.... they offer free samples of current goodies & coffee... had every flavor you could think of for cookies cupcakes muffins breads some candies..... I WILL RETURN.... 
 I usually pick up their buns at outpost in Milwaukee and I've been a fan.  We stopped at the bakery in Madison and was impressed at their selection.  For natural ingredients and consistent quality baked goods this place is it. 
 Location is good right next to Greenway Station.  Place is brand new so rooms are nice and clean...  except my husband wanted a room w/jacuzzi tub and it was digusting.  When he filled it up with water there was a gross film that looked like cleaning reside & dried skin flakes.  Nice.  He didn't end up using it and when we complained at the front desk they just said \sorry\...  we'll be contacting HQ about that.  Food was average check in was slow...  the only good thing was they kindly mailed me my ipod that I stupidly left in the dresser drawer. 
 Looks like I'm going to be a dissenting opinion about the Hilton Garden Inn.  I've stayed in Madison plenty of times for work and overall this is the nicest hotel that I've stayed at.  Pros: staff are very nice and friendly.  Hotel has gym pool and business center at no additional cost.  You know how some hotels have that teeny tiny kiosk to print your boarding pass and that's all you can do?  There are 2 computers hooked up to printers so can you do real tasks like check your email Yelp etc.  The beds are VERY comfortable.  It shocked me how nice they were.  Bathrooms have stone countertops and something heating the mirror so that after a shower your mirror is still usable not all fogged up.  Someone had their thinking hat on.  The hotel is walkable to several restaurants & I think they provide room service but they will also help you order from a nearby restaurant if you arrive late in the evening.For a hotel this size they do a really good job with breakfast.  It's a buffet with the usual cereal yogurt fresh fruit oatmeal pastries and hot food.  But they really go an extra mile on the eggs and every egg dish is cooked to order.  Whether you want 1 scrambled egg or full omelette they'll make it for you fresh give you a table tent number and then bring it to you.I have 2 more trips this year to Madison and hope I'm staying here again! 
 HGI's are very consistently good throughout the country so if I have a choice I stay at one when I am travelling. This HGI was everything I expected - comfy bed large desk big easy chair fridge microwave decent sized bathroom.Amenities: free wi-fi business center gym indoor pool and game room. Breakfast choices were good - the buffet had lots of pastries and hot items as well. They have a coin laundry on the 2nd floor with free detergent. Had no problems during my stay. Would definitely stay here again if I were to be in the Madison area. 
 I was visiting on a business trip and didn't know what to expect. The hotel is fairly new and has nice clean rooms a decent gym a large indoor pool and good hospitality.  The breakfast is not free though so I was embarrassed to be admonished for taking a granola bar from a basket on my way out. The location is superb if your a shopper..it's right next to a new mall. 
 great clean roomsStaff up front were awesome!  Very personable friendly and helpful.  Breakfast is great here and at all Hilton Garden Inns.  I love being able to get cooked to order breakfasts fresh fruit and cooked to order waffles.   YUM YUM! (can you tell I love food?)Location is in/near a strip mall which makes shopping for items you may have forgot a breeze. 
 We love this HGI!  We are from the area and through business acquaintances have enjoyed many happy hours and dinners there.  They have and will also put on the Holiday party for my spouse's firm and they do an excellent job.  We are looking forward to the December party!Last weekend we had our 31st anniversary and wanted to do something different so we checked into a jacuzzi suite had the lover's package and had a wonderful time.  Premiere shopping is right out there door. along with a variety of eateries and pubs.  The staff helped me to get things to the room early so it could be a true surprise--thank you!In our opinion the staff and the hotel are exceptional!  We look forward to many more casual visits and stays!  Thank you to Carl Chris and Chris the Bar Manger for many great times--and the rest of the wonderful staff!J n C  W of the BB 
 Cozy and Comfy. We were shuttled to and from the airport and to Epic. Convenient to a small shopping center and nearby restaurants. Staff are friendly and professional. Each day I came back to a clean room and replenished towels shampoo soap and 2 pieces of chocolates. Thanks Esther! :) 
 The staff here was awesome. Granted my husband and I only stayed here a night but check-in was super friendly and as a Hilton Honors member got 2 bottled waters. My husband forgot to pack a deodorant and when we went down to buy one from the pantry the front desk person offered to look for a complimentary one. When she couldn't find one she let us have the one in the pantry on the house. That was awesome!The rooms were clean and they have a mini fridge and microwave which is a great plus. The fitness center at this one was impressive. It wasn't an entire gym but it was bigger than a closet and the machines looked like they were kept very well. Even though I didn't experience the pool I was surprised by how inviting and family friendly it looked. It seemed a bit bigger than most hotel moderately sized hotel versions. If I ever have to cover travel for a colleague in Madison I have to come back to this one for sure! 
 Stayed here with a friend while she was in the Madison area for Epic training. I was seriously impressed with this HGI. I had previously stayed in one in Chicago that was pretty ghetto. Bed was comfy and the pool area was very family friendly. I have never seen a hotel pool with that kind of stuff for kids. They also have a hottub and the gym/workout area is very nice. Desk staff were super nice(I left my key in the room once). We had drinks at the bar and I will say that my wine was a bit pricey. I did not have the breakfast so I can't speak to that. 
 When I was a kid I used to love to go to the Hardware store to go looking at stuff and talk to the nice people that worked there.. WHen I visit this location of Ace I feel I go back in time. They are super nice super helpful but do not smoother you... They know how to make keys that work ( hard to find these days I have learned). I feel comfortable asking questions here as well. They never treat me like \Oh you are a girl\. I think their prices are not too bad and you get much better quality like screw that will not strip etc..  Parking is awesome here for people who are handicapped or have  a bad back you can park like right near the door practically.. 
 Ace's employees have been incredibly helpful and nice every time I've gone to the store. The store itself is chock-full of great home- and yard-improvement stuff (tools accessories gadgets etc) and the prices are very fair (especially when one considers the convenience of Ace's location and the idea of supporting a local business). For most of my small-to-medium-size home and yard needs I'll skip the trip to Home Depot or Menards and stick to my neighborhood Ace Hardware. 
 I'm having a rough go learning how to use power tools and drill ish into drywall but a great time going to ACE and learning what I did wrong and buying the appropriate things to remedy the problem and try again. Some might say \measure twice drill once\ or even \if you don't know what you're doing... ask first!\ But I was talking to my bud Annette J in Detroit and realized that part of owning a home is making improvements/adjustments doing it completely wrong then learning a ton from your mistakes. (Thanks Annette!) This week I learned that joint compound comes in an easy squirt tube and corner bead makes that nice 90 degree angle where pieces of drywall meet. I also learned that you can't secure anything into corner bead which is why having a stud finder helps if you're looking to hang a 72\ long roman shade. I also learned that I can easily patch my mistakes with some handy dandy supplies from ACE and although it took a few employees to find \the patch guy\ he was super informative about exactly what I would need to fix some holes and a chunk of dry wall where my poor shade decided it would rather hang than be secured to my window frame. Oh gravity. Jason H is right these are some of the nicest people you'll meet with loads of info to help you do it right the second time. I wouldn't have it any other way. 
 I had a broken storm window. They picked it up fixed it and delivered it back to me!!! If you know someone who cannot get to the store and needs stuff good to know. BUY LOCAL!! 
 Gross! I generally love Papa Johns but this one is lacking in all areas. I ordered PJs for lunch and once it finally arrived (1 hour later) it was luke warm and soggy. Apart from that the staff lacks any work ethic or customer service. The three people I dealt with were all rude and careless. Initially they ended up giving me a $5 credit. Ha! As if I would order again anyway. 
 A 5 star gem!I echo Jenny D's comment on the hash brown. Super crispy exterior and moist fluffy inside - it's a piece of art.  My friend and I enjoyed the generous portion of scramble egg ($7.50) and 2 layers blueberry pancake ($5.00). Everything tasted like \mom's food.\ Made fresh to order and very satisfying. No frou-frou typical Middleton gimmick. The basic decore and the down to earth service - the perfect spot to watch regulars enjoy the hearty breakfast. 
 Delicious!  Great service good prices and tasty food.  Echo what previous posts say about the hashbrowns!  Breakfast burrito is really good and gigantic 
 Three Sisters is one of the best breakfast joints in the Madison area. For me the two best things are the hash browns and the omelettes. Like all the other raters I think their hash browns are perfect. Their omelettes are not the fluffy kind. They are flat-cooked sheet-style folded around all the good stuff you specify. This is the kind of omelette I prefer and for this style theirs is one of the best I've had. Beyond that the service is super unpretentious and friendly. Their cinnamon rolls are big soft and without the density I favor. Their pancakes are more spongy than I like. But you should still try them it's just a matter of style and everything here is done with sincerity and consistency. You will find something you like enough to keep going back especially since their prices are so reasonable. 
 In our opinion Three Sisters will appeal to certain people and not to others.   Some will like it's laid back small town dinette atmosphere.  Nothing fancy good food large portions.   Others will also enjoy the good food but will be displeased with the lack of space mismatched dinning wear  less than average coffee barely toasted toast and the \greasy spoon\ environment of the building.   Some will see 4 or five stars go there and say \dead on.  Loved the place.\   Others will wonder how someone gave them more than three.We went back and didn't enjoy our food as much as we did the last time and the coffee was not very good.  Also we thought the prices were higher.   Anyway love it or leave it it is a three star restaurant in our book. 
 2.5 breakfast spot i gave three because of the service.  The breakfast is kinda greasy/oily which i usually like but this was a bit much though...I would rate this place higher if they lowered the prices and moved people thru like a diner should. 
 Nice place for a Sunday morning cozy breakfast. No frills just good food simply made. Pancakes are huge and delicious. They have build your own omelets and egg beaters are available by request. Oatmeal was very good. My whole breakfast was $11. One funny thing is that it seemed like they only have six menus for the whole restaurant. We had four in our party and had to wait for a table of six to order before we could get a menu. Overall I liked the simple atmosphere cheap prices and good food. 
 Great coffee and some of the best eggs I've ever had. It's sort of a hole in the wall but that adds to the ambiance. Super nice wait staff too. 
 Had breakfast at Three Sisters a few days ago while at Middleton for a meeting.  Very \down home\ place.  Mexican flavorful dishes along with midwest-country favorites.  I had some eggs and the Mexican hash browns.  Great way to start the morning.  Friendly staff knew the customers and welcomed new-comers.  Patrons here ranged from seniors in high school to senior citizens.  Very congenial. 
 100% traditional all-american diner breakfast experience.   I like trying new breakfast spots with my kids but this place remains a favorite.  Friendly chatty waitresses who dote on the kids like they were their own grandkids.  Inexpensive.  Oatmeal for when you want to eat somewhat healthy (this place ain't for health food...)  Omelet was good probably because it tasted like it was cooked in butter...  Good pancakes.  Take your check to the counter / bar when you want to pay.  Cash only. 
 Cobb salad was large and had great cheeses meats and veges.  I tried the onion rings which had a slightly sweet batter.  It really perked up the onion flavor.   Worth the money. breakfast or lunch.  Oh I was warned to only order a stack of pancakes and...if I'd like half orders are also acceptable.  Next visit is breakfast to use the advice. 
 I was so disappointed after reading all of the reviews.  Firstly breakfast stops at 11:00 on weekdays and noon on the weekends NOTE THAT because when we showed up today after my husbands late night shift the night before they would not serve us breakfast.CASH OR CHECK ONLYWorth noting both menus are pretty slim but breakfast is larger than lunch.  They were out of the fried chicken \dinner\ (you mean lunch since they were only open till 2 right?). We ended up ordering the patty melt ok fish sandwich subpar and onion rings good but not $3 good. Sandwiches come with chips not fries.  But was definitely not the pancakes that everyone else was raving about that I was craving.  The coffee was sting but a bit bitter. The total was just under $20 without tip. The decor is old doesn't bother me too much but looking at the filthy carpets it was disgusting and I was a bit afraid since I was wearing flat sandals.  Before I forget to mention it the place smells like smoke when you first walk in I was completely expecting to see ashtrays at the booths.The service was excellent... If you are a regular. If not plan on spending about three times too much there. We waited for about 5 minutes for our waitress ( one of the owners) to shout sit where you want.  We grabbed a table. My husband had to take a work call but had given me his order. After waiting 10 minutes I had to flag our waitress down to place our orders and she looked at me shocked that I would want something to eat. Trying to get the check out of her was terrible. By 12:15 the lunch regulars had started coming in so she was chatting about a recent wedding showings hem the wedding pictures talking about what the place looked like etc. by 12:30 I had out cash on the end of the table hoping to move things along.  She walked past us three times without making eye contact finally I put my arm out and asked for the check which had not been prepared wait for another 5 minutes while she served more regulars and FINALLY she got back to using we were out of there by 12:50. In short we will never return.  It is expensive for what you get food is unremarkable serve is terrible and it seemed like it could use a food service inspection because it was pretty dirty. 
 I visited this time for breakfast on the weekend.  Holy cats is it ever so busy.  I tried the 2222 meal.. 2 eggs 2 bacon 2 sausage 2 pancakes- I chose blueberry.  The pancakes had great flavor and the berries where awesome - very fresh.  We also tried the corned beef hash.  It's just hashbrowns with corned beef chunks and large onion slices.  It's ok just not as good as Pancake Cafe's. I will be back to try their biscuits and gravy (it sold out..sounds like a winner) and their mexican hashbrowns. 
 It is as good as all the reviews say!   It is a nice little diner with great service.   I was greated immediately upon entering.   I sat down and was asked right away what I wanted to drink.   The coffee was hot and fresh.   I had the 2222 and it was very good.   Served hot off the grill.   I will be back and would recommend to anyone to try. 
 This is a great place to go for a good cheap breakfast that will fill you up.  You seat yourself but the staff is still at your table taking your drink orders quickly.  The staff is always super friendly and all of the breakfast items I've tried have been great.  Even better they keep your coffee filled even when it's busy! :-)  Only thing to know ahead of time is they only accept cash and there is no atm in the restaurant. 
 I love this place! It's family owned and operated (still!) and is old-timey like most places aren't anymore! For a yummy feel-good blast from the past meet me at Three Sisters! :-) 
 Gr8 place! Service decent. Food portions are plentiful! My daughter had a couple of pancakes that  were the size of a hubcap!She said they were very tasty!  I had the country scramble. Loved it. Prices were good. Nice local joint. Recommend!! 
 I love this place! The chicken and dumplings I had today were delicious and the service was amazing and super friendly as usual! For a comfortable dining experience visit 3 sisters! :-) 
 A textbook example of the classic barbershop. Good conversation no frills and a darned good haircut from an experienced barber all at a very reasonable price.Made my appointment earlier today got right in and had a great experience. Dick cut my hair did a wonderful job and wouldn't even accept a tip afterward.Don't expect a salon experience; it's a true barbershop. Loved it and I'll definitely be back. 
 I honestly dread getting haircuts because it always seems like such a crapshoot.  I decided to try Dick and Arnie's based on the 1 or 2 reviews I read and my desperation to find something better than the corporate salons (cost cutters & supercuts mostly).  Also Dick and Arnie's happens to be right up the road from my house.  Ka cut my hair.  He was very cordial and paid great attention to detail.  The prices were as low at any place I've been but I felt the quality of cut was better.  I was very happy with my experience and will return to this establishment in the future. 
 Third update... excessive yes.  Warranted yes.  Read on.I'm convinced that Dick & Arnie's is one of Madison's/Middleton's best kept secrets.  True Dick isn't around much - but in his defense he's probably been cutting hair for 50+ years so he deserves some time away.That said I've gone back twice since my last review (my hair grows fast) and every cut has been absolutely stellar.  Ka who has cut my hair the last two times is absolutely wonderful.  Very attentive very helpful extremely friendly and really knows how to cut hair.  The place seems to thrive on walk-ins so don't bother making an appointment.  I think that trying to schedule an appointment is the only downside to Dick & Arnie's... and it was my only source of frustration.  As soon as I accepted the fact that it's best to just walk-in life has been great.Set aside 30-40 minutes and walk-in.  Your haircut will take 15-20 minutes tops; the extra time is \cushion\ just in case the place is full.  Don't worry about who does your hair - everyone there seems to know exactly what they're doing and they do it well.$15 for a stellar haircut?  No brainer.  Go to Dick & Arnies appreciate it for what it is and leave with an excellent haircut.  You won't be disappointed. 
 In spite of being \Dick and Arnie's\ barber shop I've only managed to ever get my hair cut by Ka. He's a really friendly guy and gives a great haircut but I'd like to meet Dick at least once.Contrary to the other review posted my experience has been that you need an appointment any time you want to get a trim. It's not that bad but there have been times when I've needed to reschedule 2-3 times due to work and I just feel bad about that. I'm more used to walk-in barber shops but since this is the only \real\ barber shop in the area I'll cope.The haircuts I've had so far have been stellar. Ka does a great job every time and asks all the important questions up front. The first time I went I didn't realize they didn't take credit cards and Ka even waited for me to go to the bank and get some cash!I'd recommend Dick and Arnie's to anyone who likes the \classic\ barber shop feel and isn't a fan of \Cost Cutters\ or \Sport Clips\ or whatever other chains are out there now. While it doesn't have all the amenities they give a great haircut. 
 Went there not knowing what I was in for.  I made an appointment same day and had Ka cut my hair.He was exceptional and I am very fussy.He took his time listened closely to what I was looking for and nailed the cut.He is quiet soft spoken and very nice.Most importantly he does an excellent job of cutting a guy's hair.And for $15.00 you can't ask for anything better.I went to an expensive \salon\ in Madison and the woman did a crap job.  I paid 1/2 the price at this spot and Ka was awesome. 
 It's been 18 months since my first experience with Dick & Arnie's and they continue to impress me - I visit them at least once a month.  Every cut is as excellent as any I've ever had and Ka is not only an absolute gentleman but a master barber.  He listens and honors every request; I can't say enough great things about him and the crew at D&A's.  It's not fancy but the cuts are superb.  5+ stars. 
 Great old-school barber shop. I'm in and out in 20 minutes and the price is right. Ka and Lisa both do a great job every time. 
 Can't go wrong with any of the barbers here.  Lisa is great Dick isn't around much but Ka and the newest barber...can't remember his name...is very good too.  I've been using them for about a year and haven't had a bad cut yet. 
 I think the other reviews sum this place up perfectly.  Ka is THE man hands down. He takes his time is very meticulous and you have a top quality haircut when done.  The first time he cut my hair I got the official  \wife seal of approval\ when I got home.  That hadn't happened at any of the other shops I've tried over the years - I have tough hair to cut and she usually cringed when I came home with a new haircut.  I haven't gone anywhere since. 
 Another 18 months have passed since my last review and this place remains unbeatable.  Ka Raj Lisa - they're all superb.  If you're looking for one of the best no-nonsense conscientious and professional haircuts you could ever get go here.  You could pay more at another place but I guarandamtee you it won't be better.  Huge thanks to Ka for sneaking me in today; he was busy and didn't have any scheduled openings but a customer cancelled and he immediately called and got me taken care of.  I'll be a customer (and fan) for life. 
 If you want to get your hair cut on a Saturday make sure you schedule ahead. Dick & Arnie's Barber Shop (DABS) is always booked solid on Saturdays.So I'm really picky when it comes to haircuts. I like scissor or straight-edge cuts (not trimmer cuts) and I prefer to have a guy cut my hair since (no offense women!). I've been going to $30-$45 per cut salons in several cities for the last 8 or so years but when I moved to the Madison area I was having trouble finding one that seemed like it would satisfy my two requests. Then I read the Yelp reviews about DABS especially noticing all the great stuff written about Ka. Since it's only a few quick minutes away from my house with cuts only costing $16 I figured I'd give it a try and - WOW! I am a loyal customer.Ka gives fantastic haircuts -- the wife approves EVERY time I come home -- and especially for the price this guy just can't be beat. As a person Ka is considerate and focused (he has a wife and 4 kids in addition to his job at DABS) and it absolutely shows in the haircuts he gives. Last thing: Lisa one of the barber/stylists at DABS decorates the place for almost every holiday throughout the year: St. Patrick's Day Valentine's Day Christmas Fourth of July. Every time I go in it's festive fun. 
 I called in and made an appointment for 1:30 giving me plenty of time to get my haircut and make my massage appointment 1/4 mile down the street.  I show up at 1:25 and someone is in George's chair just starting to get their hair cut.  When I walk in nobody says anything to me so I sit down and wait.  At 1:45 (15 min past my appointment time and still no one has said a word to me) the guy is still getting his hair cut and he is not even close to being done.  So I tell George I can't wait any longer because I will miss my other appointment.  He tells me we still got time to hang out a little longer.  At 1:50 he finally decides he doesn't have enough time to cut my hair.  You are supposed to be hair cutting professionals.  You should know how long it is going to take to cut someone's hair.  If the person before me showed up late for their appointment why should mine be pushed back? or When I walked in why not tell me hey we are running 30 minutes behind can you wait?  Instead you say nothing absolutely no common courtesy nor do you care that you wasted an hour out of my work day with this.  Someone at Dick and Arnies explain this to me WHAT IS THE POINT OF MAKING AN APPOINTMENT IF YOU ARE NOT GOING TO STICK TO THE TIME SCHEDULE?  I AM A BUSY PERSON AND DO NOT HAVE TIME TO SIT AROUND ALL AFTERNOON FOR A HAIRCUT!   Needless to say I am in the market for a new barber. 
 I came here following a student. On trial basis. It's kind a small place but very calming....havnt figured out why yet.  You feel spoiled here. I only get my hair done here but planning to use other services soon. I noticed that other clients as well get great personal services here. It's nice to see men come here as well. 
 Tracy gives the best massages - deep tissue.  She is hard to get an appointment with because she is so good.  But it is definitely worth the effort to get in.  If I could afford it I would get a massage from Tracy every week! 
 Jen Reid is an awesome stylist!  She does such a great job with my color and is the \brow-whisperer\. 
 If your looking for Bar food in the city of Middleton this is the place to go. They have excellent burgers. And honestly their fries are some of the best I have had.Ive been there only twice and have never had anything else on the menu other than the cheeseburger but it was excellent as far as burgers go. My friend got the cheese steak...which looked awesome too. Worth checking out if your looking for a burger/sandwich...and prices are quite good. 
 Quick review: Stopped in for lunch today with the intention of sampling their Friday Fish special. $7 gets you 2 pieces of deep fried cod fries slaw roll and soda.  Fish was solid - nicely done especially for the price and speed.Detailed review:I'd never visited the Middleton Sport Bowl prior to today so I wasn't quite sure what to expect.  We arrived exactly at noon parked and made our way to the bar where we found two seats and were promptly greeted by a bartender.We both ordered the lunch special - 2 piece deep fried cod plate with fries slaw tartar dinner roll and soda.  The bartender took our order and came back with a complimentary bowl of popcorn which was a nice surprise.Plates arrived about 10 minutes later - the fish was appropriately sized as were the fries - no imbalance and portions were fair.The fish itself had a flavorful beer batter that was a little thicker than what you'll typically find at most places but it was delicious and I welcomed the extra crunch.Inside the fish itself was a tad watery with just a hint of grease - not anything outrageous but just enough to sense that it was there.  Flavor of the fish was incredibly mild; the batter stole some of its thunder.  The fries were excellent - battered-style and straight cut.  I'm told the slaw and tartar were \average.\  Dinner roll was hard and dry.Total lunch bill for two: $14.64 and we were in-and-out within 35 minutes.  Totally acceptable and a good lunch all things considered.Middleton Sport Bowl = NEUTRALFood = 2.75 to 3 stars (average; not bad not spectacular)Service = 3.5 stars (prompt and friendly)Value = 4 stars MISC = 3 stars (actually seemed to be a nice bowling alley/bar)Summary: Not a win nor a fail.  I'd go back for the fish at lunch and will definitely be back to sample other foods - the sandwiches looked really good. 
 Middleton Sport Bowl is kind of a mixed bag.  I'll briefly break down how I gauge them (I've been many times both before and after the renovation)Facility:  Great environment a reasonable number of lanes (although not as many as other alleys in the area) a roomy bar with TVs for the sports games and an upstairs that has both pool as well as a rental area that hosts private functions or tournaments.Cost:  Fairly cheap if you go on open bowling nights I think it's around $1 or $2 a game plus shoes.  I'm sure it's hiked up otherwise.  Open Bowling is usually after 9pm during the week and not a bad option.  We used to go on Thursdays which seems to be a good night for them.Food:  It's typical bar food.  They have good cheese curds and the usual fare that you'd see at an alley.  Nothing to write home about but if you're in the mood for a greasy burger you probably won't go wrong.Service:  I cannot stand the people that work at the counter.  There's a couple of older guys (50-60+) who obviously hate life and want to project that on you when you're there.  Everytime I've gone in I've tried to be courteous and polite and asked simple basic questions like \I'd like to get a lane there's 3 of us and we all need shoes\ etc etc.  These guys first look at you like you walked into the wrong bar and then respond with gruff 2 second answers that doesn't help either party move the process along.  It's really irritating because I've gone to this alley off and on for probably about 10 years or so and it's always been like that.  The bartenders when you get a woman are usually friendly and don't share the same attitude.Personally I'm more of a Schwoeglers guy but their prices for open bowling are more expensive and the atmosphere is noiser so Sport Bowl sometimes wins out. 
 Let's start this review at a 3-star (A-OK = not good/not bad) rating.+1 star: They have a Badger Bus for home-game weekends. It costs $5 and includes a coupon for a free drink when you get back from the game.+1 star: The bowling alley looks nice. It's a small space but clean-looking. I don't know prices. I'll give them the +1 for appearances.-2 stars: The food is terrible. TERRIBLE. After the WIS v UTEP game the wife ordered boneless Buffalo chicken wings. They came out deep fried and hard with almost no flavor -- there was NO BUFFALO SAUCE ON THE WINGS! (We think the B-sauce might have been fried onto the chicken but if so the flavor was lost in frying).-1 star: The service was lacking. Following the game with all 50+ people who had just come back on the Badger Bus there were only 2 servers and they were also the bartenders! Service was slow haphazard and careless -- the guy never once asked how the food was nor did he ever actually stop at the table except long enough to take our order. Drinks were dropped on the fly the food was all but thrown as he whizzed by ...Overall 2 stars. I'll go back for the Badger Bus and the bowling but I will NEVER eat there again. 
 Like to stop here on Fridaysas your first drink is free. That's right not 2 for 1 free! Had a burger on last visit which was quite possibly the best I have ever had! Freshhand pattedwith a great bun. Craving another as we speak..Service OK. 
 I eat lunch here about 3 times a week.  They have a different special each day of the week Monday through Friday.  Always friendly!  I would definitely recommend if you are looking for a place to eat some lunch. 
 A co-worker of ours just got a promotion/transfer and as part of his farewell/send-off he requested we join him for lunch at the Sport Bowl.I can't expand much from my previous review(s)... the burgers are still in the Top 3 for Madison the curds are in the Top 2.  This is primarily a burger/fries/curds place; everyone in our party ordered burgers (save for me and my boss - we both ordered salads) and every burger was perfectly cooked and earned rave reviews.The salads aren't anything special; processed meats iceberg lettuce mediocre veggies.  I would've loved to have one of those succulent burgers but I'm in the zone with my diet/exercise these days.  Lunch specials include a free soda/iced tea as well. 
 I'm not reviewing this place as a bowling alley since I don't have the expertise to know what constitutes a good bowling experience.  If the shoes fit the ball rolls down the lane and the pins fall down it's fine.This review is all about the food.  Which if you can't tell by the number of stars above these paragraphs is pretty tasty.  To start the cheese curds are required eating.  I think they just take cheddar cheese cubes bread them and fry them but they are delicious when fresh.  Make sure to eat them quick however because like all cheese curds they harden when they cool and have a weird texture after that point.  When you think bar food you think burgers.  And the burgers at the Sport Bowl are excellent.  Not only are they excellent they are fairly priced as well.  At lunch you can get a burger + fries (battered!) + soda for eight bucks.  I can see some people thinking the burgers are too greasy but the grease gives you a delightful \contented weighed down and fuzzy-brained\ feeling afterwards.  A quick rundown on other items I've tried: the meatball sub was so-so but huge.  Go to Gino's a mile away if you're craving meatballs.  The turkey club is stacked high and tastes exactly as you would expect.  The patty melt is just a burger on bread so obviously it rules hard.  The pizza is decent with a crust that tastes like Pizza Hut's deep dish.  The fish fry is a lot of good food for a good price.  The \Philly\ cheesesteak is too greasy even for me.The best part about the Sport Bowl is that if you feel some postprandial guilt for your frenzied ingestion of large amounts of fat and grease you can pop over to Willy West next door to get an organic hippie-smoothie.  But it will probably cost more than your entire meal here. 
 Great burgers sad fish. We do a weekly managers meeting and everyone takes turns choosing the location. One of the guys choose the Madison Sports Bowl. I ordered the fish when the food came to the table I saw beautiful hand pattied burgers hand dipped onion rings then came my fish. Sad flat boring breading right off the Sysco truck. What a disappointment. Today we made a second trip and I ordered the burger and onion rings. I'm very happy! 
 Ever since their renovation this place has knocked it out of the park.  This is THE place to go for a cold beer after a softball game.  Hungry?  No problem!  Their menu is extensive and everything that I've had has been excellent.I especially recommend the pizza - you don't expect great pizza from a bowling alley but they do a great job.  It's a favorite of ours.  Their burgers are top notch as well.  I haven't had the gyros but a friend of mine raves about them.  The kids menu is great - my little guy destroyed their mini corn dogs.The staff is very friendly and helpful.  The owners put a lot of hard work and time into this place and it shows.  On a cool summer evening you can't beat sitting out on the patio with a cold one. 
 This is my go-to library because it's closest to home. There always seems to be a decent selection of the new releases and I can always get in and out quickly. PLUS I can always go grab a slice of pie next door at Hubbard! 
 One of our first restaurant visits when we moved here.  We have since learned to avoid any restaurant a local recommends.  Menu was full of bland comfort food.  Wife had chicken and dumplings that tasted like they came out of a can  My steak was tough and flavorless.  Restaurant has been in the same location for about 100 years and it shows it's badly in need of a remodel.  Entire place smelled like vomit and was dirty.  I could smell the bathrooms ten feet away and when I had to visit they were even worse layer over layer of dirt.  Where's the health inspector.  Service was extremely poor especially considering we were the only people in the place.  I guess the highschooler that was serving us was too busy talking on her cell phone to help us. 
 I wanted to like it I really did. The Stamm House is walking distance from home so I figured we HAD to try it... First off let me say that the atmosphere is typical old(emphasis on the old)-school Wisconsin restaurant. Wood paneling dated tables and chairs and GOD AWFUL seventies music piped in. When we walked in(at six on a Saturday night) there was one couple at the bar and another couple dining upstairs near us. The waiter seated us--close to the kitchen I realized with disappointment. If I want to hear dishes clanging and the hustle and bustle I'd be cooking at home. Dining out is for pretending that there's no work involved. It also didn't help that because it was so slow in the restaurant I could hear every comment the waiter said to the cook-staff some of which wasn't patron-friendly. The BF ordered the fried walleyeand I the beef tips Moutarde. His french onion soup was decent but my salad was lacking. When the meal arrived I was so excited because I was STARVED. I picked up a piece of beef with my fork and bit down into tender juicy...FAT. Fatty fatty fatness. Ewww. I did the not-so-sexy-spit-it-onto-the-side-plate maneuver. All right. Every now and then you get a fatty piece of meat in a dish. A girl can move on. MY next bite was better and although the sauce was decent it was nothing fabulous. I was disappointed when my next piece was also quite fatty. You know when you get that cheap meat that is mostly sinew and fat. *Sigh* I'm done. I pushed the dish off to the side and settled for my potato. To give credit the waiter noticed I wasn't eating the dish and asked me if something was wrong. I told him and he offered to get me something else which I declined(by the time it was made Chris would have been done with his dish). Later he also offered a free dessert which we really didn't want. He ended up knocking almost half off my dish which was appropriate I think. Over all it just wasn't enjoyable. I could have gotten over picking a bad dish if the experience itself was nice but it wasn't. Average at best. The waiter was decent and tried to be accommodating but on the whole it was just sub-par. I left wishing that I had picked another spot to spend my hard earned date-night budget! I realize that a place like this isn't going to be gourmet but I've had MUCH better casual dining experiences...for less money! 
 2-stars may be a bit generous if we're just measuring food quality.  Quick-n-dirty review: Stamm House features a lot of character history and good service.  Unfortunately that's about all it has to offer unless you enjoy food that is extremely greasy and of mediocre quality.Detailed review: Our fish fry crew decided to give Stamm House a try after we'd read good things about it on a fairly well known fish fry review website.  Normally those guys (the reviewers) are pretty spot on but they've completely missed the mark when it comes to the Stamm House.  Not even close to being a top-10 place no way no how.We sauntered in to the Stamm House at around 5:45 on Friday night and were shocked to find the place darned-near empty.  The bartender greeted us immediately - very friendly guy - we ordered a couple of New Glarus Nakeds and a Spotted Cow.  After downing the first round we went to order a refill and whoops - Naked went empty and there wasn't any more left.  Drat.After downing a second round of beers (Cows all around this time) it dawned on us that we probably needed to inquire about a table.  So we wandered upstairs where a friendly lady told us she'd have an opening at around 6:45 or 7:00.  Odd the place was empty... but we took it and went back downstairs.We ordered some cheese curds and the onion rings.  The bartender warned us ahead of time that the curds were \standard-from-the-bag\ curds but said the rings were hand-battered and delicious.  They arrived quickly and once again the bartender was spot-on with his description.The curds were Sysco curds and were not cooked well at all.  I don't think the fryer was hot enough because these curds were drenched in grease - so much so that we couldn't eat them.  Disgusting.  And the ranch dipping sauce was like water... you know what they say about oil and water... The rings were decent but again - the grease was ridiculous.  It really made for a bad first impression.  So we ordered some Whiskey Old Fashioned Sours to help cut through the grease film that was sitting so heavily on our palettes.  Our table was ready by 7:00-ish and much to our surprise when we went upstairs this time the place was packed.  Where those people came from and how they got up there without us noticing remains a mystery... our waitress stopped promptly checked our drinks and took our order - fried perch all the way around with hash browns on the side.Dinner salads came first and were nice; fairly fresh fairly tasty and just the right size.  Fish came out slightly later - served family style - along with our hash browns.  First bite of the fish?  UGH - it tasted awful.  Extremely fishy flavor (and I love fish).  Think \stinky NJ ocean shore line flavor\ - not delicate flavorful flaky and enjoyable.  No sir this was the nightmarishly bad fish that we all remember from our grade school days - you know the stuff that was about 2-3 days away from being used as feed for the sea lions at the zoo  So we doused it with lemon and gave it another go - and once again the fish was so overpoweringly fishy that we reached for the (gasp!) ketchup.  That helped a bit but it still wasn't an enjoyable fish fry.  The fish was cooked well - not too greasy and it was breaded rather than battered.  If only it weren't so obscenely fishy...   Hash browns were tasty - fried nicely (crisp and tasty).  Service was fantastic - our waitress was fun helpful and did a great job of checking in with us.  Total bill for three with a round or two of drinks was $45-ish.Stamm House = FAILFood: 1 star (grease grease everywhere; horrible fish fry)Service: 4.5 stars Value: 3 starsSummary: waaaaay too greasy + waaaaaay too fishy fish = fail. 
 Let me start right out by saying that this review has nothing to do with  food!!!  (Unless you count the onion rings appetizer which tasted like most deep-fried onion ring appetizers.)Some of you know me now as someone who LOVES tradition and history and preservation and stuff-like-that.  So we came here for the tradition (great old supper club from the 40's) the history (an1847 stagecoach inn later a stop on the Underground Railway and a Speakeasy circa Prohibition) and the preservation (it's hard to keep a 150-year old lady going in style).So we came to DRINK and PLAY in other words on a busy Friday night in spite of or because of the fish fry.  We grabbed some stools but found ourselves giving up our seats to some lovely ladies who were waiting to be seated for the fish fry.  (Like I said we weren't here for the food but I gotta wonder why the fish fry was JAM PACKED CONSTANTLY.)After bugging the extremely convivial bartender about the history of the place and begging to see the \wine cellar\/slave-holding-tank in the basement he tossed his apron at someone and announced an impromptu \tour\.  WOW!It was cool to say the least imagining the terrified slaves packed into the \secret\ cellar with its curved brick walls.  So we took turns squeezing in and out then returned to the bar and proceeded to enjoy tons of conversation with the locals.  So I'm a fan! 
 Overall it was a nice supper club.  You have the bar area then you go upstairs to eat.  Drinks were good.The fish was good.  I would have liked to see a baked option on the fish fry.  The family style all you can eat was good.  French fries were good too (all you can eat).Not the best fish I have ever had but above average.  The place was quite so you could talk without yelling which was nice. 
 FYI - this place is closed.  It is for sale. 
 Told them to replace my belt tensioner due to frequent squeaking after replacing my belt.. They looked around and said \nope take the belt back and ask for a new one under warranty\.. Charged be $12 and after installing a new belt turns out they were right. Honest guys. 
 I took my car here to get my brakes replaced.  They did the work quickly and at a good price.  I went here on a recommendation from a friend and now I recommend it to my friends when they need work done. 
 Matt at Bennett's Auto is very knowledgable and skilled with BMW's. I brought my car in and he was able to replace the belt along with my driver-side mirror fixed at the perfect timing and good price. I plan on bringing it back to have my breaks and other things done in the future. I highly recommend Bennett's to anyone who needs work done on your BMW. 
 I started going to Dunn's Import in 1981 when I owned my first car a Datsun 210. Almost 30 years later Jeff Dunn is still taking care of my car along with my 3 children's cars too! Every experience is a great one at Dunn's. The staff are friendly and professional and know their stuff!!I would recommend Dunn's Import to anyone who has a foreign car. I trust him to service my own children's cars.I think that says it all! 
 This is where I take my 5-series BMW for service and I have been very pleased.  Friendly honest and they take pride in their work.  I have recommended them to friends and business associates that have foreign luxury autos as that is their specialty.  I also bought a set of Nokian All-Season hybrid (winter/summer combination) tires from them two or three years ago on their recommendation and they are the best tires I've ever owned.  Highly recommend Dunn's. 
 It was a rare for me that during my college years of blossoming into manhood that I didn't start my night by a trip to Walgreen's. It was also rare that I didn't traumatize the clerk with my purchases.During the period of time when Keith Charles was known as \ Whiskeysaurus Rex\ or \Bad Fritz\  and it was common that the following items were being purchased prior to a big night out on the town.1. Glow Sticks2. Condoms3. Met Rx Protein Bar with 32 grams of whey protein isolate4. Altoids- Cinamon5. Marb lights6. Monster Energy Drink (low carb to keep my girlish figure)7. Motivational stickers 8. Spare lighter9. Cherry flavored chap stick10. Plastic hip flask11. Corn cob pipe (merely for style)12. 1 liter of Bubble Gum flavored Pedialyte With all of these item stowed safely in my man bag or \murse\ I was ready for any adventure that the night may hold.Now I know that major corporations are horrible for small business and are generally bad but where else can a list like this be purchased with one stop ?Hauki !Light blue trojans pleaseSpermicidal for the win !Do I need road flares ?Talent ? When you are carrying the above listed items all in one basket women tend to avoid making eye contact with you thus making talent hard to judge 
 Gotta give a big THANKS! to this Walgreens.  I found myself there shoeless with an overheated dog and they had no problem letting me come in with the dog to buy some water for him.  It is rare for a big chain store to be so dog and barefoot friendly! 
 It's the typical Wallgreen's.  What I like is it is very close to our home and therefore very convenience when having a prescription filled.   We also use this place to get our candy prior to going to a movie and at times there are some nice sales going on which make it even cheeper.   At times they also have some nice selections when it comes to seasonal items such as Easter Halloween and Christmas. 
 4 stars for Hardee's ?!?  It's no Culver's by a long shot but that Thick Burger was damn tasty !   I don't know if the restaurant was clean but the drive thru service was good. 
 I like this place because it usually isn't very crowded.  There's a Culver's down the street that always has about five times the business as this place.  The burgers are really good the best fast-food burgers in my opinion (yes better than Culvers gasp) and the fries are excellent as well.  The best part is that if you get there at any time other than lunchtime you get fresh fries.The only thing I don't like is how they put mayo on some of their burgers but they never have a problem with making one without mayo.  Service is always friendly but sometimes a little slow.  Oh yeah you should also stay away from the chicken strips.  They're bad.The decor here is awesome with wood paneling straight out of the 80's and cheap plastic booths.  There's even a sterile-looking wall clock on one of the walls.  If you want to reminisce about a time before fast-food restaurants tried to be all trendy and hip you should stop in at Hardee's. 
 The Middleton Hardee's just renovated.  They got rid of the wood paneling and switched to a trendy red/black color scheme.  It is much more pleasing to the eye but I was still sad when I found out.  Now I go to Perkin's for my old-person decor fix.  Thankfully the outside of the restaurant still looks like your typical run-down fast food eatery!Also the new fresh-fried chicken strips they've introduced are orders of magnitude better than the old ones which tasted like they had been fried in a factory frozen and then microwaved for five seconds before being served.  Nothing in fast food is ever fresh but these new chicken strips do a passable impersonation of it. 
 Okay my review sums it all up in a text that I sent to my boyfriend several hours after eating a Frisco Burger w/o tomato small order of curly fries and a small diet coke.Text message:\Don't tell anyone but I ate at Hardee's today and it was like real restaurant quality. Well just the food part. I didn't eat it all b/c 1) I couldn't and 2) I wanted some for later.\I was driving while eating it and I kept saying out loud how good the burger was. Mind you I was totally alone. And I didn't go in the restaurant but it looked clean from the drive-thru window and that woman who took my order did a better than average job. I was kind of put off by their prices but it was totally worth every penny! 
 these guys are super friendly. the food was made perfectly! mushroom and Swiss.yumthey play nice music and its very clean 
 Tried to purchase some DJ equipment from this company. My order was denied because my billing address for my credit card was different from my shipping address. Really?! I run several companies and have never run into to this. One of my companies the billing address is our PO Box and the mailing address is the store front or what if I wanted to send a gift to someone? I obviously can't do it through Full Compass.  Also why do you offer the option of a alternate billing or mailing address? Doesn't make sense especially in this economy. I'll be sure to send along my $600+ receipt from the company that's okay with a different mailing address. 
 Wouldnt even rate then as 1 star but yelp wont let me dk anytjing less than that. To start Don't waste your time or money ordering ANYTHING from Full Compass. I recently made a large purchase from their website which took over four hours of my time back and forth with their \customer service\ sales rep. Not only will they not allow you to ship to a business address they flat out won lt ship the package to any where but your on file billing address.And further more they couldn't en provide me with a tracking number for my package. I paid for the shipping it's only natural I get to be informed or aware of when FedEx will be delivering it to me!!! This is one of their illegible polices is the only explain soon I've received why would anybody give someone payment for sometime that you can even track it's arrival. I'm over it. I will not do business with this company in the future and I would advise anyone else to do the same.Save youraelf the frustration and time! 
 Done a service repair for a broken Sub.. FAST TURNAROUND! Crazy! I called them 3 days and they`re done and the sub is ready to go! NICE! 
 Recently rented speakers and microphones for an event and was very pleased with the service and quality. I emailed Full Compass described my needs and received a prompt response with a quote (within a couple hours). Easy pick up during regular business hours. I was showed how to use the equipment and it was loaded into my car. Equipment was easy to set up during our event and the sound quality was great! Quick and simple return. Will definitely use them again! 
 Tons of shoes for women some for men zilch for kids.  Huge clearance section but not all deals are really that great.  Good place to go if you're pretty self-serve and have a general idea of what shoes cost elsewhere.  Their rewards program is pretty generous- $10 back for every couple hundred you spend- not a hard limit to meet. 
 I love this store! They have some of the best prices and options for shoes in the city! They always have some great looking shoes excellent brands and spectacular prices. I also enjoy that the way this particular location is set up that there isn't \walls\ of shoes like Payless or some other local shoe shops. This place has shelves that is one height and that is it so you can get a grand spectrum of all of the shoes in the store. It is in a great location in Greenway Station in Middleton and it is a very clean and good looking store. The only real qualm I have with the store is that 75% of the store is dedicated to Women's shoes. Which is fine but It would be nice to see a little but bigger selection for Men's shoes. Also their slippers are SUPER COMFY. One final thing is that they have some great coupons every so often here. Keep and eye out! 
 It's a DSW. Just like any of the other ones scattered about the country.+ Friendly helpful staff+ Open expansive+ Plenty of parking+ Fast check-outs+ Reasonable deals on most shoes+ Clearance racks have some great deals- Vanns shoes are *exactly* the same price as anywhere else although signs lead you to believe you're saving money... I looked at a pair earlier in the day at a local skate shop where they were $45 (MSRP according to Vanns site is $45). DSW had them priced at $44.95 with the sign indicating \Compare at $60 - Save $15\... - Accessories (socks waterproofers etc) are a bit pricier than other places so watch those impulse buys while standing at the check-out lane. 
 Grade: C-Triangle-shaped fish fillets served on Styrofoam plates. Good greasy Hushpuppies and cold beer. Good service and prices. 
 this place is not bad in fact i rather liked it. the prices are good and the food is decent. i rather go here than a big chain where i would pay more for similar food. There's a bar area and a section with tables. Definitely a mixed crowd-young singles EMTs on a break middle aged singles older couples and families. kinda cool. the Village Green offers new glarus and cap brewery on tap as well as other stuff i cant remember. We were there on a Saturday night and my husband got the special double cheeseburger with fries for $6.95. I just got the regular burger and it was about $3.50. the burgers looked like the frozen variety but they were kinda tasty really.  schlitz in a can $2 all the time big screen tvfor me a downside was that the place was a little smoky i guess there isn't a smoking ban in this city yet however it is possible to sit outside. the server was pleasant and efficient.cash only 
 Some part of me recognizes that the Village Green might be a bit of a hole in the wall but I've been going there since before I could walk so I have to love it.  It's where \the locals\ go for a burger and cheese curds.  Whether you graduated from MHS in 2004 or in 1969 you'll probably run into someone you know from high school.I love this place because it hasn't changed a bit - the food is still awesome they still don't take credit cards and they still play nothing but football on the big screen tv up front. 
 Wandered in to the Village Green after a hard day at the office.  Sat at the bar quizzed the bartender about a few things and ultimately tried a bunch of the \specialties.\Service?  Top notch.  The bartender was ON - never missed a beat never left our glasses empty and was very helpful.  5+ stars.Drinks? Limited tap selection although they have a few interesting items: Great Lakes Ale and Esthers Best were two that stood out as fun and not what you'd normally find at a more mainstream location.  They also have daily drink specials - we tried the Lemon Smash (hand squeezed (with each drink) lemonade + vodka) and the Whiskey Old Fashioned Sour.  Both were great.Food? We tried the famous chili - meaty slightly spicy and delish.  Not the best I've ever had but not bad by any means.  We tried the vegetable beef soup - hearty loaded with veggies and the meat was tender and of good quality.  For our entrees we went a bit conservative - grilled chicken salads - but they were huge and tasty.  Fresh fresh fresh veggies - the tomatoes were wonderful as were the onions (red and soooo sweet).  The salad was definitely an unexpected surprise - I'd get it again in a heartbeat!  Our dining companion ordered some chicken strips which he requested be tossed in their hot wings sauce.  The result?  Wow - tasty especially if you're a fan of vinegar-based wing sauce that packs a bit of a kick.  Really really good.So we'll definitely be back - I'm becoming a huge fan of the \local\ places and the Village Green is definitely a \local\ place.  I can't wait to try a burger or to enjoy some of their other drink specials.Village Green = WINFood = 3.75 starsService = 5 starsValue = 2.75 stars (a bit pricey; $35 for 2 with drinks)Overall = 3.75 - 4 stars (atmosphere service general vibe selection = big boost) 
 Yummy food! Great service! Family friendly atmosphere! Great Prices! 
 Went there with the family for Friday which in Wisconsin means fish fry.Overall good.  It was nice to seeing the cooks preparing your food. Who knows what those cooks do in those kitchens.Fish was good batter was a little heavy.  Only potato option was fries-boo.Otherwise good.  No complaints. 
 Quaint little townie spot downtown Middleton.  Nice divey spot for a beer.  Inside smells like old people and moth balls but they have outdoor seating.  The menu is very bar foodish but they make it very well.  The chili wasn't the best but it was good and the fish sandwich was quite good.  That's right I had chili and a fish sandwich a strange combo. 
 I've been living in Middleton for about 9 months now and I'm giving the Village Green five stars for being excellent at what it is: a small local bar with great service and interesting patrons.To us the Village Green is the place we go when we want to get out of the house for a drink and some company. Once you've been there a few times everyone who works there begins to recognize you and seems glad to see you. They have a small menu of yummy fried items (Spudsters!) great burgers and sandwiches and daily specials (love the French Dip on Wednesdays). All the food is cooked right behind the bar and they keep their cooking equipment impeccably clean. They make good drinks and have a small but respectable selection of draft beers that meet the needs of both craft beer lovers and Miller Lite-types. Bartenders are not afraid to do a shot of whiskey with you and many of the regular patrons will buy you a drink if you chat with them. The Green is owned by two brothers who are almost always there cooking or bartending. The place is closed on Sundays and rarely stays open past midnight - it's just not that sort of bar. Go across the street to Hody for late-night drinking. Any other time though I promise you'll find the company much more enjoyable at Village Green. 
 First and foremost their burgers are INCREDIBLE and that is reason enough to go check it out! I would actually give this place a 3.5 if that were possible. I docked it because it has a limited menu with mostly fried food not many healthy dining options but then again I'm not sure why anyone would go there for anything other than a burger. It is also definitely a dive the bathrooms are a little scary but the burger ranks right up there with the best in the Madison area. 
 Sloppy Joe was pretty bland. I had the spicy chili good flavor. Fries were good. Def will go back and try burgers there. 
 After the hype about their burgers I was really looking forward to trying the food here. The meh: The hushpuppies were 1/2 way decent but nothing extraordinary. Edible. No honey offered with them though.The ugh: With the all of the acclaim their burgers get you would think that they were doing something special here. They aren't. The burgers are frozen patties and look like they're right from Sysco. The reason that people are probably saying they're so good is because the patties aren't cooked within an inch of a briquette. Normally I would say that's a good thing but when you're making me a burger from an unknown origin handled by who knows how many people....needless to say medium rare frozen beef patty is doesn't = amazing burger in my book. I can't say that I would visit again. There are far too many amazing hamburgers on the west side made with real beef from local butchers to waste my time with this place.UPDATE: I've spoken with a couple of people that are thinking it may be a fluke that I ended up with frozen patties the time I was there. Apparently they have a machine there that they make their patties with. I'm going to have to revisit in the near future to investigate. 
 BEST. ITALIAN BEEF. EVER!  AND Samantha ROCKS!!! 
 Great food. Friendly staff. No complaints. 
 As many yelpers have said perfectly...the Village Green is the idealistic neighborhood tap.  I hadn't been in over 10 years and walking back in the place looked exactly the same.  Some would call it a bad thing but I find it endearing.  We've been back a few times now and love going with friends for a casual Friday night.  Great specials (love the Friday fish...but be prepared to eat only fried food).  My all-time favorite is their summer sausage reuben...if you love reubens you cannot go wrong with this jewel!  Fries are always hot and fresh and service is always friendly.  One of Middleton's best kept local secrets! 
 Want a burger?  Go here!  Price is a little on the high side for some of their dishes but if your looking for a casual place to grab a beer and burger this is the place. 
 A bit awkward. Kind of like the snack bar at a summer camp. Very nice people in there and the drinks were good. Decor was lacking but I cant fault it much for that. 
 Hard to pass up the Road Kill Burrito.  Ask for the bucket of sauces.It was as good as when I tried it ten years ago as it was last week.I don't think much has changed around here in 30 years but that is definitely part of the charm.  I have heard the fish fry is good but I have never been there on a Friday night.  Lunch crowd has a lot of regular guys quick and friendly service prompt and hot food.  Don't go looking for the lobster.  Go for the specials burgers beer or the burrito! 
 I love the small town bar feel. Good food nice tap selection. Very comfy. 
 \The Green\ has the best burgers in the Madison area.  It's simple bar food but done perfectly.  They know what they are doing here and they are doing it good.  The Nachos are pretty awesome too.  They deep fry tortillas for the chips.  If you can get a spot at the bar.  It's good times.  I don't eat fish but some of my friends and my girlfriend do and they like the fish fry on Fridays.  I'll stick to my cheeseburger. 
 The Village Green is a Wisconsin bar with Packer memorabilia formica tables and mismatched chairs and better than average food.  It wasn't the best burger I've ever had and the fries and mushrooms were frozen.  The corned beef sandwich was fresh but not fantastic.   But it was adequate and I'd return if I had a hankering for WI bar food.  I felt like I'd been here before the minute I walked in - the menu and atmosphere were indistinguishable from other taverns I'd been to.  Their tap beer selection was good and its obvious they do a lot of business.  If this is what you are looking for they do it well! 
 This place is awesome for what it is a very friendly neighborhood tavern.  The food is mostly fried and greasy but served with a little slice of love.  The specials are excellent and the value is top notch.  Want to watch a game?  They have a few big TV's and are very accommodating.  If you are looking for high-end posh dinning this isn't your place.  Madison has plenty of excellent choices in that department.  This place is homey and will serve you a solid burger and fries with a starter of wings and variety of homemade soups for a pretty good price.  Come in and see these guys they do it right. 
 Great old school bar. Burgers are fantastic. The service is good .the price point is good for Middleton. Will be going back again. 
 The very definition of a Wisconsin bar.  Good food and they make one of the best old fashioneds I've ever had.  I wish they were open on Sundays too. 
 Its Friday night...cold and snowing.   What  is there to do? Head to the Village Green.   Enjoy the Friday fish fry and yes an ice cold beer.   So lets start with the service.   It was very good.   I walked in at 5:06pm was immediatly greeted and placed my order within a few minutes.        By 5:10pm I had 3 pieces of hot cod french fries 2 hush puppies and coleslaw.   The meal was better then expected and exceeded expectations.   The Village Green is a traditional Wisconsin Tavern that has great service.   I am looking forward to next Friday already!   I forgot to mention that they have a decent selection of on tap beer.   I tried the Winter Skull pretty smooth! 
 As others have already stated I am rating this for what it is...a bar and grill not a fancy 5-Diamond restaurant.I chose the bacon cheese burger with grilled onions and some french fries; absolutely delicious!  The burger is juicy and tasty...I add some ketchup and mustard for good measure!  I sat in the bar area and had no problem getting service.  The bartender is quick and attentive; the place was packed and one bartender had the bar crowd and the sitting area crowd.  I also ordered a Capital Winter on tap and it was poured perfectly!I have been in the area for three years and I consistently return to the Village Green as the best burger in the area.  I like the simplicity of the burger and bun.  The meat is delicious and the bacon adds that extra umph!!!!  Also they have nightly specials and I try to target Tuesday (Sloppy Joes) and Thursday (Road Kill Burrito)...both are great!Quick consistent service very tasty food and a friendly atmosphere; you cannot go wrong. 
 I've been told they are known for their burgers but their menu hosts a smattering of great bar foods. Chicken wings chili seafood gumbo fish chicken in many forms salads and even some kids menu options.  I decided to try their cheese curds (great!) and the friday fish fry.  The hush puppies were too dry.  I'd recommend staying away from those.  The fish was good but the next visit will be their burger. 
 If you're looking for a super fancy place keep looking...this is your typical neighborhood tavern and it made me feel like I was back home in the Milwaukee area.  The best burgers in Madison...hands down!  Good fries and cheese curds too...they had a number of other dishes that sounded yummy too.  Super friendly staff.  We will definitely be back! 
 The Village Green I call it the VG for very good. If you want a good greasy burger crispy golden fries non-greasy crunchy cheese curds a nice selection of local brews on tap and fast friendly service this place is for you. 
 I work near this Walgreens and often find myself dropping-in to grab a quick water soda or bottle of meds (Tylenol Advil etc).  The location is clean and well lit which is a plus.The downsides:- All Walgreens are pricey- Slow checkout process despite having 4+ available registers/lanes- The intersection of Junction/Old Sauk is a pain to get in and out of- New \rewards system\ stinksAllow me to expand on the last \downsides\ item... Walgreens initiated a rewards system that allows you to earn points from purchases that can then be applied to \cash back\ rewards that can be used against future purchases.  Where this fails is with the posted specials.  You can't take advantage of the specials (like buy one get one free) unless you're a rewards system member.  I'm not a fan of that... I have about 800-billion rewards programs that I have to keep track of (and that keep track of me); the last thing I need is another rewards program.  I miss the good 'ole days when Walgreens used to offer bargains without the strings.I think I'm done visiting Walgreens.  It's convenient but the cons outweigh the pros. 
 I visit this Walgreens often since I work in the neighborhood. The employees are always very polite and helpful especially the 2 gentlemen and young woman who work the registers during the evening hours.  (I wish I could remember their names).  Get signed up for their rewards program....there are great deals to be had! 
 A Walgreen's is a Walgreen's. This one seemed to be well stocked clean and staff was nice and helpful (mostly dealt with pharmacy staff). The rewards program is a little pointless to me but it is easy enough to punch in your phone number while checking out. I don't bother trying to use the actual rewards card. Having the \Walgreen's\ off brand items definitely helps you save a little money. 
 My favorite Madison clothing store by far.  I coveted a pair of gold shoes they had over Christmas ($135!)  and managed to save enough to buy them....totally worth it!!  They are italian leather and SO beautiful.  Everything else in the store is the same way....it makes me wish I had unlimited funds and could get one of everything.  The guys clothing is fantastic too although getting your boyfriend to shell out that kind of money to look \metrosexual\ is sometimes a challenge. Something nice to keep in mind as well is that they have free alterations on non-sale clothing....I had a pair of jeans done and they actually put the detailing around the bottom back on....AMAZING!  5 stars. 
 My Experiences in this store have not been good for some years now.  GAP Banana and Old Navy used to make affordable and quality clothing but in the past few years the prices have increased and the quality has gone to shit.  Clothes I have bought have had their hems fall out after one wearing and their buttons fall off quite easily.  Not only is the quality bad but the service is horrendous.  Last time I was in the store a worker said hi to me but after looking around for a while never checked in with me and when I needed a fitting room they were locked and I had to wait almost 10 minutes to get the gals attention to let me in.  The last pair of shoes I bought there were quite comfortable but within the first 30 minutes of wear the heel feel off completely.  If you are looking for work attire/dress clothes I would recommend passing on Banana Republic and trying your luck at Macy's or another retailer. 
 When you hear Banana Republic you think quality clothing store?  At least that's what I think.  However BR in the mall is a shotty example for quality.  They are anything but quality.  The clothing in the entire Gap Inc. company has declined in quality over the years.  The service unforutnatly has also diminished.  The workers at BR I find are unfriendly unpersonable and not ever around.  Getting a fitting room in that place is a disaster.  I always have to wait for someone to be done using one so I get to one that is opened.  Nobody is ever back to there to unlock the doors.  I had a problem once with an associate or who I thought was an associate and asked to see the manager.  Well she was the manager.  Totally unacceptable for a store with such clout.  I don't know if all Banana Republics operate this way but if they do they will most certainly be losing my business. 
 I feel like I should preface this review by saying that my current resolution to eat better (mainly STARVING MYSELF until I fall asleep) has nothing to do with recent shall we say less than positive reviews for businesses in Madison. Even if I wasn't hungry all the time I'd still say this store blows and here's why. 1. Nobody greets you when you walk in. (Customer Service 101).2. You can walk around for 15 minutes with an armful of clothing and nobody will ask you if you need a fitting room. (Customer service 101 & Loss Prevention 101).3. Nobody will come by the fitting room to see how you're doing and if you need alternate sizes. (Customer Service 101 Loss Prevention 101 & Sales 101). I've been three times and each time sucked more than the time before. (Grammar 101). I started as a Gap Inc. employee in 1996 working my way up from Gap Baby to Gap Kids Gap and finally Banana Republic in 2009. I worked as a sales associate a visual specialist and most recently men's merchant in Arizona. The three times I've been here the store has always been in disarray which certainly doesn't create for a very stimulating shopping experience and the uninterested staff have made it so I'll simply only shop online now. Sorry BR you're store's bananas and you've lost me. 
 I Love Banana Republic... I love this location... I LOVE IT. Every time I am in here (which seems to be every week) I seem to find something. Now I will say that this location does seem to be understaffed most of the time so I will agree with Corey on the matter that it takes a while before you can talk to someone. However I feel that once you find someone they are extremely helpful at least in my experiences. They are always willing to find you the size you need and haven't taken too long to grab shoes or anything from the back.I will say over the holiday season they are a bit better but that is to be expected. Finally It can get a little messy in here when it is busy but again they seem to be understaffed which I feel for. I have actually seen one person consistently working here for about 2 years now and it seems like they never get a day off. So I think it is more a matter of staffing by the store owner or head manager. We'll see what the future brings for them but until then I will continue to shop here! 
 Disgusting. That's the only word that comes to mind after walking front of store to back and seeing piles upon piles of clothing and items askew on every table shelf and rack. I'd understand if it was 7pm on a Saturday (weekend) but this was Monday morning y'all and the place looked like the pits! What the heck BR? You are a mess! An absolute mess. And you're consistently a mess. I walked in today with the intent to buy a suit (40% your entire purchase... sign up for their emails) but I couldn't even shop the racks with crammed half on hangers half off hangars pants and jackets. This place needs an iron fist. A store manager who can shape this thing up and restore BRs name as a Gap Inc brand. Someone would have to tell me they did a complete 180 for me to return. 
 Don't hate me Corey...Ventured-in to look for a sweater or two; Wednesday afternoon around 2:00pm.+ Store was nearly empty save for a few employees+ Things were tidy and neat; very easy to browse through things+ Staff left me alone (I hate being hounded while shopping)+ Staff was available when I had a question+ 30% off all men's items- Pushed a bit hard to get me to sign-up for their club and card. Grrr. No means no?I think they took heed of Corey's review and comments. The store & inventory was in great shape. 
 A fun place to go for your birthday!  The wait staff is very friendly easy-going and kept checking on us.  We had the Garlic burger and the Teriyaki burger...very yummy....fries and pub fries are recommended. Nice to go for your birthday mug with unlimited beer/soda and the world's smallest ice cream sundae.  I'll definitely go every year. 
 My first Fish Fry!  Yum.  And they make Arnold Palmers too! 
 Watched the Packers here. Popular place for birthdays. Good food too... Seemed like a draft of smoke came in when the door opened which was annoying... But overall a great environment. 
 Maybe I missed something about this place but after three tries I just had to stop going back hoping I would finally feel the magic. The burgers are okay but there are better ones in Madison. The last time we were there my son's chicken sandwich was overcooked and they charged more money since he got it on a pretzel bun instead of the regular bun. Our burgers were unremarkable - not that flavorful or moist. The buffalo wings were greasy and actually not hot when we got them. And the last night we were there a Friday at about 6:00 the place was full and the service was terrible. As in waiting over fifteen minutes after I had piled all the dirty dishes at the end of the table as a hint that we were way done before the server came by wondering if we wanted anything else. And somehow with four people no alcoholic drinks two appetizers and four sandwiches our bill was over $70. That's US dollars. Before the tip. They charge extra for everything - ranch on the side cheese on a burger - everything. For a really marginal meal and lousy service that was way too much money. 
 You know I hate to do this but I have to agree with Vickey M.  The Gritty burgers are something of an acquired taste.  They taste good to me because they bring back memories of the 70s.   They do have good flavor but are somewhat messy and there are better burgers than the Gritty.   The bar was more fun when it was small.  We don't go there anymore because often it is so busy that we can't really enjoy the place like we used to.But I would stop by again for the Gritty Burger.I recently learned that the gritty burger recipe was changed in the 80s sometime?   Correct me if I'm wrong.   We did think the burger was somewhat different from what we remember.  Now we know why.  The old burger that everyone loved was way better than the new one.We think they need to enlarge the place and bring back the original burger if they still have the recipe.   The sauce was the bomb. 
 Tonight the fam got Nitty Gritty takeout and for me it was a disappointment. I had suggested the NG because I'd been craving chicken tenders all day. In the past NG's chicken appeared to be hand-breaded and had a decent dose of pepper in the breading to give it some flavor. Tonight's offering was a step above cafeteria chicken strips. Flat factory-breaded flavorless and all of them with that gross gooey translucent strip of whatever you get in cheap chicken. Making it worse was the addition of soggy fries and not-as-good-as-I-remembered Gritty sauce. For almost $10 I'm calling this a total bust. Yet another restaurant I can cross off the list for upping price and cutting quality. 
 This Nitty Gritty I would have to say is not as good as the downtown madison one and the sole reason is that it is way too small for how many people generally go there. Also their dartboard and such is not well placed and becomes a nuisance when trying to return to the bar for another drink. They have good drink specials and its still got that classic nitty atmosphere but not great... 
 I was in town for training at Epic. Wanted a bar with good food to watch baseball playoffs. I remembered the Nitty Gritty near campus from a previous visit so tried the one in Middleton close to my hotel.BBQ Pulled Pork sandwich - Outstanding!Waffle fries - ExcellentCapital Amber draft - very goodAtmosphere - FunService - great.Too bad it wasn't my birthday.It seemed that everyone there had a birthday celebration in the group.  That's their thing.  I'll go back even if it's not my birthday. 
 Their prices have gone up.  The quality has gone down.  Medium-well burger was well done (crispy burnt).  23 bucks for one gritty burger one small cheese curd order and two draft beers.  Wow times have changed.  They just lost my future business.  Judging by how few people were there it looks like they may be losing a lot of business.  Such a shame because it used to be fantastic. 
 Delicious pork sandwich with coleslaw and very attentive service at modest prices in a rustic atmosphere 
 This place is great for birthdays. You get your glass mug filled with beer soda or juice with unlimited refills while also getting a very small ice cream sundae at the end.  The burgers were very tasty and cooked as requested. Our server was very good and on top of refills and food came out of the kitchen pretty quick.   I liked the atmosphere in the dining area with tv's mounted throughout the restaurant.  The bar area was not huge but I could see it being a fun atmosphere later on in the night. 
 Nuh uh. Nope. No no no. My daughter wanted to eat here for her birthday this year having eaten at the one downtown successfully 4 years ago. Her birthday her pick. Plus she delights in the free mug of soda and balloon. She's a birthday sell-out and I think that must be how they suck you in. But I digress. Our order took an aggravatingly long time to arrive and our glasses remained empty after having drunk their contents while waiting. There was a Packers game on and many of the wait staff were watching that. I don't know if that was the hold up but it was a bit irritating. When our meals finally arrived my children discovered that the insides of their burgers were very pink. Waaaaay too pink for medium well which they ordered. It was scary pink and super soft--like raw hamburger generally is. When I told our waiter about it he was completely uninterested in helping fix the situation and instead argued with me about it for quite a while finally saying \That's what medium well looks like\ in a tone that suggested that I was simply too stupid to know the difference. I'm not. Finally I convinced him to humor me and take them back to be cooked through. He did so with a smidgen of contempt.As a side-note my husband's burger was to be well done and was also pink though not raw.Still no drink refills.No one offered a discount a refund a free soda while we waited and especially not an apology. Obviously we won't be back. 
 I discovered BrandonEyes through word of mouth and I had an incredibly positive experience which will result in a continuation of my patronage.PRODUCT: First their product selection is second to none. They have styles for anyone's taste - fun practical trendy high fashion you name it. As a result of their availability I was able to find a pair of Ogi drill mounts that fit me wonderfully as well as a pair of polarized Kate Spade sunglasses (non-RX).CUSTOMER SERVICE:The optician that assisted me Ben has a natural talent for consultative sales. There was absolutely zero pressure involved and he helped me identify two products that genuinely fit my personality appearance and lifestyle. I was grateful that he was honest and as a result of his expertise I left with two pairs of eyewear that I can't wear enough.EYE EXAMS:I do not have experience with eye exams provided at Brandon Eyes. I usually purchase from an eyewear boutique in Milwaukee (which is where I live). My prescription from my original Doctor of Optometry was still current but I wanted to try Brandon Eyes. Needless to say my prescription was transferred (with no complications) to Brandon Eyes and I was able to buy eyewear.I suggest visiting Brandon Eyes for any eyewear need and ask for Ben though I am confident that any of the employees will be able to help. 
 Always have great service.  Feel like my eyes are checked very thoroughly. 
 For those that are interested GVSS has been the single most influential change on my daily lifestyle I ever decided to make. It was a low risk decision given that it's non-invasive compared to any type of surgery. However I did not anticipate how quickly I would experience the positive impacts. I was a soft contact lens wearer and alternated with glasses. Since going to GVSS I have far less worries including dry or tired eyes from frequent computer use and travel. I also have the freedom of feeling I will never need to wear glasses or travel with them as a back-up ever again. Unexpectedly the clarity of vision amazes me including night vision. I also appreciate the fabulous team at Brandon Eyes who always manages to impress. 
 Doctor Brandon is fantastic. his equipment is first class and he will help you with anything. He also won't sell you things you don't need. He is the one Doctor I have that I feel like actually listens to me and my family and helps us with all the health problems we have to find solutions. Focusing Allergies diet help for eyes etc. They always offer snacks and drink when we are there and see us fast and get us in fast. They are not inexpensive but their glasses are quality. They don't sell any plastic lenses. So you are not going to find cheap glasses here. That being said my glasses have been dropped and stepped on and never break. 
 Dr Brandon has been my optometrist for I don't know maybe 8 years or more and he is always friendly pleasant professional and efficient.  He has lots new gadgets and fancy testing equipment I always feel my eyes are in good hands there.  I have also bought my prescription glasses there many times they are fairly expensive but you get what you pay for I have never had a problem with glasses I bought from Brandon Eyes.  Great customer service too!  The staff and opticians are knowledgeable and competent as well as good natured and helpful! 
 Ok I heard from someone that Culver's had cheese curds.  (For those that don't know what a cheese curd is then ready this wiki article.  Don't worry I didn't know about them until I came to Wisconsin.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cheese_curds)    So when class got out early today I decided that I needed to hunt for the elusive curds.  The easiest place to come was here.  But the curds are not the traditional curds they were fried curds like fried mozzarella.   A nice snack but not exactly was I was looking for .... on with the search. 
 Recycling in the restaurant.  Our favorites are concrete shakes the new sweet potato fries grilled cheese and cheeseburger.  Very nice & friendly staff.  Food was brought out quick.  Clean tables & restrooms. 
 The food here is pretty much just like every other Culver's that I've ever been to.  It's a chain it has to be that way so I don't really care.  The cheese curds are good in theory but their deep-fried heavenliness will vanquish your appetite pretty quickly and then you won't be able to enjoy your greasy cheesy mayo-ey burger.  Venturing away from the french fries is generally not a good idea.The pork tenderloin sandwich is godlike.  The tenderloin is about twice as big as the bun that it's served on.  I feel like this is my own little secret since I've never seen anybody else ordering or eating it.  Now the cat is out of the bag.This place recently did a renovation with a bunch of fake stone veneers and trendy curvy decor all over the place.  Not bad but I preferred the previous \nursing home meets McDonalds\ vibe they had going.  They did manage to improve the layout slightly so that the soda dispenser is no longer right in the way of where people are waiting for their to-go orders.  It still gets pretty nuts at lunchtime though so prepare to drive around the parking lot a few times looking for a place.One personal complaint I have with this place is I keep seeing old high school classmates working there.  I pretend not to recognize them. 
 I don't get it? I don't understand the fascination with Culvers? The food costs twice that of Wend's Mc D's Hardys or Burger King and with the doubling of the price it has double of the grease! They figured if you \butter toast\ the buns you can serve stale bread and know one will know. If you order through the drive through you will be given a number and have to wait. Worst yet if you order a sundae you will get it first while you wait 15-20 minutes for you order to cook. Just in time for you to enjoy you sundae as soup. Worst yet it is not ice cream it is \custard\. A frank'en food knock off of real ice cream. Oh and the fry's are soggy. I don't get it. Amongst my friend I'm apparently the only one that doesn't like this place? 
 I love Culver's. This is fact.The thing that makes this Culver's different from the rest is that they had offered Wisconsin-fare i.e. Wisconsin Cheese Soup. Wow was this fantastic! The facility was clean the employees were very happy and the food was very tasty!I'm glad that I can find quality fast-food yet sit-down food across the nation! 
 This is the best Culver's around because it is company owned (not franchised) and they use this store for training new managers so everyone really knows their job and they are not miserable like most fast food employees.  And the food is almost always perfect. 
 This place is the bomb.   Fresh burgers and the cheese curds are melt in your mouth perfect.   The service is way above average and the restaurant is very clean.   I have enjoyed Culvers for years when we would visit on vacation.   Now we live here and we make a weekly visit to Culvers for dinner.   Of course you have to top the meal off with a custard.   It is a fast food restaurant but it is way above what you would expect from a fast food restaurant. 
 Affordable fast and yummy! Loved their Deluxe burger and chocolate frozen custard! Choco frozen custard was soo smooth and creamy--you won't be able to look at ice cream the same! p.s. their cheese curds are pretty good too! 
 As the previous reviewer mentioned this is a newly remodeled facility which has turned out wonderfully. All new equipment and works great. I have been using this place since I discovered it about a year ago. The remodeling took place in November and December 2012. Previously this was just car wash station with about 8 self serve stalls and 2 or three automatic. The remodeling removed some of the self service stalls (there are approx. 4 now) and used this space for a new Laundramat and a dog wash station which i hear is one of the only ones in the Madison area. I have been there mostly on Sundays and they have an attendant who is an older gentlemen and is very friendly and fun to shoot the breeze with if you use the self service stations. Personally I believe you cant get a better car wash than using the self service stations if you have the time and strength (your arms do get a little sore after!). For 5 dollars I believe you get 12 minutes which is plenty of time to do a thorough wash rinse wax and time to use scrubber on front end/rims as needed. The soap is not watered down like other places. They also take credit card at the self service station so no need to fill a sock full of quarters. The only other self service I know of in the Madison area is off Rimrock road which is cheaper but for less time in a rough area in terrible shape  and the soap is MUCH more watered down. I have also used the laundramat there recently and received exceptional serivce. They have a special going on in March that all dryers are free! All new machines therefore clothes come out smelling and looking great. In addition this is a full service laundramat therefore there is a regular attendant on duty who will do the washing drying and foling for you. I believe the charge was 49 cents for every lb. They also have a promotion going on right now for the first 10lbs are free. It is a very convenient service if you have a lot of errands to run and dont want to waste an afternoon at the laundramat. I had quite a bit of laundry one day and the attendant gave me a very good deal in addition to the 10 lbs free. Make sure to tip the attendant if you use this service she did an excellent job and saves you a ton of time!I have not used the dog wash as I do not have a dog but I imagine it could be something fun to do.The only negative I have about this place is that is hard to get in and out of as you have to pull in behind the building and turn the corner of the building at a blind spot. Its about as narrow as one lane and people come in and out of same drag. 
 1. They moved and their website still shows the old address.  The new location is \hidden\ behind a larger building and to get into the salon you have to enter in through an \outer\ building; it's a suite inside of a building. Didn't matter much since they were closed by the time I found the place.2. They were closed by 4:50pm and they don't have their hours posted anywhere at their new location. I'd refer to their website for info but it's apparently out of date.I love Aveda products; I will apparently have to go elsewhere to buy them. 
 I bought a Groupon for a half price reflexology pedicure.This is an Aveda salon so if you like their products you at least have that going for you. The salon isn't the easiest to find- it's a plain storefront in a strip mall. Pedicures are done in a small room in back. There are two chairs and they bring a bowl of water for your feet. It's not bad but it's right by the salon's back room so you can hear employees talking on their breaks. It's not the most well-ventilated room either so it's a bit warm.What I was expecting was something more than a regular pedicure since with was supposed to be a \reflexology\ pedicure. What I got what less that what most basic nail places do- no scrubbing exfoliation or even light massage.  They put Aveda lotion on my legs at the end and lightly worked on my nails and cuticles before putting on polish.They didn't even use a basecoat or topcoat on my nails which is really strange for a salon! I would never pay full price for even a regular pedicure here. They have a very small polish selection as well. 
 Simple relaxing surroundings for a good pedicure. 
 For a salon with a name as refreshing as Tangles Salon this business sure has a its Goldilocks well....tangled. Although this location carries the Aveda name it appears to be buckling under its weight. There are many issues at this salon and only a few will be mentioned here.Tangles Salon has had a somewhat tortured existence here in the Madison area what with experiencing not-so-smooth management changes relocating attempts massive employee walkouts and even a fire in the past 2 years alone. One begins to wonder how they have stayed afloat as long as they have.After a devastating fire destroyed Tangles it was clear that many once loyal customers had been caught in the middle of the chaos. Some arrived at the salon for their appointments only to find the building in charred ruins and most never got a courtesy call from the owners. Furthermore the fire raises red flags related to safety Although not mentioned in the police report many ex-clients have speculated that the entire situation was suspicious.A receptionist named Deeon was at the front desk when I last entered Tangles. He welcomed me to the salon but his demeanor was cold and businesslike. He seemed very out of place in the salon and didn't seem to really enjoy being there as he led me to the chair. I waited for 10 minutes for my stylist to come over from the very noisy break room I was unfortunate enough to have been next to. As I was waiting I noticed an accumulation of hair and dust around the edges of the station. There were also many dead insects in the overhead fluorescent lighting indicating lack of cleanliness throughout the salon.On the plus side Tangles does have some talented stylists. But without the proper management and support their work remains spotty and inconsistent at best.I wanted to like this salon but found it difficult to look past the issues. It is important to note that it is difficult for any business to survive changing locations multiple times. However when combined with the suspicious fire the disgruntled clients and the unstable behind the scenes management it is safe to say that Tangles needs a deep conditioning treatment if they want to remain relevant in this city. 
 I recently purchased a Group On for a salon pedicure and called to make the appointment which they were booked two weeks out.  I made the appointment and the day before the appointment they contacted me to  tell me that the nail tech that I was scheduled with called in sick.  When I stated that my appointment was for the next day at 11:30  they indicated that she was going to be out then as well.  Ok I was fine with this and they offered to get me in at 2:00 or 3:00.   I indicated that I would have to check my calendar and would call them right back but she put me in  for 3:00 temporarly.  I called back 10 minutes later to let them know that I could not make 3:00 work due an appointment I had at work and would need to have my pedicure at 2:00.  This was done via voice mail and asked them to call me back to confirm this was still available.  I did not receive a call back and followed up with a new call to Tangles the following morning which was the day of my appointment and I left a new voice mail message to confirm that they received my previous voice mail and please call me back.   I did not receive a call so one would assume that they had me down for 2:00.  I took a late lunch from work and drove over to their location on Whitney Way which is a good 20 minute drive and when I arrived was told they had me down for 3:00 and that they were booked and could not get me at 2:00.   At this point I was very frustrated due to the lack of not responding to my voice mail messages. The receptionist told me she was aware of my calls but did not have the time to call me back since they were so busy.    This took an hour of my day and a gallon of gas to drive there and  was not offered any  compensation for their lack of not informing me that they were now booked at 2:00 even though I told them I would call right back to confirm either 2:00 or 3:00.      This is the poorest customer service I have ever recieved by far from a salon!!   I wonder how they plan on staying in business when they treat clients in this matter and have no regard for their time and money ($3.80 a gallon for gas).  I understand that sometimes it is necessary to adjust an appointment but the lack of respect for my time is over the top for me.   Also when a salon signs up to offer a Group On deal I would assume the goal for  doing this is to try and build their business wth new clients.   If they do not have the capablity to handle new clients then they should not be offering this type of promotion.     Not A New Client! 
 Aveda salons in my opinion have a reputation of being soothing presentable and tasteful.  Unfortunately Tangles Salon lacked all three of those attributes.  I'd been to the former Tangles locations for pedicures a handful of times and decided to visit their new location when a Living Social coupon was recently offered.  I received a shellac manicure partial highlight and conditioning treatment and based on what I spent on the Living Social coupon I am satisfied with the results but if I had paid full price for these services I would be very dissatisfied.  There was just something \off\ about my entire experience at Tangles.  The salon and nail room looked messy and unorganized as did most of the hair stylists and nail technicians.  I didn't get that \Aveda vibe\ at all more like the \Cost Cutters vibe\ (nothing against CC but if I'm paying $75 for highlights I'd like the atmosphere to match the price).  Next time I'll resist the lure of a good deal and go elsewhere. 
 The best Italian food in town hands down.  They've got homemade sausage that's the best I've ever had and they use fresh basil like there's no tomorrow.  My girlfriend's favorite is the pasta with giant prawns and pancetta.   This place is too good for Madison. 
 I always crave Vin Santo even though I haven't been there for years I still have family back in Middleton and every time we visit we have a feast! I truly believe it offers some of the best home made Italian food in the midwest. A real hidden Gem. And considering multiple family members have worked there in the past we know what a tight ship is run and how genuine the owners are in their hospitality and insistence for high quality in everything they do. Please give it a try and DO NOT pass on the breadpudding/tiramisu for dessert : ) be warned that it may ruin you for life on anyone else's recipe! 
 Vin Santo rules!  This is a great casual restaurant that is owned/operated a local couple.  She can often be found running the front of the house and he is in the kitchen.  Their passion is reflected in the quality of their food and the high level of service provided to their guests.Their food is some of the best in the area - they focus on Northern Italian cusine.  It's simple fresh and delicious!  They always offer a variety of specials.  The portions are huge!  You definitely feel like you are getting your money's worth.  I have never left without leftovers.  My favorite dish is the Scampi Gabriella (jumbo shrimp sauteed with garlic pancetta and scallions finished with a white wine cream sauce served over linguini).  Awesome!! 
 This is easily the best Italian food in the Madison area.  I've never had a bad meal (or even a bad bite!) on a visit to Vin Santo.The seafood fettucini is really heavy on the seafood (they're not trying to stiff their customers!) and they basically serve BRICKS of incredible tiramisu.  Everything tastes so fresh and home-made and they offer a much more interesting menu than most \Italian\ restaurants in Madison.I'm so happy that this locally-owned business has found great success - they have lots of regulars (like I used to be!) who keep coming back for the delicious food big servings friendly staff and relaxed atmosphere.  Vin Santo is a MUST for me when I'm in the area. 
 Delicious!! Huge portions of very authentic Italian dishes.  All entrees salads apps and desserts can easily be shared.  Very cozy and wonderful servers.  Can't wait to go back! 
 I've now eaten twice at Vin Santo.  Both times the waitstaff has been professional helpful and speedy.  The music is at an appropriate level the atmosphere is cozy the decor tasteful.  The wine list is extensive and many dishes on the menu seem appetizing and imaginative at first glance.  With all of these elements going for it I have high expectations for the food.  Although some of it is delicious some significant problems have arisen when I've dined there.I have had both the bruschetta and the mussels as appetizers.  The bruschetta portion was a bit smaller than I expected but it packs a large amount of flavor into the bites.  The tomatoes tasted fresh and sweet and balanced well against the (presumably) homemade pesto.  The fresh bread served at the table is similarly warm with a crisp crust and toothsome interior.  The mussels are flavorful and delicious but they don't come with any bread to sop up the flavorful broth that remains after the mussels have been eaten.  Our plate was whisked away before we had a chance to ask for any bread to go with the sauce.Two of my companions ordered the Ravioli al Vin Santo; both liked and finished the dish.  It is one of four vegetarian options (the Fettucini alla Putenesca does not list meat but I've never heard of a putanesca sauce made without anchovies) which was a welcome surprise for the vegetarian with whom I dined.  One companion ordered the Insalata di Caesare (which also has unlisted anchovies in the dressing) and found it flavorful if unimaginative.  A fourth companion ordered the Lasagna del Giorno (that day it was with roasted chicken) and savored every bite.  A fifth companion ordered the Fettucini alla Putenesca of which I tried a bite.  The spinach fettucini was fresh and delicious and the sauce was perfectly salty.  My entree the Campenelli il Diavolillo was pretty awful.  The combination of meat and seafood in a dish can be done artfully but this felt like a clumsy mishmash of shrimp chicken and Italian sausage.  The sausage was very sweet and seemed to lack enough oregano basil and garlic.  It clashed notably with the rest of the dish.  The shrimp and chicken were both cooked well and were tender and juicy.  The pasta was fresh and tasty.  It was really a shame that the \spicy garlic broth\ as described by the menu translated into nearly an inch of oil at the bottom of the dish making the entire dish almost inedible.  All portions were huge.The desserts are delicious.  The tiramisu which I sampled on my first visit is fluffy and sweet.  I tried to order it on my return visit but the waitress told me she had sold the last piece to a table that came in after us.  Since we arrived at 5 p.m. this came as quite a shock.  It seems unlikely that they started the evening's service with more than one piece of tiramisu and seems like profoundly poor planning.  The bread pudding while not much to look at is also delicious though it is so rich that by the time we finished one portion (between three people) it almost felt like i was eating a stick of butter rolled in cinnamon.I can't say I'll be back anytime soon.  I have to disagree with Zenide R.'s assertion that it's \easily the best Italian food in the Madison area.\  For the price both Lombardino's and Tutto Pasta make better Italian food and I shall stick to those restaurants in the future. 
 I went here for a friend's graduation dinner. The seating area was filled. We had reservations and they were right on time. The service and level of professionalism was great. The menu is vegan friendly with a few delicious options. I tried a friend's baked eggplant dish and it was by far the best eggplant course I've ever had. Many people in my party ordered the lasagna and loved it. I ordered the pesto and was disappointed. The homemade noodles were good but the pesto didn't have the pop of basil I was hoping for. Despite the pesto sauce the experience as a whole was great. I would definitely recommend this establishment. 
 I went to Vin Santo with some work colleagues while in Middleton for a conference and it was terrific!  The restaurant is small with dimmed lights which makes for a cozy setting.  The hostess and waitress were very welcoming.We arrived around 7:45 on a Tuesday and we were the only people in the restaurant which seemed unusual but maybe it was because it was a weekday?  Anyway I ordered the scampi carciofi which consisted of shrimp garlic artichokes olive oil and cherry tomatoes served over spinach fettuccine.  The portion was HUGE and the food was fresh and very tasty.  My colleagues had the eggplant parmigiana which looked and smelled delicious and a chicken dish that I can't remember the name of but which also looked pretty good.  I'm not sure Vin Santo is the best place for a business dinner but for a romantic date it's perfect.  I will make sure to come back here whenever I am in the Madison area and I would recommend it to anyone looking for a hearty delicious Italian meal. 
 We fell into Vin Santo on a busy Friday night before a recent marathon that the PIC was running in.  Despite the wait (45 minutes) the owner (a sweet and thoughtful English woman) made every effort to accommodate us and move us up the list even asking other patrons if they minded waiting just a couple more minutes.  As for the food none of us could complain about being short-changed...especially the PIC who was carb-loading.  The plates were absolutely delicious and huge (I thoroughly enjoyed the Salsiccia Rossa--pasta with so much homemade Italian sausage that I had to take it home without noodles!).  We all walked away thinking we couldn't have picked a better spot nor gotten a better deal.The decor was very nice and clean and the staff as mentioned previously was very helpful.  We'll definitely be back. 
 Great food large portions and attentive staff. 
 We love Vin Santo and have gone there about every month or two for 3 years. Small place warm and inviting and the lovely host/owner Clarissa greets us like family when we walk in. Her husband/chef makes fabulous and imaginative sauces to accompany the comforting Italian dishes. Their italian sausage is probably the best we've had anywhere (including fancy places in LA NYC Philly etc). There are special lasagna fish and ravioli dishes every night. The lasagna is cooked to order so it takes a while but is so worth it. If you are lucky enough to go on an Italian sausage lasagna night the portion is enormous and every bite (yes every bite) includes sausage and cheese - it's the bomb. I had a veal ravioli in a butter sage sauce recently that was fabulous and unlike some pricey new Italian places where the portion is 5 or so ravioli this dish had 10 or 12 large ones. In fact all the portions are large and really reasonably priced. Their wine selection is pretty sparse and we haven't had good look finding one we like. But that is the only down side to what is always a fantastic and totally filling meal.  We are usually too full for dessert but they do make their own tiramisu which is light fluffy creamy and enormous. Get one if you have someone to share it with. Recently they have added a couple of desserts including a caramel cheesecake which I hope I am not too full to try someday. 
 Our family of four dined at Vin Santo the Monday after the new year.  We expected it to be quiet but it was a happy busy place.  The lone chef in the kitchen kept food coming at a steady pace quicker then anticipated.  The two wait staff was attentive friendly and very professional.    We had a white pizza appetizer loved the dried tomato pesto.  We each ordered an entree which were all very good.  The  fine sauces ingredients and preparation was far superior/delicious compared to the usual Italian restaurant!!  Portions were very large so three of us enjoyed them again the next day.  We enjoyed tastes of two desserts tirimisu and bread pudding.  Again treats for the next day.Great food great service and a casual friendly atmosphere a restaurant  to return to again and again!! 
 Great Italian eatery. The atmosphere is homey and intimate. I had the spaghetti with pine nuts olives capers and anchovies in homemade tomato sauce. This dish was alright. I liked the idea of adding pine nuts but the olives AND capers made it too salty for my tastes. I had some leftovers and they were definitely better the next day even if they were still a little salty. DEFINITELY get the Tirimasu cake while there. It was wonderful. Not too rich but soaked in expresso and very flavorful. There is a mascarpone cheese based whip cream which is light and not too sweet that makes the cake amazing. 
 My boyfriend surprised me for Valentines day here impressive I know :).  It was like we were back in Italy.  It's a tiny little place with very authentic italian dishes.  They make the lasagna fresh in individual servings when you order it.  It was amazing.  I had the seafood pasta (my standard order) which was HUGE.  I mean you should definitely split this.  We ended the night with the tiramisu .... and let me tell you I am a tiramisu connoisseur (i pretty much order it every time it's on the menu) and this was the BEST tiramisu I have ever had.  It even beats the stuff I had in Italy.  All in all this a perfect romantic date place and I would definitely return. 
 \Ummm Good. Yummy. Tasty. What is this delicious piece? Do you wanna try this? It's good.\Those are pretty much what my bf and I said to each other during our Valentine's day dinner. No footsies or romantic hand holding but just shuffling forks with an extreme eager to try each other's plate. Vin Santo is THAT good. I got seafood Ravioli with pine nuts which completely blew me away. It is by far the best Italian food I've ever had. They made their own bread: crisp and tender. Their Tiramisu will brighten up all of your taste bulbs. Appetizers and desserts are made for sharing so be friendly to each other less conservative and share. Go make a reservation now. You'll love this place. 
 Party of 4 celebrating a birthday...Seated immediately. Intimate seating some chairs a little close. Food was delivered piping hot and service was good. Food we had was the lasagne(huge portions) and salmon and one spaghettti all outstanding. No salads but they looked good. The only annoyance was the chef/owner? Numerous times during our dinner he was grumbling/shouting loud enough for us to hear from our table kinda shouting at his sous chef or someone in the kitchen and on several occasions came out and sat and kinda watched people eating..(weird)and grumbled to the hostess about not doing her job.In appearance she seemed to be very efficient at her job and had stopped at our table and asked how our food was etc. Upon leaving he was in the front of the house grumbling again....Not a good thing to do! I would go again based on the food but hope this manleaves his sour attitude out of the customers face..Tiramusu amazing. Fed all four of us with no problem. 
 Was up in Madtown from Chicago to run the Crazylegs and used that as a nice excuse to carbo load.Was absolutely blown away by the food here.  There is plenty of great Italian in Chicago and this was equal to better than anything I've had in Little Italy.We split a couple caesar salads Salsiccia Rossa Pollo Tuscana and Linquini Pecorino.  Everything was incredible fresh and tasty.  Pasta was cooked to a PERFECT al dente on all dishes.  Nothing was oversauced.  The homemade Italian sausage was awesome (wish it was spicier). Honestly some of the best homemade Italian I've ever had.Ambiance is great feels like you're in someone's home.  The tables and chairs look like a collection from a garage sale... mean that in a good way.  There'a a really tiny bar upfront that seats 4 people.Do NOT miss the tiramisu-- simple sensational.  Canoli was good but was my least favorite part of the meal.  Shell was a little too overcooked for me and found the filling to be good but a little gritty.All in all easy 4 if not 4.5 stars.  Will be back next time up in the area. 
 Adam was my server and did a great job of suggesting things as well as being a helpful opinion when I was choosing between one dish or another...-Calamari was heavenly and really hearty and heavy...this is not the kind of calamari that you get at Olive Garden or most Italian restaurants...this was heavenly...perfect bit of spiciness and the portion was enormous-Scampi Gabriela...was amazing...the pasta was perfectly al dente...and the shrimp were huge...a legitimate dinner portion that you had to take home-Bread Pudding for dessert...not at all the type that you get at other restaurants again...this was mushy and didn't resemble the bread pudding I'm use to...but it was actually the best bread pudding I've ever had...it was simply mouthwatering-I had a glass of pinot noir with my dinner and it was a great accompaniment to my mealOne of the owners...Clarissa came by and personally asked how I liked the food and the service...we had a long chat...told her what I loved and a few pointers...she has the same name as my mom so I instantly felt a connection with her...This is a MUST when in town...I will definitely be back! 
 I would love to rate their food but never got the opportunity.  Happened to stop there on a Saturday evening at about 5:45p and could not even get in the door because the hostess was blocking the area with a party of four.  Instead of taking the party aside so we could enter and I should point out I was on crutches she had us wait outside until she could seat them.  We entered AND STEPPED ASIDE so others could enter.  There were three in a our party.  When she asked if we had reservations I replied no  and she commented NO?  You KNOW IT IS SATURDAY.  I wanted to say yes yesterday was Friday and tomorrow is Sunday.  Instead I replied that I was TERRIBLY sorry i did not realize i needed a reservation and she once again reminded me it was SATURDAY.  I had never been there and did not realize that it was a quaint small place.  Had I known I would certainly made a reservation.  I probably will not make a reservation and try the menu since the hostess obviously thought I did not know what day it was.  Yes it is probably my loss but I don't enjoy being insulted. 
 I can't think of anything bad to say about Vin Santo! The prices are the same as Olive Garden but the food is 10x the quality and 5x as authentic!  I have eaten at Vin Santo five times now and I am never disappointed everything I have had is delicious and the dessert (bread pudding tiramisu) is to die for.  The owner is very sweet and accommodating and she is there everytime I go it's a local family owned business with world class cuisine! 
 Really a wonderful Italian Food experience.Everything was delicious.  Service was attentive but not overly stuffy.Bread pudding is unattractive but super delicious.Price is high but worth it. 
 Everything was baked fresh so expect a little bit of a longer wait but well worth it. Very generous portions -- best plan would probably be to get salads and split an entree or plan to bring some home with you. I had the italian sausage lasagna which was very very good. 
 Outstanding! This was our first time here and it was great. The server was very nice and responsive (he could have known a little more about the wine selection but that wasn't a big deal). The food was great light sauces and tons of flavor. We will definitely be back! 
 This is my new favorite restaurant in the Madison area.  Everything that crossed our table from the fresh pastas to the delicious sauces was a treat.  The portions were generous and the prices reasonable.  The calamari in the appetizer was tender and delicious in a rich and spicy tomato/fennel sauce.  The puttanesca sauce was dense with olives and the whole cloves of roasted garlic were a real treat.  The bread pudding was very good but for me was a little heavy on the cinnamon.  I think I'll go with the Tiramisu next time.  Our water was pleasant and attentive.  The atmosphere was casual and cozy/romantic...  but I would rather see real candles on the tables vs the battery operated tea lights. 
 GET THE BREAD PUDDING!!!...This is a nice restaurant that is cramped and casually decorated. The food is the stand out. The front is run by one of the owners and her service is very brief as she seats you and quickly moves on to the next task. The waitresses do a great job with the specials and describing the menu. Food is delivered in an acceptable amount of time. You can see the chef and the kitchen through the window between the kitchen and the dining room which is always fun. Their red sauce has a bit of spicy heat to it. My wife and I really do like this place for its great food and for its character. 
 Average food good service poor ambience. If you want something a lot better and don't mind the extra bucks go around the corner to Louisianne's. 
 Fresh Italian food with a emphasis on fish dishes and cream sauces. 
 I had an unbelievable experience yesterday. I went to Vin Santo hoping to order some food to go. Upon brief greeting the owner informed us that they \don't do takeout on the weekend\. This is astonishing and something that has never happened to me before.  I am a foodie an have dined on 5 different continents including Michelin rated restaurants. Shocked we went to Villa Dolce where the owner was very accommodating to our take out request. The food was delicious and very reasonably priced. Your loss Vin Santo. We are never coming back. 
 All I ever want is to go to a restaurant and get a giant bowl of fresh pasta that is stuffed with seafood and that's what I got! They are super duper friendly here.  It is a nice restaurant but not stuffy at all.  Leave the tuxes at home boys. The atmosphere is more casual and quaint. The dishes are more rustic Italian rather than fancy schmansy Italian. The bread pudding comes a little messy but so good the table will definitely fight for it.There isn't much seating so be sure to make a reservation ahead of time. You can even do it online so that's cool. Plus the aroma is completely mouth watering.  Can't wait to go back there. Need. More. Pasta. 
 Great food portions could be smaller. A little pricey for Middleton. Would try somewhere else next time but would also not hesitate to return. 
 One of Middleton's hidden gems.  It's our favorite place to go for special occasions! Be sure to try the \lasagna of the day\. It's always worth it. 
 Does not live up to a recent review in Madison paper.  Cons: Too pricey & ala carte.  The pasta dishes in range $15- $20. The entrees: $20 - 30. The decor needs fresh paint and new carpet  and the restroom slightly grotty. Server forgot to put in some of our order.  My ravioli vin santo was lacking flavor.  Need to serve parmesan cheese with the bread & oil.Plus: Nice people.  Good Tuscan mushroom soup.For the tiny storefront family restaurant it is priced too high which sets your expectations higher and does not live up to those expectations.  It would be fine for your corner Italian joint for everyday meals if they offered a salad with the meal and cut their $$. 
 Unbelievably disappointed.  I'm in town for business and went on a week night.  They were not terribly busy but as a solo diner I was treated quite poorly.  Mostly ignored during my meal I had to get up to chase someone down just for a water refill.  Not once did anyone check on my meal (I would have loved a second glass of wine) which wasn't stellar anyway.  I did stop and tell the woman at the front that not every diner has the luxury of being able to eat with family or friends and that I felt my service was horrible.  Maybe it'll spare the next person eating alone and hoping for good service.I travel to Madison Wi frequently for work and I can tell you that they'll not get repeat business from me. 
 Vin Santo is a good but small Italian restaurant in Middleton.There's a larger selection of pastas at this place than most other Italian restaurants in the area. But other than that it seems like the standard Italian. The lasagna is okay but small. But most of the pasta dishes are legit and are served with good portions. Service is kind of slow and I'd recommend getting a reservation on weekends.Nonetheless dessert is great. Though expensive their Italian bread pudding and tiramisu are huge and tasty. 
 I absolutely loved this little restaurant! Its tucked away and has a very intimate atmosphere. The Italian food tastes homemade and authentic.This is a great place for a date but not for a family. 
 The food is very good but overpriced.My wife's favorite dessert is bread pudding and I was told this place has the best bread pudding around and it did not disappoint it was excellent. The food was also very good. My wife ordered mushroom and onion ravioli and her dish was better than mine. I ordered a pasta dish with sauteed shrimp spicy italian sausage and chicken. It was also excellent but I thought it could've done without the chicken. I started with a caesar salad and it tasted really fishy. Also the portions are huge if you're going with one other person you could probably split everything.The service was excellent but the decor wasn't very appealing and as other reviewers have mentioned it's a very small space. I'd check it out especially to try the bread putting but it's not a must. 
 Nice place.  Like others said not really that impressive on the inside the tables are really jammed in there.  I guess that ok if you don't mind you waitresses butt in your face and food when she is at the table next to you.  I ordered pasta with scallops shrimp mussels and calamari with a slightly spicy tomato sauce.  It was ok.  The pasta was cooked perfect.  And again like others said it really lacked salt.  The seafood was good lots of mussels could have used more shrimp and scallops and a lot less squid!  My wife had the special of giant homemade ravioli with a caramelized onion and portabello mushrooms in a balsamic sauce.  This was really tasty.  The bread pudding is amazing!  Not pretty to look at but delicious!  The coffee is great too!  Would give more stars if they used a little more salt and a few less tables.  I would have also liked to see a few more meat choices.  The menu is really mostly seafood and chicken.  A few sausage offerings but no other choices of meat.  A nice steak would do wonders. 
 With all of the Italian restaurants in Madison It's hard for me to give this place more than 3 stars. We started out with Mussels that were served in a butter sauce. The mussels tasted a little bit fishy for my liking. For my main course I had veal tortellini. The better half had a shrimp pasta in a white cream sauce. Her dish was far btter than mine. For desert we had bread pudding and tiramisu. Both were excellent.  My Biggest gripes about this place were the kitchen is super small so it can take quite a while to get your food. Also they have very few options for kids. 
 BEWARE: SERVING SIZES ARE GINORMOUS!We did not know this^^ and over-ordered!! Next time the BF and I are splitting a plate of pasta! Calamari appetizer was SO inexpensive and SO much food! In fact I think all their dishes are underpriced for the quantity that you get. This was the most delicious app I have had--so flavorful and so FRESH! On top of the calamari we also got the sausage pasta and the seafood pasta. Both had heaping amounts of food and delicious in their own sense. We were seafood-ed out after the appetizer so we were devouring the sausage pasta. The sauce for the sausage pasta was amazing--we took the noodles from the seafood dish and dunked it in the other plate's sauce to drink it all up :) 
 Not exactly a hot spot for me dinner was good but I've had better... 
 On rare occasions I am transported back to Italy--either by the ambiance the hospitality or the flavors of a restaurant. Tonight I have had that experience as a result of the hospitality and flavors of Vin Santo. I had the ravioli pasta special and it was wonderful. The decor is somewhat meh but the food was great. The servers make the cocktails which seemed odd. I will come back with each visit to Madison... 
 My wife and I ended up here because it had outdoor seating and was happy to accommodate our dogs.  It had excellent service.  The food was fantastic.  The plates we had were simple fare with exceptional ingredients.  The chef did a wonderful job mixing and balancing flavors.  Even the bar tender nailed the Bellini's. It is very reasonable priced by which I mean a good long dinner (2 hours+) for two with appetizer and drinks will probably come to about $100.  It is worth it!  If just having dinner and a glass of wine expect somewhere closer to $50-$60.  This is a great place to dine! 
 After looking around Madison for a good and authentic Italian place Vin Santo has the potential.  The pasta is definitely fresh and the tiramisu was very good.  Downsides - I felt that the dishes could have used more finesse in the seasoning and flavor and less in the overall amount they were tasty but did not just pop out at me.  For instance the ravioli was great - good pasta and sauce but the spinach stuffing was just bland.  Nevertheless I will go back - need to find out if some of those spicier dishes are truly spicy. 
 This is one of my favorite restaurants in Middleton. The hostess and servers are friendly and the food is delicious. Entrees are large and flavorful. Salads are also large and fresh. Salad is not included with an entree but if you decide to add one to your order I suggest splitting it. The salad is large enough to be a meal for some folks. For an entree I highly recommend the scampi diavalio. It's a heavenly dish with campanelle pasta sausage chicken shrimp bell peppers onions and olive oil. There are also some red pepper flakes to add a spicy kick but the spice is definitely not overpowering to my taste. Overall this is a wonderful local restaurant with a cozy friendly atmosphere and great food. I highly recommend it. 
 I've walked past the Soup Factory numerous times on my way into Barriques. I decided to finally stop in yesterday.Now as you can guess this place's focus is....SOUP. They do have a wide selection of salads and sandwiches(both hot and cold). I decided to try the chicken and mushroom stew and half of a caprese sandwich. I really like it when I have the half sandwich option so I don't feel stuffed to the brim adding a soup. The stew was really good almost as good as my fave at Java Cat! The sandwich was decent but nothing amazing. It's pretty easy to smear pesto on a slice of bread with tomato and mozzarella and squeeze it on a griddle!I'll definitely be stopping back in to try another soup this fall/winter! 
 The soup wasn't bad but the guy who was serving it was really creepy and totally ruined the entire experience. Plus they were out of my first and second choices even though they were supposed to be open for 2 more hours. 
 I didn't know what to expect from The Soup Factory but I liked what I found! I visited around noon on a weekday and the place was hopping with what seemed to be a local business crowd. I ordered the Cheesy Caprese sandwich and loved it. I sampled some of the soups as well and all were good but maybe not great. There are about 8 different varieties of soup to choose from each day everything from different chilis to stews to bisques--you won't get bored. And a regular menu of salads and sandwiches is available. Friendly hard-working staff. 
 I've gone here a few times to see bands. It's alright. The bar is fairly large and they have volleyball outside. I've never been impressed with the barstaff. Not exactly running up to greet you and get your order and the mixed drinks are always a bit off. I've never had any of the food but I've heard it's decent. I will go here again if there's a band I want to see(because it's only a few blocks from home) but you'll never hear me say \Whadya say we go to the Tavern for a night of fun?!?!\ 
 The Club Tavern is an interesting bar. It has a wide range of crowd members from the youthful to the middle aged.  I've been to this bar on numerous occasions for volleyball and hanging out. and for most times its been a pleasant experience. The drinks are fairly priced there is a lot of space so you don't feel crowded and usually the music is fair. Some points of concern though arrive with smoking. When will they make it a state wide band to smoke in bars and restaurants.  The bartenders also seem a little snobby on occasion. I wouldn't say this is the bar to go if your looking to have a great night but if you want a fun/interesting night with some interesting characters make sure you visit. 
 A quiet bar out in Middleton it's certainly not the worst but it ain't the greatest either.Having now played 2 sessions of their \intermediate\ volleyball leagues I'm wishing the second one ended sooner.  They need to drag folks in so they make you play come hell or high water.  I've heard rumors of sand volleyball...in the snow.  Maybe I'm just bitter. cold.The food is nothing worth writing home about.  The sandwiches are pretty standard fare and nachos are decent.  I'm a sucker for seasoned fries and they're pretty decent here so I'll add another star.  Unfortunately the beer isn't cheap nor were there other obvious specials.  Look around and find somewhere else if you're out for an evening of drinking.The TVs aren't all that great for a sports bar which the Club Tavern tries to achieve as far as I can tell.  There is a projector and large screen but I haven't seen it used.They've got a couple of pool tables and dartboards as well.The bartenders aren't terrible it just takes some time for them to warm up to you.  After my 4th or 5th trip there (again because of the volleyball league) they were friendly and joking around with the crew. 
 I want to like this place - I really really do.  But it's fairly rundown the bar staff makes you feel as if you're ruining their day by asking for a drink the food is average and the bathroom conjures memories of b-list horror movie finales.  I've spent a few afternoons here watching the game and even while sitting at the bar and tipping well with every drink service is lackluster at best.  I've had their breakfast and some of the lunch fare - meh nothing spectacular by any means.Very much \the working man's bar\ and I appreciate that aspect but I can't help but feel like I'm just a step away from getting jabbed with a broken bottle or otherwise needing a tetanus shot whenever I stop by The Club Tavern.  Middleton has better bars - try The Midtown Pub or Paul's Neighborhood Bar for a more personable and less sketchy experience. 
 745 on a Friday night with two of my buddies.   We all got the fish fry plus some deep fried shrimp.   Service was attentive but everything seemed to go wrong.  Out of sirloin and a certain beer.   Forgot to give us the soup until after the entree arrived.  Fish was average for the price I couldn't imagine it was made to order.  Cole saw sucked  it was soggy lettuce smothered in warm mayonnaise. 
 Fantastic for St Patrick's Day - I've been looking for a worthy destination since Irish Waters closed five or so years ago and have finally found it! Great meal great value fantastic speedy service and perfect atmosphere. Only thing lacking is the quality if the corned beef - if it were a little better of a cut I'd have given it five stars.Yum. 
 Horrendously managed. Terrible service. Very rude and the managers seem to treat their employees with no respect. The drinks a watery and the tap selection is average. Food is ok but not worth a trip over to this joint. I don't recommend. 
 I dont know why people are ripping Club Tavern a new one I love this place!! The drinks are cheap; I've purchased vodka tonics for $3 and top shelf for $4!  Its never too packed and the bartenders are always beyond friendly.  They probably also have the best bloody mary's  and chaser Ive had for those hair of the dog mornings.  And plus they have a slot machine there that pays out in cash you cant really beat that! 
 Do not get involved in their Brewer giveaway nights! No bartender is aware of promotion or rules which are clearly printed on posters.!  Wearing Brewer gear a requirement to win tickets and jersey. Three people in the place with gear onnot one of those won!? Hmmmm.........When askedreply was Ben won[10 seconds after game concluded..]..Of course\Ben\ could not be found! . A fraud! Doubt anything awarded! 
 A friend proposed Club Tavern for fish fry.  None of us had ever been there.While the food overall wasnt the WORST I've had I wouldnt recommend eating there unless someone buys your meal for you or youve been stranded on a desert island for 5 years and this is the first \real\ meal you've had in ages.  To some it may make you want to go back to the island...atleast food is fresh.We arrived 10 mins after the 4 other people of our party after 20 more minutes the waiter came back to see what we wanted to drink.  Forgot to note for a Friday night at 7:30 the place was pretty much empty in the dining area.I ordered a diet pepsi and the others ordered random alcoholic drinks.  My soda was flat watery and had some kind of scum on top of it.  I thought I may be crazy so everyone at the table tried the soda and agreed it was disgusting.  Waiter came back and I asked for a diet dew instead.  Received a diet dew that tasted a little less flat.....but now the glass had a leak in it while went everywhere.  Asked for a glass from the bar w diet pepsi.  It seemed a little less flat but not by much.  Atleast that glass was clean.Friend ordered the hog heaven bloody mary with bacon infused vodka.  He said it wasnt the worst drink but mainly tasted like greasy bacon fat not a smokey bacon flavor.  Didnt try it myself.After the soda ordeal it had been 20 mins since we arrived I ordered some Moo-skis as an appetizer which are listed as hashbrowns covered in bacon onion and cheese from what i remember.20 mins after that waiter came back to take our order.  I gave him my order of all you can eat fish and asked about the appetizer.  He said \oh ya forgot about those theyll be right up.\5 or 6 minutes later he came back to check our drink status and said \Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaand.....you had moo-skis.....theyll be here soon.\5 or 6 mins later again he brought out the moo-skis.They were hashbrowns on a small side plate with a small layer of shredded mozza on top.  Very plain and greasy tasting.  Realized there should be bacon and onion...which i found tiiiiny few far between pieces inside hash later.  For the 3 or 4 dollars would have been better used for just plain hashbrowns at a diner for a dollar.Finally get the all you can eat fish which had 2 pieces of pollock beer battered fries tartar and coleslaw:Fish: ok sized. breading was hard(which i like) taste ok. Not worst Ive had but no where near good.Fries: Were best part of the meal.Tartar: Different paprika or something in it for a red color.  didnt taste any dill.Coleslaw:  Im not sure you could even call this slaw.  It was literally a small cup of mayo with maybe 2 tiny forks of cabbage.  Im not exaggerating that it was a little liquidy...it was literally SOUP.Ordered a 2nd piece of fish which I got 5 mins later w more tartar.We were still eating and I ordered a 3rd piece of fish.He came back with our checks after 10 mins.  We laughed that the forgetting of the fish was on par w our night.  2 friends paid seperate and we had 2 parties of 2.  Super simple orders but he ended up bringing the bills up wrong 3 times so we had to continue to correct.  Had to take our payments one at a time which added another 10 mins.Finishing up our bills........and kitchen staff brings me the last piece of fish about 30 mins after ordering it and when we were getting up.Maybe it was a one time bad experience but considering how dead it was on a friday night....Im guessing our experience is pretty representative of the food/wait staff which is a shame since the place really has a nice flair or feel inside it.The best part of the experience was the upbeat classic 80s music.We  all received buy one get one coupons upon leaving.  Not sure if it was just us or everyone gets them.30 mins after getting home I spent lots of time in the bathroom as it all came rushing out the bottom pipes.  I have an iron stomach and don't get messed up by much.girlfriend edit:  Reminded me she didnt get the salad she ordered and had to ask.  Also noted her old fashioned came w cherries and olives in it which is taboo? Supposed to be one or other?  Im a crazy WI who doesnt order many OF's so not sure about this. 
 I used to love stopping by this place on Taco Mondays. I think you used to get 5 for a dollar at one point and you could get a pitcher of spotted cow for like $9 so you just couldnt beat it. Slowly they started upping the prices etc.. I think they must have gotten a new fish because for the last couple years its had a metallic taste... It's one of those things where they seem to have chose quantity over quality.. 
 Not my favorite live music venue in town.  They pull in good local acts weekly and the drinks are tasty and inexpensive enough but it's a bit too loud to enjoy the performances without blowing out an eardrum.  Do stop-in to see Moose though - he's cool. 
 When I go to the Club Tavern it's a little bit like going home. No really I used to live upstairs. I wouldn't call it fine dining but the food is good. I'm a big fan of the Moose Burger though I change it up a little bit. It comes with 3 slices of cheese ham mushrooms and bbq sauce but I have them ditch the mushrooms (i'm allergic) and add bacon and a fried egg because i LIKE my burgers to give me heart palpitations. Monday night taco nights are pretty awesome The tacos aren't anything fancy but they're cheap and help to offset the copious amounts of tap beer I tend to imbibe. (note: if you drink it straight from the pitcher it still counts as ONE beer) Club Tavern also offers a pretty good breakfast and they have specials for the early birds. Best bloody mary in town (except mine of course but I live 1000 miles away now...) Happy  hour at the Club was always my favorite. 75 cent pints of Miller High Life. Not the world's greatest beer but definitely affordable during happy hour. I always like to visit the Club when I get back to town. 
 New kitchen manager is making some great food these days! AWESOME fish fry on Friday night. Soup is outstanding and service is friendly and fast and fun! There's also a new appetizer on the menu that is quite tasty  - spring rolls with a raspberry sauce and a cucumber/garlic pepper sauce - just outstanding! Service is friendly too! 
 Usually don't like going for oil changes as i just want the \basic oil change\and not trying  to sell me on other things.I can do basic filterswipers etc on my own at a much more reasonable cost.This place was different.I was told by the friendly and professional manager [Patrick White] only of things to keep an eye on.As Heathers review indicates fluids were topped interior vacuumed.windows washed and I too was in and out in 15 minutes.All for 29.95the early bird special price [before 10am]..A painless experience and I too will be back. 
 I don't like getting oil changes. In fact I avoid them. Not because I don't want to pay for them. Not because I am irresponsible. No. It is because I hate the whole spiel they have to give me about selling me all the other stuff and services even when I tell them no ahead of time.That part aside I had a fantastic experience with this location. I dropped my car off walked the block down the road saw a client in their home walked back and my car was done. Seeing as I dropped my car off before 10 am (Early bird special is from 7-10 am) I saved an additional 10 dollars. They vacuumed my interior and washed my windows better than the homeless guys on the corners. Yes. I shall be back and it will be before 10 am. Just please stop trying to up-sell me. My little car doesn't need all that nonsense when it is slated for a trip to the junkyard/big sleep in the near future. 
 Quick review: Family-run breakfast/lunch joint with your typical diner staples.  Quaint and cozy lots of comfort foods.  Nothing spectacular though the homemade breads are quite good.  A bit on the pricey side and can fill-up with people quickly especially on the weekends.Detailed review:I've lived near C's for about a year now and have never stopped-in to check it out.  Folks at work gave mixed reviews - some raved about the place others gave it a \Meh.\  I run past it nearly every morning and they always seem to have a good-sized crowd especially on Saturdays and Sundays so I figured it had to be somewhat decent... with that I treated myself to a breakfast this morning.I wandered in at around 9:30am on Memorial Day and was pleased to find plenty of seating.  The hostess offered me a table outside which was a nice bonus - the weather was gorgeous so I happily took the offer.  I also grabbed one of their complimentary/shared newspapers to read.A waitress stopped by to ask for my drink order - I went with coffee - and to drop off a menu.  She came back a few minutes later with an acrylic coffee cup and a stainless coffee carafe.  She left to tend to another table; I needed some cream for the coffee... oh well it was nice and I was happy to continue browsing the menu sans cream for my coffee.Breakfast offerings were ordinary: eggs hashbrowns pancakes omelets skillets and a couple of extras like eggs benedict belgian waffles and some homemade pastries (turnovers donuts muffins cookies etc).The waitress stopped by to ask if I was ready to order - told her I decided on the \Hen's Nest\ which consisted of 2 eggs hashbrowns and toast.  I also ordered a pancake and requested some cream for the coffee.  She apologized and immediately brought some half-n-half containers.  We were in business.  Before leaving to take my order to the kitchen she asked if I'd like anything in the hashbrowns.  I was pleased!  C's has some specialty hashbrown items on the menu but I didn't want to order a huge plate of them... so when the offer surfaced to add onions peppers tomatoes etc to my potatoes I jumped at the chance.Food came about 20 minutes later and looked tasty.  The pancake was a lot thinner than I had pictured but it was quite tasty.  I found myself wishing I had ordered 2.  The Hen's Nest was just \OK\ - the hashbrowns weren't greasy and featured a nice crispy char  but the onions and peppers didn't do much for flavor oddly enough... I found the entire dish to be largely flavorless.  :-(  The multigrain toast was very good - and was probably the star of the entire meal.  The waitress only stopped by once more - to drop off the check which was a bit of a shocker as well... $12 for my modest breakfast - $5.99 for the Hen's Nest $0.89 for adding extras to the hashbrowns $2.99 for one (1) pancake (!!!) $1.89 for coffee.Service = 2 stars (nothing great)Food = 3 stars (average breakfast fare)Value = 1.5 stars (quite pricey for what it was)MISC = 3 stars (bakery items looked stellar nice outdoor patio very relaxing)I'd really like to give C's 2.5 stars but I'm feeling a bit generous so it's a 3-star \gift\ rating.  Had I been in a crankier mood it would've gone 2-stars... :-)For what it's worth I think the Hubbard Avenue Diner has a better overall breakfast and it's about 1/2 the price.  It'll probably be a while before I visit C's again. 
 5 stars for food and service. The atmosphere and decor could use some help -- the interior is clean and neat but dated. The outside/exterior can't be helping business -- if you can get past the stark white exterior walls the green roof line and the nondescript sign you'll be treated to a good \from scratch\ meal that tastes homemade with excellent/friendly service. This is a great place for breakfast. 
 So there I was with a soaking wet tent and on my way to the National Mustard Museum. But hey hard-core mustard fan as I am I know better than to start the day with all-you-can-sample-mustard right?So the BF and I surfed Yelp to find a decent breakfast stop and Lo right down the street from our campground was C's so we figured we'd stop in.Now it was Father's Day which we realized when we walked in cause the place was packed. It's pretty much your standard breakfast food with some specialty bakery fare. Clean tasty and fairly reasonably priced. It is not a huge place either but there was PLENTY of waitstaff to keep things moving. I had the skillet breakfast which I was very pleased to find had the option of turkey. (This made me happy as I like meat at breakfast after a night of rainy camping but am allergic to pork.) The skillet had turkey potatoes onions and green peppers mixed together with toast and 2 eggs on top. The eggs were perfect which impressed me given how crazy busy the place was. I do have one complaint about my food 'tho the onions peppers and potatoes were not cooked enough for my taste. In fact the onions were damn near raw. Luckily they were finely shredded so it wasn't too bad but I take away a star for that .(BF says his potatoes were underdone too. Not raw but not quite done enough.)Waitstaff was very good about keeping coffee filled. And since it was a bakery we HAD to at least try a cinnamon roll.  It was a good roll and they even warmed it up for us. I noticed that they had a LOT of baked goods specializing with Strawberry and Rhubarb which is in season right now. To me that's a good thing even though I'm not big on rhubarb. Tends to indicate a reliance on seasonal (and hopefully locally grown) produce. It being Father's day they had a special on Steak and Eggs and a fresh berry topped waffle special too. Dads got a HUGE complimentary chocolate-covered strawberry which I thought was nice.   Oh yeah the eggs with Hollendaise sauce looked and smelled really good... 
 We tried C's for breakfast over the 4th of July weekend. Upon entering it is obvious that this is a no-frills family-style restaurant. Pretty much gives that \small town\ feel which isn't bad by any means.Our dishes were standard. Not bad but nothing great. Service was lackluster even if it was pretty busy...This place does look to have an AMAZING baked goods section. Tons of pastries cookies and muffins. Plus all of the breads are made in-house(my darling dear said his toast was top notch).Next time we stop in I'll be skipping the menu and snatching something out of the bakery case. 
 I would love to give this place 4.5 it is very friendly and inviting. They serve fresh baked toasted bread with the breakfast items try the sourdough or rye. They give you a nice sized portion and they quick not rushed. The place is always busy which is a good sign in my opinion. Ihave never had to wait more then a couple of minutes for a table and if push comes to shove there is a small counter. There is seating outdoors for the nicer days and they are constently changing the decorations to the season or athletic event.I keep coming back and have yet to be disappointed. If you like tabasco withyour meal you might want to bring your own as they will bring out a botle but it is the habanero type. It may be to hot for some palettes. 
 I first heard of C's from a review in 77 Square or some such thing and thought I'd try it.  I've NEVER had a bad dish there.  The bread for french toast is made in the restaurant - not pre-made and heated up not store made bread but real home made stuff.  The belguim waffles are fresh - not the frozen-then-heated-up kind.  Egg dishes are wonderful - lots of everything in the omelets etc.  The staff is really friendly and service yes can be a bit slow but they are ALWAYS hopping!  I give them a break because of that...  I took the bf there for the first time on a Badger football Saturday and now I can't go anywhere else!! : )  Portions are huge (often have a box to go) and as others have mentioned the bakery is amazing : )  Ya Gotta Try It!! 
 If asked a few months ago I would have given them 4 stars. Their breakfasts are awesome and homemade which is great but they have a no substitution policy that knocks them down a notch. My husband doesn't eat eggs and they refuse to give him extra hash browns or at least take off the price of eggs. But it does have a great environment and they're otherwise friendly. 
 If you're ever looking for a delicious breakfast on the west side of Madison this is the place to go. My husband and I were saying on the west side but didn't want to pay the $20 surcharge at our hotel for meh hotel breakfast. Instead we looked around at our options and found that C's was highly rated for breakfast and not too far away. (Best of all it was about 5 minutes away from our morning destination I'm Board!)The first day we came here we sat outside. (The gramma/farm decor kind of threw me off.) I had the blueberry pancakes with a side of hashbrowns and coffee and my husband had an omlette with ham onions and cheddar & toast. Delicious - I don't know the last time I had such wonderful food when eating out. Even the coffee (and his pepsi!) were great. They hit it out of the park so hard that we decided to come back on Sunday rather than heading downtown to another place for brunch that we found.Sunday's breakfast my husband had a repeat of Saturday's and I had one of their specials - a chocolate/banana muffin eggs hashbrowns and bacon. It was also tasty.If I had to complain about anything it'd be that C's is too far away for me to enjoy regularly  :) 
 Update - this was the fourth or fifth visit to C's over the past few years; my coworkers have a breakfast club where we frequent various places once a month or so.The breakfast grub is straight-forward no-nonsense standard fare. Think: eggs bacon hash browns pancakes and skillets. Filling and satisfying. The breads remain excellent as are the bakery items.I've bumped it up a star from the earlier review because the service has been stellar with our past few visits. The waitstaff is friendly attentive and fast. We've never waited for a refill of coffee or water - they're on it right away. 
 Solid spot for diner breakfast fare in Middleton-- popular with the grandma and grandpa set.  Like all good diners service is friendly they keep the coffee cup full and know how to crank through tables.  They've always been busy when we've been there (weekend mornings) but even when the wait looks long it's less than 10 minutes-- and once you're seated service is quick.  Breakfasts are definitely of the \this is not healthy for you\ variety but it's good for a treat (I don't know how my kid made it through his cinnamon-swirl pancakes which were topped with the kind of glaze you put on cinnamon rolls especially after he added syrup to it...) 
 I was actually a bit disappointed by my latest experience at C's. I've had better. Typically I would give it a 3-star but some of the service wasn't the greatest and my food was cold...C's is the kind of family-friendly experience that makes it a 3 to 4 star restaurant on a good day but on this particular day our primary server was impatient and lacked a customer-first attitude and the quality of food was lacking. However the service for a never less then half empty coffee mug was superb. I do love the bakery items so couldn't resist the pecan roll but my egg sandwich with hash browns could have been better. The hash browns were cold and the croissant was dry. The bacon however crispy just like I requested.But I was with my family we were tucked in a cozy corner booth had great conversation and due to the history of this restaurant and the many times I've been there before it would be a place I would recommend. I guess the day I was there was just an \off day\. That happens. 
 My favorite breakfast place in Madison without question. Small town diner fare but they bake their own bread and pastries. Great service and very affordable. I come here as often as I can. 
 Ann Taylor loft clothing beats Ann Taylor any day.  It is more stylish and less expensive.  They often have great sales going on and if you are a young professional woman this place is up there with Banana Republic for chic blazers and skirts.  Also cute shoes and accessories. 4 stars. 
 Worst service ever. 
 Terrible customer service. Was denied the option to return items out of return window that was easily taken back and reimbursed at an alternate location. Was not allowed to talk to a manager when requested.  Disappointed this represents the LOFTs brand. 
 First the good stuff: the staff are really nice.That being said the units are ghetto. Burglars smash and grab in broad daylight. Domestically violent neighbors require police assistance in the night hours. The door locks are a joke. Snow removal seems to be done on an \at will\ basis. Units haven't been renovated in decades aside from the incidental balcony that needs to be brought up to code -- seriously is this carpet original? The water literally takes 5min to rise in temp from frigid to lukewarm and another 5min to rise to shower temp. All the sockets are so old and worn-out that plugs fall out under their own weight -- WTF?It could be worse I guess. I could live next to a crack house. 
 I lived here following college and I enjoyed the laid-back atmosphere and relative peace and quiet. I believe this started to change about the time that I left but at the time it was pretty nice. I had a ground floor one bedroom that looked out at the pond and the pool. I especially enjoyed sitting outside on the patios although there was an inordinate amount of insects in the summer. There was always a decent amount of parking but it seemed that there were many cars that were virtually abandoned in the parking lot. The office staff were pretty laid back but I never had anything wrong so I can't rate that aspect.I've had a couple of friends and acquaintances that had lived there after I had left and they've consistently panned the place.  It has also been in the news from time to time due to shootings stabbings and other assorted crime.  It's really too bad since they have a decent location and grounds and with some upkeep it could be a low-cost option in Middleton. 
 My rating used to be four stars yes that's four stars. I wouldn't even give this ONE star now.Living here has turned out to be a complete nightmare. They are not military friendly at all they claim to be. We are in TX on orders they assured us they would renew our lease over and over including several times in September October November and December when we inquired about terminating our lease for military orders. We were repeatedly reassured that it would not be an issue to renew in April (while we would still be gone). However in February after swindling us for 7 months of extra rent they informed us they would not be renewing our lease. Fine their prerogative in the end (although I was BEYOND ticked over this). Now they have been giving \notices\ to enter our apartment while we're gone even though every single person in their office is full aware that we're in TX and they can't be bothered to send an email to actually make 24 hours notice. Carla in the front office is great and Mike who heads up maintenance is a saint but otherwise the staff here is AWFUL the walls are thin the rules are not enforced for quiet time smoking policy or anything else listed in the lease except when they want to harass you and take advantage. I would hope that any decent person is able to stay clear of this apartment complex! 
 The Bruce Company is very very expensive.  That being said the quality of their plants is exceptional.  The customer service is hit-or-miss.  I went looking for a new gas grill today.  They have a great selection however no one wanted to help me.  There were several employee wandering about.  I tried for about 10 minutes to get someone to help me - no luck.   I absolutely refuse to beg retailers to let me spend money at their establishments.  I left and went to Ace Hardware on University Avenue. 
 They no longer have a flower shop.  I went in looking for a BIG \vase\ to hold a big bunch of flowers.  After poking around for a couple minutes I asked an employee for such.  He walked me over to another woman who repeated my request a couple times (a vase?  a VASE?).  Ok wft woman I have a bunch of flowers for my dad's memorial service I've got 10 minutes to find something to put them in before I shove them up your a$$.  Yes I was a little stressed.  She went in to this long thing about how they didn't have a flower shop any more and they might have a few in the back but they weren't priced to sell.  I interrupted her and said \So the answer is no?\  I asked twice.  She wouldn't give me an answer.  I started walking out.  There were a bunch of forgive me \Hurricane glasses\ which would suit my needs just marvy.  I picked one up and started looking around for something better.  Bitch woman saw me and said \Oh well we DO have CANDLEHOLDERS\.  Didn't offer to help me anymore.  I made a point of picking up just about every single one I could find.  Apparently \vase\ is a technical term reserved for something very special.Anyway I bought something and ended up returning it the next day because the same thing at Cost Plus was $9 rather than $27.Poor service high prices crappy selection.  Fail. 
 This garden center has several sections-a bunch of high-end garden decor etc. (I just walk right past that stuff) an outdoor section with landscaping plants etc. (I have also never looked at that) houseplants and pots (they seem to have a decent selection from cheap plastic to expensive pottery) and a gardening section with seeds tools fertilizers etc (this is the part I frequent and what I based my star rating on). Gardening section:  a good selection of garden seeds from a variety of suppliers including Seed Savers Exchange Renee's garden seeds and similar companies-a good place to shop for seeds if you are looking for something a little more unusual although they are a little more expensive (they often discount the leftovers in the late fall/early winter and I pick up some seeds for the next year while getting my bulbs). They have several brands of organic fertilizers and similar products-again a little more expensive than other places but they have some selection. Some nice garden tools and doodads-a nice place to find a special gift for a gardening friend.It seems several other reviewers had trouble with the customer service here. I have not had such problems-everyone has been nice and friendly when I went to check out. However I can't remember anyone ever asking me if I needed any help while I was shopping-I did not need any help so that didn't bother me but perhaps if you are the type that needs a lot of assistance this isn't the place for you. 
 Bruce Co installed our back patio this week. We shopped around to get quotes for identical specs (same pavers dimensions services warranties) from other local companies-- bigger companies like Barnes and small companies. Bruce Co came up less expensive than the others included landscaping (when we didn't ask for it in the quote) were easy to work with and offered a cash back incentive. The workers came out early on the day they were supposed to arrive and worked the entire time. They did an awesome job were very thorough in their clean up and yard mending (from where they brought in the materials) and were friendly and professional.I highly recommend working with them. 
 I have been a long term customer at The Bruce Company. I always had a more than positive experience. However the Customer Service I received this past Spring was inexcusable. I did receive a call from the General Manager after I complained and I  did except his apology.  However the experience was very negative and I will no longer shop there. 
 1)  The customer service at this store is terrible.  The employees are rude particularly Scott who works in the plant section.   2)  The plants this past summer were infested.  I had to return two mandevillas because of aphids and Bruce gave me a hard time about refunding me.  Last straw:  the $50 rubber plant I purchased in August came home with some time of mite infestation I was able to treat the plant successfully but recently noticed that the plant was ailing.  Upon close inspection I noticed it was full of aphids.  Disgusting.  I am fortunate that my other plants which came from different nurseries were not infected.  Rubber plant went in garbage and I will never waste another dollar at Bruce Company again. 
 I am new to the Madison area and a avid gardener some friends told me to check out this store for seeds. I found there selection very good they carry the whole selection from seed savers and a good amount from baker creek as well as a number of others. the customer service was wonderful a clerk named Alyssa helped me with my selections of seeds and an orchid. I did look around it looked like they were doing some remodeling. prices were average for a garden center except for the furniture which looked of high quality but not cheap. the check out was fast and the clerk wrapped up my orchid so it would not be affected by the cold not something you would get at home depot when I bought one there.I will go back when its warmer to check out their plants since I want to start landscaping my new lawn. 
 After spending last fall and this spring trying desperately to eradicate a mysterious green invasive plant in my yard I recently ripped a chunk by the roots go in my car and went to The Bruce Company.  They have a plant help desk there (near the back of the main garden center) which is staffed by \know it all\ experts!  After a few moments of rolling this green nemesis through his fingers he told me it was wild oregano....what?!  He said it's very invasive (which I knew) and walked me over to their  magical potions aisle handed me a bottle of Bonide brand chemicals and sent me home to spray on the newly identified horror.  Within two days this green mess was a beautiful shade of wilted brown!!!  Sure The Bruce Company isn't the cheapest greenhouse in town but you get what you pay for.I'd spend at least $100 on other products trying to kill this weed that was taking over my grass...and had I got over to Bruce's earlier this $18 bottle of chemical would have cured the mess!  Outstanding service expert staff and they even offer a return policy!  Go to Middleton and buy local!!!!! 
 Jackie sewed my rather complicated and silly wedding dress and did quite a job with it.  It took 5 fittings and a lot of patience.  She excelled at being cautious with my mother honest and quite capable.  If only she was not located in Middleton I'd be taking her a lot more business in the future. 
 Jackie works out of her basement and is my tailor of choice in the Madison area. Look for the small sign on her house. It's not very easy to see.I've had a suit tailored sleeves lengthened on a coat and buttons. She did it all well. 
 I had good experiences with Jackie at Patches and Pieces. I have taken in both my wedding gown and a bridesmaid dress. On the wedding gown the only thing I needed was a bustle put in and that only ended up being one loop so it was very simple. However she showed me different options and offered her advice and suggestions. The bridesmaid dress needed to be taken in on the sides and again I think she had good advice and offered her thoughts to make it more fitted while still allowing me to move. I think Jackie has good knowledge and does an excellent job she is personable and she has great prices. I never feel like I am being taken advantage of like at bridal salons that do tailoring. I would definitely recommend Patches and Pieces.My only negative about the service is that both times I had to call her to find out when my pieces would be finished. I brought them both in well in advance so I know she ther more pressing pieces. However both times I called well after the date she told me they would be done and then she would tell me they would be done by the end of the week (they always were). This was fine for me since they were not rushes and she asked when the events were so she knew they didn't need to be done right away. It's just something to keep in mind that you may need to call about your pieces if the are taking longer then promised. 
 Well worth the drive for Madisonians. The brewery has a nice little bar inside and in the summers a beer garden outside.  The brewery also has something else inside: lots of really really good beer.  If you're a fan of the Capitol Brewery this is a religious pilgrimage.  There's a gift shop and a tour (which should be taken camera in hand).  Standing in the warehouse surrounded by kegs stacked to the ceiling is a near-religious experience. 
 Allright so I like the place. The tour is $2.50. You do not get a beer to start off which sucks. You have to buy one for $3.50 before the tour leaves or you will be tempted to lick it off the floor during the tour. The tour is about a half-hour not the most interesting thing I have ever been to but not bad. Our guide was kind of obnoxious but grew on us as the time grew on. After the tour (weather permitting I assume) you go outside to the beer garden to get your 2oz. mug to start sampling. The guide has to go around and fill up everyone on the tour (~50 people) before you get your beers so budget an extra hour to sample. So in the end you get 8x 2oz. samples and a tiny beer shot glass for $2.50. Not a bad deal; they just need to make the beers at the bar cheaper so you can leave with a smile on your face.I believe they do tours on the weekends at 1:30 and 3:30 and they do offer then during weekdays. 
 I went on a tour of several breweries last summer and Capital Brewery was one of my favorites. The tour guide was EXTREMELY annoying (very very peppy) but the tour was still pretty interesting. The best part was the end. The brewery makes several excellent beers (they were rated as the #1 brewery in the US by someone sometime). I had never been there before but we stuck around after the tasting and ended up right in the middle of an enormous party! Apparently all of Middleton comes out on Friday night after work to relax and have a good time. They don't serve food but several people brought in picnic baskets and I saw a few grills around. Fun place to hang out with friends I'll be back sometime. 
 My parents live very close to the brewery/beer garden and it is so much fun to hang out there in the summer.  The garden often hosts events and fundraisers.  Sometimes there is a band or live karaoke!!  There is a neat stage and tons of picnic tables.  The brewery has a sitting area inside where the tour ends.  The tour is a good time as well!  The only downside is the lack of parking.  They have a small lot but we usually have to park on the street.I wish this beer garden was located in warmer weather so I could enjoy it all year long! 
 The beer garden rules.  Great place to spend a summer evening with friends.  I wished they served their own food but its good that you can order from nearby pizza places etc.  It goes without saying that they've got great beer. 
 One of my favorite activities of the summer is to hit up the Capital Bier Garten for a relaxing night with my friends and family.  I've never done the tour or hung out in the Bier Stube though they're both on my list but between Memorial Day and Halloween I try to make my way over to Terrace Avenue as often as possible.  It's also become somewhat of a tradition amongst my friends to go to Bockfest in February as well as wait in line for Great Taste tickets in May.  These are good times in their own regard but the best times I've had here are just the random summer nights spent sitting at a picnic table with friends or watching a band playing on stage.  On weekend nights during the summer the place gets packed especially if a band is playing.  And while it's pretty easy to find Capital beers on tap or at stores throughout the area nothing beats fresh from the brewery.  As an added bonus you can often get the seasonals or other less prominent beers on tap here as opposed to the bottles prevalent elsewhere.  This past summer my go-to was the Wild Rice Lager as well as the Supper Club lager on the really hot nights.  There's even a few wine choices for the non-beer drinking crowd including Wollersheim's Prairie Fume.  I've got a decent history going on with the Bier Garten as this was one of the places I went on my 21st birthday.  My buddy purchased me one of the half-liter plastic mugs as my birthday present.  I've still got it to this day and I bring it with every time I go out.  Suffice it to say however much that mug cost has been more than offset by the reduced cost per ounce offered by the mug.  If you're planning on coming back I definitely recommend making the investment.  It beats the regular 16 oz plastic cups and I'd hazard a guess it's comparable to getting a pitcher without the necessity of coming to agreement on what beer to order.There isn't any food service whatsoever but it's perfectly fine to bring in your own with you.  My personal go-to is Gino's but there's plenty of places nearby and I believe you can ask for take-out menus of local restaurants up at the counter.  I've even ordered Falbo's for delivery pizza a couple times - just meet them outside the gate by road.  Capital's also put up a large tent over most of the picnic tables which helps when the weather is inclement.  Mosquitoes are an issue especially as the sun goes down but this is Wisconsin so you've got to expect that.  The place closes down at 9:00 PM in deference to the residential nature of the area which actually is a blessing in many ways.  On weekends it's a great start to the evening and I really don't need to be staying out that late on weeknights anymore. 
 Spent a Saturday driving around to the breweries in the area and this was hands down my favorite.  The atmosphere during the tour was super casual the bar inside was full of friendly bartenders/tour guides. (Bier Garten was closed as it was practically winter.) This was my favorite tour because the guides actually describe the process of making beer and tastings were handed out rather copiously. 
 Went on a Friday afternoon tour/tasting. Started with a beer in a pint glass in the bar (you getto keep the glass). The tour guide was very casual and provided good info about the beer and brewing process. At various points along the way a woman would show up with pitchers of different types of beer and pour it in your glass if you wanted a taste. The pours were generous and by the end of the tour you have a nice little buzz going. The beer was very fresh and it all tatsted good. Can't wait to go back over the summer to sit outside in the garden and listen to bands. 
 I've been drinking their beer for a few years but was only able to make the trip up to Middleton to take the tour yesterday. Tour was great- $3 gives you a 30 minute peek at their small facility with a personable and knowledgeable Capital employee and a 5oz. souvenir glass. We had 4 beers on the tour- Island Wheat Supper Club Maibock and Amber. Outside beer garden was great and the indoor bar was small but accommodating. Gift shop was also small- sweatshirts t-shirts 6 packs and pint glasses for sale. I don't find my way out in these parts often but we had a great time and some fantastic beers. 
 Showed up for a tour but they had already finished for the day. Still one of the guys took us on a private tour. Started off with a free beer had the Octoberfest. Very good beer. The guy was very informative and showed us the whole place. Answered some questions we had about beer also. 
 I love the Capital Brewery because I think it encompasses everything that is quintessentially Wisconsin. Capital Brewery makes consistently high-quality German lagers (with a few good ales thrown in for good measure) and provides a low-key no-frills environment that can be whatever you want it to be. The beer garden (bier garten?) is huge filled with weather-beaten picnic tables and covered with a big awning to keep out the sun. Trees insulate the place and the whole thing is topped off with a nice stage for weekly summer performances by local staples such as Westside Andy and the Mel Ford band. People bring their kids their dogs decks of cards and board games and enjoy the excellent beer that's doled out at the outdoor taps by friendly staff. Bring your own food - some local joints like the Roman Candle will even deliver right to your picnic table. And if the weather's not so nice you can visit the Bier Stube Capital's indoor bar which is full of dark rich wood and nice people. I highly recommend the Capital Brewery. And don't forget to take the short tour! 
 Good beer. Fun atmosphere at outdoor beer garden. Great people watching. Especially on Fridays in the summer.  Blonde doppel bock is outstanding. 
 How in the world did I forget/miss a review of the Capital Brewery?  Crikey - I'm losing it I tell 'ya.No visit to the Madison area would be complete without stopping-by the Capital Brewery.  During the spring/summer/fall months their beer garden is phenomenal.  It's a large trellised open area that's sun-protected compliments of a huge blue tent cover/awning.  Picnic tables galore it makes for an ideal location to chill with friends and family.  Bring along whatever type of food you'd like because they don't serve food here.  Or better yet call one of the many local restaurants and request delivery - most of them service the brewery.  Dogs are more than welcome as are kids. A large stage frames the eastern side of the garden; you'll find live music on most Friday and Saturday nights.  They used to show movies on Saturday nights but I believe that has come to pass.The staff is always excellent.  You won't find a nicer group of folks no matter how far or hard you search.  Kyle's the absolute best - the guy is unbelievably friendly funny and knows everything about the brews.  He often serves as the brewery tour guide so pay attention if he suggests you try a certain brew.During the colder months the indoor stube is warm and inviting.  There's a large flat screen television for game watching and plenty of comfy seating.  The stube operates on reduced hours during the winter months and just a heads-up that it's often times rented/reserved for private events (think holiday parties) so check their website schedule prior to planning a spur-of-the-moment visit.The gift shop is nice with a great selection of glasses shirts and other goodies.  Prices are more than reasonable.  The bathrooms are usually spotless which is a bonus.So... if you haven't been to the brewery make it a priority to visit.  Stop by on a Saturday or Sunday and take the tour (it's only a couple of dollars includes samples and runs hourly) then spend time enjoying some of Capital's great beers.  You won't be disappointed. 
 Had a chance to try Autumnal Fire and some other brews. Autumnal Fire was great not exactly my kind of beer but still tasty. Would try more beers definitely. 
 My mind is too often my enemy. Too frequently when thoughts of something 'inexplicable' or 'unpredictable' come to mind they're most often associated with negative circumstances. An 'inexplicable' string of bad luck at the craps table. An 'unpredictable' severe weather pattern. It's human nature to associate things that we can't predict or control with the negative.But once every blue moon something inexplicable happens for the good. Such was the case with me stumbling upon Capital Brewery in Madison Wisconsin - a festive  local beer haven surrounded by sprawling suburban retail strip malls and chain restaurants. I only had an hour to kill before a wedding but that hour was filled with bonfires live music  locally crafted dopplebock and conversations with the most knowledgeable beer lovers I've ever met (they know the Brooklyn Brewery folks on a first name basis). I'm not sure if Capital Brewery is always this way but on this day it was inexplicably unpredictably and unexpectedly welcome. 
 Finally went on their tour this Saturday which I actually felt obligated to do considering how much of their product I ingest on a regular basis. Our tour guide was very lively and fun and knew a looooooot about the process of brewing beer. We also got a small drinking glass as part of our tour and 3 beer bottle caps that can be traded in for a sample of anything on tap.You can also trade in all 3 caps for a pint of a single beer which I wish I had known about before I eagerly sampled my first beer. Anywaaays the tour was short and sweet and the beer cold and refreshing. A perfect break on a Saturday afternoon. 
 Went for a tour of the brewery.The tour guide was great the brews were incredibly fresh and tasty and we overall had the best experience of being a tourist in Madison WI here.The beer garden aspect is tempting for a possible future return but we'll see. Look out for a potential future review Yelpers! 
 Cool place- nice outside bier garden live music tons of craft beers. 
 Get out!(No seriously... get out.)Nothing beats a brew in one of Madison's best beer gardens. With a shady roof overhead (love that newer addition) and tables for you and an army of your friends this is quickly becoming my fave locale for keeping hydrated. 
 Love the outdoor area here. They have a good selection of beer and a giant outdoor bar area. They also have a great tasting room inside for when it's cold or rainy. The brewery tour is short but interesting (it's not a huge place after all). Their beers are decent not the best in town though. They offer seasonals and new brews on occasion.As far as beer is concerned there's much better out there in Madison. The outdoor space however is great. 
 My favorite microbrew that I have ever been to.  Having lived nearby for many years I frequented this place as my favorite in Madison.  The beer are all good with my favorites being the Maibock and Autumnal Fire (Eisphyre) if it is available. For those that prefer lighter beers the amber or supper club are wonderful too.  They don't sell food on site but numerous neighborhood restaurants in the area are available for delivery.  Another option would be to use the grills on the patio which the brewery owns. Live music nights outside are worth a stop since they are free.  Local bands/people play. 
 Capital is my go to Friday night spot!I love visiting Capital Brewery anytime of year. The beer garden is a great place to enjoy a cold brew sunshine and live music in the summer time. In the winter the bier stube is cozy and fun.The staff is awesome and the beer is delicious. Plus you can bring your own snacks! 
 Rating: 3.8Short description:  BreweryPluses:  Good beer interesting buildingNegatives: Not the best price Not the best service need a better menu overallRecommendations:  Decent enough if you like their beer styles. 
 Meh.  In my quest to visit EVERY brewery in Wisconsin I had to stop at Capital Brewery.  I previously tried some of their beers at the MKE Brewfest and was semi-impressed by the new Imperial IPAs so I wanted to give some of their other beers a try.  I don't know if it's because we came on a day where there was a 5K or what but the brewery was pretty much closed except for the beer garden and the little store inside.  There were no samples or flights offered and you could only get a pint for like $6 outside.  Bah.  We wanted to try something new so we had an Autumnal Fire and the Appleanche Dopplebock.  We weren't impressed with either one.  Frankly the Appleanche was just weird.  It smelled like an apple cider and tasted like an average ale.  The Autumnal Fire was decent but nothing special.  I totally committed alcohol abuse and threw half of my beer away.  *GASP* Sadly so I expected more from Capital and don't think I'd stop back in next time I'm in Madison when there are breweries like Ale Asylum nearby. 
 I love the events this place hosts.  I really enjoy the beer garden. 
 5/31/14 Enjoyed their outdoor seating and free music while drinking a cold Capital Lake House Summer Lager.  I'd drink it anytime/anywhere.  ;-) 
 The bier garden was great since the weather was perfect in Madison while I was there. The taster flights were served in plastic cups (I hate plastic cups). I tried all the beers (13 total) and only two really stood out the others were eh. Ghost Ship White IPA and Capsized Imperial IPA. Rating is really 2.5 and based upon the beers sampled. Lots of options but not that great. If I could bring my own beer to the garden it would be awesome. 
 We keep coming here and having a great time!  Always great beer and good live music.  The library fundraiser on Father's Day was a hit with the kids.  I even met Bo Ryan! 
 If someone cared about me they would bring me a cherry turnover for lunch. 
 I drove past Scott's while looking for a place to purchase propane... Go figure.  Decided to stop in and sample their sweet treats. Cookies: definitely crunchy. I'm not a fan of a crunchy cookie - I prefer a chewier cookie so Scott's cookies weren't quite what I had hoped they would be.I decided to try a doughnut and selected a cream-filled chocolate iced doughnut. It was decent but as someone else mentioned about what you'd expect to find at a decent grocery store.All things considered I would probably go back for another doughnut but I'd pass on the cookies. If you like a crunchy cookie give 'em a try.Oh; inside? Nice. Open bright clean and the staff was very friendly. 
 Baked items are disappointing especially for the price. Scott's needs to get with the program and go natural. I don't like high fructose corn syrup in my apple fritter. Besides that the ladies that work here are always mean to me for no reason :( Their cookies are hard I go to the real bakery: La Brioche 
 Delicious donuts. Especially the ones with caramel frosting. I would stay away from the \elephant ears\. They look better than they taste. 
 Very happy with Scott's Pastry Shoppe.  I had a speciality - gag cake made up and they were terrific.  I have only had doughnuts and such and thought they were terrific. 
 I haven't tried anything here besides the donuts but the donuts are delicious. I just wish they were open on Sunday mornings. 
 A little pricey for what you get.  I got 3 dozen donuts and it was $40!  Yikes!  Maybe they deserve 2.5 stars.I do like the NAME of the place of course. 
 I recently had a birthday and as part of the celebration my partner ordered a cake from Scot's. The cake was beautifully decorated and tasted delicious. I would highly recommend them for any of your dessert needs! I should also mention we split a cookie and it was fantastic as well! 
 Happy Fat Tuesday! My coworker brought in a delicious king cake with cream cheese frosting and chocolate chips from Scott's. I didn't find the baby so I don't have to buy the next one which is good because I heard that they are on the expensive side. 
 I spent the better part of seven years of my life as an automotive technician at a fairly large (20+ techs) dealership and as such fully and completely appreciate the expertise knowledge and service that a dealership provides.Whenever possible I purchase parts and services from local dealerships.  Yes I could save a ton of money on parts by buying items online but as mentioned I respect dealerships and understand the benefits of supporting local businesses.  That said this particular VW dealership (the Zimbrick on Century Avenue is only a VW dealer BTW - no Acura any longer at this location) shocked me with their inability to comprehend a simple request for oil an oil filter and a fuel filter.I called to check the price and availability for some common everyday maintenance items for my VW Jetta.  My Jetta has the 1.9L BRM Diesel motor (\PD\ style) and as such has some unique requirements as identified by Volkswagen specifically when it comes to oil.  VW mandates that you use their 505.01 approved oil in the BRM diesel motor.  Failure to do so may result in a voided or compromised warranty.So imagine my shock when the parts guy told me to use \any old oil\ while on the phone.  When I tried to correct him and request the 505.01 Castrol VW oil he seemed to get a bit unnerved.I then asked about a fuel filter and despite having told him the make model year and engine type of my VW on three separate occasions he still misquoted my filter.  I then gave him my VIN and he was still confused.  A few minutes later he quoted me the correct filter but at a price that was easily 2x higher than what I would pay from any other online VW parts dealer.So I declined to purchase anything from this local resource and will now have to shop online with an out-of-the-area dealership.  I'm sorry but my confidence was shaken immediately and I was floored by the sky high price (they quoted $60 for the filter; everyone else is $25). 
 Typical dealership.  They know the car well (I should hope so) but every repair is extremely expensive.  You can usually do better to go to a local mechanic.  We needed a new antenna for our Jetta... $50.  Yeah no thanks I bought one on ebay for $11.  They do have loaners which is nice and a nice little waiting room area with free coffee and WiFi but the location is bad (way far out in middleton not near any public transport) and the prices are just absurd. 
 I've been taking my two passats here for a number of years - both cars are driven numerous miles - well over 130000 and 180000 miles on each of them.  Service has been quite good - a number of repairs and ongoing maintenance.  I've been pleased with the service and attention I get.  The waiting area is very nice and comfortable for anything say 2 to 4 hour wait.  After the quality of service I've gotten I decided to purchase a car here.  Already owned my other two VW's before moving back to Madison.  Recently purchased a 2012 Jetta Sportwagen and had friendly and attentive sales and service.  Only thing I didn't like was the pressure to purchase add-on items - paint protection? 
 Brought in my 2012 Passat TDI for its 20k service and received excellent customer service as usual. I even had a last minute change in my schedule that was handled smoothly. 
 I've been bringing my VW's here for nearly 8 years...first my wife's 99 passat wagon and my 04 passat.  Last year we bought a jetta sportwagen from them largely because of the quality of the service we've gotten from the service department.We've had to face some pretty large repair bills at times but I've felt they have been fair and done quality work.  There have been a few hiccups but the service folks have always been accommodating and flexible to help work through things.I have tried taking my cars to other shops a few times but honestly the price savings weren't that great and I have received more reliable service from the dealer....hint:  If you need a lot of work done plan ahead and ask for a loaner car.  They're usually really good about that 
 Recently bought a pre-owned 2009 Eos. Worked with Doug Marshall. He was quickly able to \read\ us and introduced us to a model which Iquite frankly did not know existed. Within 48 hours with Doug's description of the car and it's features I owned one. He was the consummate salesperson working out the details of the deal getting the car ready etc. During the final walk-through I even commented \ Boy you guys think of everything.\ Doug brought a degree of pleasure back to the car-buying experience. I'd be happy to work with him again. 
 I brought my 2004 VW Golf in to have the AC repaired. The car was not purchased at Zimbrick and I had hoped the repair would be covered by the extended warranty. The problem my car was having turned out to be somewhat of a mystery solved on day two by the shop foreman. I greatly appreciated that they were willing to work with the third party warranty company kept me informed provided me with a ride to and from work and then a loaner car. Also I appreciate that the loaner car was a VW ;) 
 My wife's Mini Cooper had to have its engine replaced. She no longer felt comfortable driving that car. We visited Nissan Honda Toyota and VW dealerships and ultimately had the best experience with Zimbrick VW in Middleton. Otto was very helpful. He was not pushy and gave us all the information we needed to make a decision.Zimbrick made a very fair offer to trade in the Mini but we ended up selling it ourselves. Once my wife's car was sold Otto made the process very quick and easy so we had her in her new Passat the same day. He even stayed after closing to walk her through setting up her new car!When I replace my Toyota RAV4 I will definitely consider Zimbrick VW. 
 I saw the promotions for the Clean Diesel event in April; I went in to the dealership about mid-afternoon on a Saturday to inquire about more information.  Tim Regan was my Sales & Leasing Consultant; he asked me about my driving habits and needs and then gave me suggestions on what the best car to fit me would be.  During the test drive Tim was friendly personable and gave me information about the car the company and himself personally. I decided to purchase a 2014 Jetta. Tim knew I was in the middle of hellish week as busy season was wrapping up at work.  He was patient with my lack of free time and worked around my schedule to get paperwork signed.  I took the car home that night.  The next day Tim came to my work place (bringing me my favorite Starbucks drink!) to pick up the car and take it back to the dealership for cleaning and detailing.When Tim brought back my shiny clean car he spent a hour with me walking me through all the features explaining the little details and answering all my questions.  I was so comfortable with him and even happier with my purchase.I have now had the car a week and I could not be happier with the car and and my positive Zimbrick experience. 
 I don't know what it is about this place but they are slooooooooow. The food is adequate (please don't lecture me about fast food why are you even reading this review?) but sitting at the drive-in will shorten your life. Or maybe just feel like it. I prefer some of their stuff to McDonald's (yes I'm very discerning) but just cannot abide the wait. 
 Good bk food. Slow service. Drive through is a 10 min stop even if your the only one in line. Always feels like i am bugging the person at the window. 
 It's called fast food. Not wait for three hours for a fricking burger food. WTF  how hard is it honestly? 
 I have given this burger king a chance MANY times... But they are BY FAR the slowest burger king I have EVER been to... Even if they have no customers inside and you go through the empty drive through they will STILL make you pull forward and wait for your meal one time it was over a half hour! Absolutely unreasonable. 
 I would give this BK a -1 star if I could. They just recently renovated their building cool looks nice. I've stopped going to this location it is the worst in fast food. Once i was told in the drive-thru that they were out of meat but had chicken or fish. LOL Seriously! The king of burgers out of meat!?!?!? The wait in the drive-thru is painfully SLOW! I once ordered waited for like 10-15 minutes got fed up and left. Drove over to Wendy's got my food and drove past BK on the way home. The truck i was behind in the drive-thru was still in the same spot! Crazy. This BK NEEDS better management and training for the employees. They just don't seem to care. AVOID AT ALL COSTS! 
 Update: 8/26/128:30 A.M. Hangover. Ordered 2 Whoppers w/o cheese and 1 Whopper w/ cheese and 1 order of onion rings. Drive-thru. Had to pull ahead and wait. 21 minutes later a woman in a purple velvet one piece delivered our food. Don't they have work uniforms here? Jeeez. 
 Having won a free small frapee from the \Family Food\ giveaway at another Burger King I decided to go inside the Sun Prairie location to cash it in. This was after I waited for almost twenty minutes at the drive-through even after the order taker told me she'd be with me in \just a second.\ Inside the lobby I was met by a scene of dirty tables slow service and a floor littered with a surprising ammount of plastic gloves. When I finally made it to the counter I was amazed to learn that it is somehow possible to take my order without saying a single word to me and then simply walking away without even handing me a reciept. Perhaps it was this same top-notch service and accuracy that caused another customer there to have to come back not once not twice but THREE times because they made his food wrong. At this point my instincts said to leave but my honor required that I stick with it to the bitter end. But when I finally got the free frapee I was saddened to say that it was not worth the wait. If you value your ability to eat at Burger King more than your time I would suggest staying in your car at this location and living in blissful ignorance. As for me it'll be a while before I have it my way again. 
 22 minutes to get my order. Terrible service! I was the only one in the store when I placed my order although there were 3 cars in drivethru. Not acceptable! The only thing keeping this from getting a 1-star review is that (1) the restaurant was clean and newly remodeled and (2) they did get the order accurate... again after 22 minutes... not acceptable! 
 Have been there several times and it's always super slow. It had been months since we had gone there so today we went there and the girl at the counter just finished a counter order saw us and went to drive through. We stood there for 15 minutes waiting for somebody to take our order. Fed up we left and went to Culver's. 
 Unless you like being ignored Avoid Avoid Avoid! Stopped in for lunch today and the place was pretty much empty. There was a lady waiting at the counter for her order two gentlemen who already had their order and were seated and eating. There was one worker for the front counter and the drive thru and 2 or 3 workers in the back. Waited over 10 minutes for someone to take my order and wasn't even acknowledged in that time. One of the guys came up front to bag drive thru orders wiped the sweat off his face with a napkin crumpled it up tossed it in the trash and then scooped up fries without washing his hands. At that point I walked out and went to Culvers where I ordered and got my food in less time than I spent waiting to order here.  Not even worth one star! 
 Remember when Burger King was actually somewhat decent?  Pepperidge Farm remembers...I have dined with the King many a time across this fine land.  I have watched their slow decline with sadness over the last thirty years.  At one point they actually challenged the Clown for burger superiority but now they're a weak shadow on the market barely a player......and the BK at this location is a perfect example of why.EVERYTHING at this BK takes ten minutes.  Doesn't matter what you order be prepared to wait.It's always dirty.  When I was a kid and worked at the Clown we were always cleaning.  There was usually one or two people on any shift whose sole job was to keep the lobby clean.  This place is a hole.Why does the food taste weird?  If I want BK I actually make the drive to Deforest rather than eat at this location which is actually a stone's throw from my house.  The food here tastes bad bleachy and wrong.  What are they doing to the food?Fix thyself King and maybe I'll return.  Until then I will take my cheap poorly constructed eats elsewhere. 
 This place is slow beyond belief. How do they stay in business? I waited 15 min for my order which was wrong and cold. I got the excuse \were short staffed\. There were two cars in line and no one in the dining area. How much staff do you need for two customers? I think they laugh about how bad they are as workers. Because they could care less.... 
 Pretty ok pizza dudes.  Not the best location just off Main street they share a tiny building with Country Hearth bread store and a new gyro place.  Teeny tiny parking lot.  That is all. 
 Wow.  What a bunch of stoners. 
 I had mentioned in a separate review that per the website this Pizza Pit doesn't have mac-and-cheese pizza. Well I went to get some gyros (they have a mini greek restaurant inside apparently called Athens) and saw on the board that they DO have the mac/cheese pizza. I stand corrected. On to the gyros. The actual Greek restaurant in town is closed on Mondays so we came here for our fix. We got gyros only no fries (there aren't a lot of options that might be it right there). They come with tomatoes and onions - I requested mine without onions. They were fine. Not stellar not terrible. I've had better ones at a lot of places but considering that I only had to drive ten minutes to get these they were good enough. I was told 15 minutes and when I got there 15 minutes (or so) later they were ready to go but still warm once I got them home and started devouring. 
 What has the world done to the people in this place to make them hate life as they do?  And why does that translate to the mediocre food?  You can do better for pizza.  Hell practically across the street from this place is Salvatore's.  You'll spend a bit more but it'll be worth it.This place slaps grease and cheese on cardboard wraps it cardboard and hands it to you with a look on their face that plainly says \I should have listened to my teachers in high school.\ 
 I think their delivery service is pretty good it was quick and the delivery guy was friendly. And the lady I ordered my pizza through was VERY friendly and upbeat. I've heard a lot of bad things about their workers? But I always go around noon so maybe those people are just going at the wrong time. Who knows! Now onto the food. Their pizza isn't the best pizza you'll ever have but for the price it's good. It's a little greasy sometimes I'll admit. But honestly I get the craving for them sometime! They have great cheese to put on their pizzas and they usually put a good amount on. And I love their breadsticks! Yum! Like I said though there is better. But if you're looking for cheap quick decent pizza I'd go here. 
 I wanted pizza and my kids wanted macaroni and cheese so I figured I'd head to the Pit. If only somebody had answered the phone! It was around 6pm on a Saturday night which I understand is a busy time but come on. I let it ring about 15 times and then hung up. I paced around my house for a few minutes got distracted then tried calling again about ten minutes later. Same deal: lots of ringing no answering. I let it ring another 15 times or so and just gave up. I don't mind having someone answer and then immediately put me on hold. It's a lot better than the nothing that I got. Thumbs DOWN. 
 The prices are outrageous.  I went in to mail an 5x8\ envelope with a few CDs in it.  They told me it would be $16.95.  I went to the post office:  $4.95.  Don't bother unless you like shelling out a few extra bones. 
 These guys are great!  Fast friendly service and all you need for shipping printing and more.  Yeah the post office is cheaper on some stuff but I like the idea of my stuff getting to where it's supposed to on time :-)   Chuck and his staff are great.  Highly recommend 
 AS far as libraries go this one is a keeper.  Beautiful building great selection and lots of space to work or read.  I can't complain. 
 I love this library. Love it. It is beautiful and quite large with a quiet room full of magazines (you can check out the ones from the previous months) piles of documentary DVDs quiet corners to sit/hide in screened porches that are open during the non-winter months four self-check stations an open area where you can fetch your own holds (and thanks to the wonders of technology you don't have to worry about somebody snaking your long-awaited stuff away from you) bunches of computers with access to the internet (even if you had to bring your impatient 3-year-old who thinks the word 'quiet' means 'be louder') and a great used-book store run by some very sweet retirees. And that's just the stuff I've used. There are two different graphic novel sections: one for adults and one for kids. Finally maybe my *most* favorite thing is the Staff Picks section. It's mostly books but with a few DVDs too; I've found some worthy stuff there. There are dedicated children's librarians friendly people at the information/reference desk (with little plaques that say please interrupt us) and book returns both inside and out. I've always been pro-library but this place is just unbelievable. I feel so lucky to live near it. 
 I am a little biased - I worked in a library all through high school and into college. I also love books I own A LOT of them ask my husband he just moved them all. So I really haven't met a library I haven't liked but the Sun Prairie library is top notch. Having recently re-located to the Sun Prairie area one of the places I really wanted to check out was the library. It did not disappoint. Here are the aspects of it that really stuck out to me: The snack shop - what a great idea! Who doesn't lose track of time at the library and need a little refueling? The ceilings and overall structure - very elegant. The staff - always kind and helpful. Not the stereotypical librarian who constantly shushes you. Plenty of places to sit and read undisturbed unless you have children that is. The children's area. Screened in porch Plenty of activities and programing Reservable community rooms 
 Always good friendly and hot. My family likes this \Chinese\ best in Sun Prairie. The food is even better of you eat it \in\. Never full of customers (is that good?) it seems like they do a lot of take-out business. There is delivery. Not much updated decor. Good for when you want local basic Amer/Asian same menu as all the rest. Some days it's better than others but never bad. 
 I ate there 2 times. I recommend sea food soup spicy salty shrimp Singapore rice noodle. The location is not that good. It's in Sun Prairie a suburb area from Madison WI. I believe if the location is in downtown Madison it would be one of the top Chinese restaurant in Madison. 
 Panda Garden is the best place to get Chinese food in Sun Prairie. And they deliver which is a plus in my book! I've eaten in the restaurant a couple of times but usually do take out. I've never had anything I didn't like there (and we've tried a very good array of items). Tonight we had the Garlic Shrimp and Chicken Lo Mein. Both were awesome! The Garlic Shrimp had a nice spicy kick to it but still had a TON of flavor! The crab Rangoon and pot stickers are also tasty!  Pricing is very reasonable for what you get! 
 I love this place. The fried dumplings are to die for. 
 Easy on-line menu great selection and fabulous food. I ordered hot/ sour soup egg roll and chicken/ broccoli. All of it was great. I can't wait to go back. 
 I was unhappy due to having to wait 55 minutes for my one meal (steamed veggies combo with chicken shrimp and scallops!  Then I get two pieces of shrimp three small slices of chicken a few tiny scallops!!  For $12.00 that is a rip off a joke and unacceptable!  You going to charge for food with those items in you better put more than sliced veggies!!  I will never come back! 
 This is take out only.  They have at least two locations that I am aware of.  One in Sun Prairie and one in Fitchburg.  They have excellent Chinese food and the prices are pretty good. 
 Best chinese I've found so far. Hot and sour soup and their won ton soup are fantastic. Sometimes I'll go and just get the soup. 
 I haven't had better Crab Rangoon than they serve here.  The people who work there are pretty nice too. 
 The general tso's and boneless spare ribs are about as good as you'll find. No lie! 
 Meh. It's okay when you want something quick. Not overly impressed. Fried rice is good. 
 Pretty bland for Chinese take out. 
 We used to go here for our Americanized Chinese food every so often for the last 7 years.  However in the last year the quality of their food has taken a nose dive to unacceptable levels of blech and blah. 
 The rice and steamed vegetables were good but that's about all we could tolerate. We ordered General Tso's which is what we always get when we first try a Chinese restaurant. It helps us compare to other places.The quality of the chicken used was awful. The dumplings were flavorless. We will not be returning. 
 Food is insanely good.  Fresh meats and very very tasty.  When you order a sandwich (i recommend the godfather I or II) the owner goes to the fridge and begins slicing cuts for your sub.  Doesn't get much fresher than that.  They have a few tables but I've never eaten there so I cannot comment on the service but they are always friendly when I order take out.  In addition to a plethora of sandwich options there are italian dishes as well.  I've had the lasagna which was a large flavorful portion.  Desserts are great too.  Try a Cannoli. 
 Deli Roma- Great Italian deli.  Large portions.  Sandwich meats are slice to the order.  Perfect tiny dining room with plastic red and white checkered table cloths.  Soooo good. Go there.  Eat! 
 Finally went to Deli Roma yesterday and so glad i did. I've been meaning to go for a while but always forget about it because of it's location. It's small but cool at the same time. All the Italian nostalgia in there is fun to look at while you wait.We got a veggie muffaletta grilled panini and a Chicago style Vienna all beef hot dog.Veggie Muffaletta ($5.25)~ Wow! So much flavor with the olives 2 kinds of cheese and the in house olive dressing. Served on a 5\ round Pane Mariano bread (my new favorite bread). Great price for a huge sandwich.Grilled Panini ($6.49)~ It was the panini of the week not sure what it was. It had 2 kinds of meat( ham and salami i believe) and cheese. The focaccia bread was grilled to perfection. We got the order to go and it was still super hot when we got home! Tasty sandwich with a TON of meat in there!Chicago style Vienna all beef hot dog ($2.75)~ Very good dog with all the fixings. Only complaint was that it was not very warm but that's OK with a hot dog i guess.If you can find this place you need to go! The mailman was eating lunch when we were there. I always think if the mailman eats there you know it's good! 
 Absolutely wonderful. IDK what the other guy was talking about complaining about the service. I was greeted with a smile and a friendly conversation while I waited for the old man to make my sandwiches. Reminds me of when I lived on the east coast. Got to love Boar's head. 
 Boar's head meats and cheeses are what they use for their sandwiches and they also have olivesand some other deli items. The sandwiches are great and the service is friendly. I miss their old employee John he was such a charming handsome young lad. :-( They even know Chris Burke!!!! 
 Food was amazing!!! Just wish it were open on Sunday :) 
 This place is the best. Americano is ridiculously good. 
 Place is pretty good. Have been here a handful of times. I always get the Godfather (1 or 2) which is an Italian beef sandwich. It is really good.  My wife really enjoys the Americano.  Overall I have not had any issues except for my recent visit.  There was an issue with one sandwich called up and talked with the owner.  He was very understanding and wanted to make things right so he gave me a $25 gift card to use the next time I'm there.  I won't let one little issue stop me from eating here. 
 This place is a great stop for lunch. The sandwiches are huge and they use boars head premium deli meat on their subs. I challenge you to take down a whole one. They also make fresh pasta and lasagna that is to die for. Check This Place Out! 
 Only place in the area that makes an authentic Vienna beef Chicago style hot dog.  Simply awesome! 
 Been in SP for a year now and only just discovered this place on my way home tonight. Wanted something quick tasty and not from a fast food chain. Talk about a good stop. My sandwich was just filled with Boars Head ham salami cheese delicious fresh tomatoes all on excellent toasted bread. Considering the amount of meat and the overall size of this sandwich the $7 and change price was more than reasonable. I'm already looking forward to going back here. Service was pleasant and quick considering there were two people immediately in front of me.  A unique gem in an area of SP dominated mostly by fast food joints.  Only wish they had better roadside presence so I had been able to find them sooner! 
 This place is awesome! The food is amazing to say the least. The only time I have been disappointed is when I showed up on a Monday and found out they were closed. Best place for Italian in the area. Thumbs up to the owner and staff keep it up! 
 Nice little sandwich shop in Sun Prairie and they do a decent job but they have big plastic things of Prosciutto to make them look like a big time Italian deli only one problem...they don't serve Prosciutto on any of their sandwiches and you can't even order it extra.   They advertise that they have a couple of types of Lasagna and to ask for what they varieties are but they didn't have any when i was there.  The sandwich I did have was good and they heat up bread that tastes very yummy.  I'll give them another chance. 
 I never thought I would write a one-star review of Deli Roma but I think this once-great deli's day has passed. For the last year or so the food has been slipping and become mediocre - including this fall the worst plate of spaghetti I've ever been served in a restaurant (by an employee who is no longer there) but our experience on Saturday pretty much finished our long relationship with Deli Roma.We arrived around 4:30 p.m. and there was no one else in the deli. A young man was seated behind the register and greeted us but did not get up. We saw the specials board had an item which was a play on the Godfather their signature Italian roast beef sandwich and discussed whether we'd want to try it. During all this the gentleman behind the counter remained seated but appeared to be paying attention.When I said we were ready to order he got up but when I ordered a Godfather he said that they were out of Italian beef. I have worked in restaurants myself and at times you do run out of items but I don't understand why the specials board carried an item they didn't have and more incomprehensible yet is why he would listen to us talk about the aforementioned special and never bother to mention he couldn't make one anyway. The specials board should have been blank and more importantly he should have told us when we came in that they were out of some ingredients.If he had we probably would have stayed and ordered something else but his attitude projected total casual indifference in serving us and getting our business. If they don't want our business we won't give it to them any more. 
 I found Deli Roma too late.  Fortunately I was able to enjoy the godfather part I several times this winter before it closed.  This was my favorite sandwich anywhere ever period.  Sad to see you go thank you for the delicious food! 
 Ross I hope you're going to show up somewhere else. Sure miss you in SP. 
 I like Family Video. It has a large selection good parking and the staff is knowledgeable and very friendly. But unless you get a new/er movie or are just very lucky it can be difficult to find widescreen movies. For some reason FV tends to default to full frame when they sell down the stock to just one or two discs of a title. I'll admit that I am a complete widescreen snob and this makes me crazy. Otherwise they'd be getting five stars from me no question. 
 Be very wary of the Family Video in Sun Prairie WI they do a great job trying to up sell you at the counter and next thing you know you are walking out the door with 3-5 movies when you came in intending to get two. The problem with this is they do not indicate anywhere on the movie when they are due back. You do not get a receipt indicating when they are due back so if you have five movies and one is due back the next day and the other four in five days you better be darn sure you know what one or you will be surprised with a $8-$10 late charge. (And hopefully the person that hands you the movies tells you the correct one) When you ask them why they do not print off receipts they state it is the cost of paper - well I would think the cost of an angry customer(s) would be more concerning. 
 When I was about 12 years old I got to sell popcorn with my Cub Scout Troop. Thankfully the same type of people who still go to video stores are the same sort of people who contribute to youth organizations (lonely old people). I appreciate how much Family Video worked with us and they have a good selection of films. When in town choose Family Video over Blockbuster. 
 Went here for a Father's Day breakfast.  Besides lunch and dinner they also serve breakfast all day.  Nice folks darn good diner food nice size portions.  Lots of old people come here but they don't try to mug you in the bathroom or anything like that. 
 Found  hair in my food.  BLECH!!  Never ever again! 
 Good value.  Owners are always working and are good people.  They had a fire recently which closed the place down.  Not sure they've re-opened yet but if not hopefully soon. 
 I cannot wait until sir hobos open up again. This place has the best breakfast anywhere!  The skillet are to die for. This service is as good as any diner in Chicago. 
 Now reopen and beautiful.  Come in and check it out. 
 Absolutely horrible.  The building has been recently remodeled because it burned.  I'd guess the insurance company didn't cover a replacement broom vacuum and cleaning supplies. My arms stuck to the new table the floor was really littered with garbage and my silverware was dirty.  Gross.  It was 2pm on Sat and dead.  No excuse for dirty.The waitress was really nice I think her name was Sarah.  She was personable and attentive.  She's the only reason I'd give this place a star at all.I ordered a Gyro sandwich.  It came with fries and a bowl of soup.  I ordered Broccoli Cheese soup.  I think if I heated up some Velveeta and added a gallon of water to it then tossed in a bunch of dirty uncut broccoli I could duplicate the Sir Hobo recipe.I wish the rest of the meal was that good.  When the Gyro arrived it reeked of rotten deer carcass the plate was filthy and the fries were colder than Alaska in December.  I'm not joking.  The Gyro tasted so bad that I had to spit a mouthful of it into a napkin and slug down a glass of water to cleanse the horse-s--t taste from my mouth.  Sarah noticed that I hadn't eaten my food she offered to remove it from the bill with out me asking.  I would normally applaude that gesture but some older foreign lady (I assume the owner) came over and told her not to do that.  \I'll make you new sandwich\ said the old lady. I declined.  I figured I couldn't choke down another bite of the garbage they call food.  I paid my 9 dollars for a lousy cup of liquid Velveeta and left.I bet the Dairy Queen across the parking lot is glad that Sir Hobo's is back open.  I wonder how many people have done what I did... walk to DQ and had an ice cream cone to try to clean the aftertaste of death and decay from my mouth.  Never again.  I'd go to DQ instead. 
 This place is always packed; however the increased popularity is working against it. I took my mother step father and fellow siblings here for Mother's day. It took fifteen minutes just to get the attention of the waitress. When the food finally arrived three out of five of the orders were completely wrong. The waitress basically just negotiated back and forth with us until we agreed to eat what we were served. On a side note the owner (older lady) kept staring at our table with a look in her eye that could have gotten her a role in the movie Scarface.Unfortunately the owners no longer care about quality like they did before the business burnt down. It's just a numbers thing at this point.They lost a lifer that day. 
 I recently went here with my family for breakfast and I look forward to going back soon. The menu had many options for breakfast even for Vegetarians which I am. I had the Veggie Skillet which was delisious and my husband enjoyed his inlet as well. The portions where large and the quality was high. A very clean place with a very friendly wait staff. Good kids menu too! 
 NEVER going back to this place.  We went for breakfast as a table of four.  It was packed Sunday morning breakfast.  Three of the four breakfasts went back.  Two of those came wrong again.  One of those came back wrong a third time.  It took so long for the waitress to come back my wife had nibbled on it eating around the block of Velveeta she specifically asked to be cheddar.  When we asked for consideration on the bill we were told that she had eaten it so no discount would be given.  We asked to see the manager.  The waitress returned and threw the bill on the table saying that she would take the breakfast out of her tips.  When we told the hostess she offered a 10% discount off the bill.  Too Little Too Late.  There is no excuse for a menu omelet (that's right not a special order menu) to come out wrong three times. 
 We went back here for the second time since the remodel.  Both times we had breakfast items.  We've never had lunch or dinner food here and from reading other reviews it would appear that is a good thing.  The remodeling looks nice and it's now a no-smoking establishment.  But neither of these two aspects can apparently help the fact that your elbows and/or arms are going to stick to the tables.  Maybe it's a trap!  Like flies on sticky paper!  Service was good both times and breakfast food is solid.  But if they can't keep the tables clean what else is filthy dirty? 
 I want to write nice things.. I sooo want to write nice things.. so here goes.. the place has a nice warmth to it.. family friendly which is always a plus for us... well that's itfood- just not good.. wife's reuben- the corned beef tasted.. let's go with questionable. Kids got hot dogs ugh just buy a better brand people! I had the Gyro.. it was serviceable a little heavy on the sauce but fine.Service- waitress didn't give a d*mn about anything.. so yeah.. 2 stars.. maybe we will try again but I don't think so 
 We went here for a family Christmas brunch last month. Having lived in town for nearly 20 years we had always seen but never actually been to SIR Hobo's. We had no idea what we were missing. When we first sat down we were greated by a jolly waitress with a thick possibly Greek accent. Her nametag said her name was Gerestina but her attitude said she loved her job. The complimentary water was in a word exquisite. And the meal only got better. But the biggest surprise was when about 20 minutes into our meal a homeless man with a whooping cough and a peg leg stumbled through the door and colapsed. The cook came crashing out of the kitchen carrying a CPR mask in one hand and a bloody meat cleaver in the other. Through his quick action the cook was able to resucitate the homeless man. As we all applauded the homeless man stood up to shake the cook's hand. The homeless man was crying and gave every single person in the restaurant a great big bear hug. It seems that SIR hobos still certainly cares for our fine city's hobo community. 
 This place was recommended to us about twenty miles away?The loyal following is out of the local area. So we had to check this place out.The building:The Hobo does live up to its theme; when you find it you will know it. The inside is the standard dinner area also the preferred seating for a hobo. Featuring large areas to set down stretch out and down your jacket and bags. You can easily sit for more than twenty minutes and not worry about being run out (to make room for more customers).The food:Any hobo would like this style of dining. Lots of different things so you will not get tired of eating a lot at once. Also the shear amount will fill you up since a lot of hobos do not eat three meals a day. Again you are not pressured to finish fast. This makes it much easier to finish the large portions the Hobo has to offer.This place would kill a Denny's without even trying. Since I am not from the local area it is hard to compare it to anything locally.Yea I would eat here again. 
 Ehh.... Probably wont return.  Friendly workers beautiful restaurant but... The food was NOT good at all..  I dont know where to really start. I guess...The waitress didnt get my order right. I ordered:the burger with BBQ Bacon and onions with seasoned fries and a side salad with croutons....  The salad came back without croutons had to hunt the waitress down to get them..  The Fries came back without any seasoning. and the fries tasted just awful!  The Burger wasnt too bad.. Although I think i would have rather have eaten a Bic Mac lol. My BF ordered:The Hobo Skillet with side of pancakes... the skillet had a hair in it..  it was really greasy and not much flavor.. and whatever flavor it did have it wasnt the greatest..The best the best items we had  were the pancakes and the croutons.. I probably wont go back again...  :( 
 It is what it is a nice local diner-type place.  It's not going to knock your socks off but it beats throwing money at chain restaurants and the food is usually above par. 
 This place is just great! We have been here for breakfast lunch and dinner and it has been great every time. It is so cheap and you always get so much food and sofast to. They have a huge menu which is awesome! The workers are always so happy and take good care of you! They just remodeled it and it looks so nice inside and the bathrooms are always clean. Great place! 
 Blech.  My brother heard this was the best Chinese buffet in Sun Prairie.  Maybe that is true but it must be the only Chinese buffet in Sun Prairie.I'm not giving it a hard time for \authenticity\ or any of that eaither.  I love me some good Americanized crappy Chinese food.  Here even the stuff that was out fresh from the kitchen (which was mighty slim picken's) was barely edible.I was really looking forward to some good old MIdwestern Chinese buffet too.  The Chinese food options in Portland are actually very lacking the last really good stuff I had was from a strip mall in Crawfordsville IN.  Seriously they can do it right but everyone else serves lukewarm tasteless piles of mystery?  Gotta be kidding me.Most options seemed to have been sitting for way too long when we got here and it was peak dinner eating time.  I should have been tipped off by the low number of patrons at this \best Chinese\ but I like to give the benefit of the doubt.You are better off making Ramen noodles at home and calling it chinese food. 
 I love this place.  The food is always fresh they keep an eye on the buffet so they can refill the trays quickly.  I've never had anything here that wasn't great. 
 UPDATE:  This place closed down about a year ago.  Sadness. Another mom and pop Chinese buffet goes by the wayside of stretching themselves too thin.I resisted going here for the past several years that I've lived in Sun Prairie b/c of all the other mediocre Chinese food buffet restaurants I've eaten at that left me a bit disappointed.Their selection is less in numbers of dishes than other places around the Dane County area; however in terms of quality and freshness it's rather good. Since other reviewers did not go into significant detail about the offerings I'll mention my first time experience recently on a Sunday (where there were about three other tables of diners):- peanut butter chicken- mongolian beef- chow mein- a few sushi rolls (x2 varieties)- crab rangoons (better than average)- spring rolls (eggrolls more aptly)- popcorn shrimp- two types of soups - your basic hot and sour or egg drop (these were just OK)- chicken skewers (these were excellent even though I didn't expect them to be based on appearance)- seafood stir fry w/ veggies- fish fillets- dessert options looked like a few types of cakes and fruit pudding and jello.I like the emphasis on quality rather than quantity. And this place was clean.  It's tucked away in a strip mall by Walmart so points against it for location.  But you can't beat the price $7-8 for a buffet meal!  Of course afterwards I had to nap off the food coma ... 
 I have been eating here for at least 7 years and it's excellent.  Typically a group of us go there for lunch coming from work.   I love the pepper chicken the broccoli and the chicken on a stick things.  Ohh yes the peanut butter chicken is also excellent.  My 4 kids really love going there too when we happen to be in that area on a weekend.  They've been going there every now and then since they were babies.    I have heard that they may not be able to renew their lease as that part of the strip mall may be changed.  That would be very disappointing.  They have been a loyal staple spot for years while stores with in the mall have changed some of which are still vacant.   If you have not checked them out give them a try.  If you enjoy them go back for a visit incase they are soon gone. 
 closed. 
 This restaurant was forced to close due to a greedy landlord that suddenly doubled their rent probably because of the upgrades done with the new Walmart.  Does anyone know where this family went or if they opened in another location?  I would gladly go to the the one.  I haven't found any Chinese food as good. 
 Good old fashioned diner food with a generous all you can eat prime rib and butterfly shrimp on Saturdays. 
 I have been here twice both times for breakfast. Both times I was *very* happy. I had the greek omelette (feta cheese spinach you know the deal) and thought I had died and gone to omelette heaven. Best I ever had. It came with this delicious tzaziki-type sauce on the side which I should have brought home with me (I did finish the omelette at the restaurant). The second time I had this very interesting strawberry fritter french toast. I love french toast and all things sugary and this was definitely sweet. It sort of had a filling (that was the strawberry part). It was delicious but not for those who claim they don't like sweets. The service is terrific very fast and genuine. The coffee is hot and just right. You'll likely be surrounded by various old men (with the occasional younger man sprinkled in) but these old guys know a good breakfast when they find one. 
 If you have not been here go. Best breakfast in Dane county. I work out of state and every time I get to town this is my first stop. If I get in town at 2 am I am up at 7 for breakfast. Bring and tell your friends you wont regret it. 
 How pleasantly surprised I was to find this old school greasy spoon ( and I say that as a compliment). This is the kind of place I remember fondly from my youth in NJ.  No pretension no gimmicks just honest food done well.  I had one of the specials - an omelet with cilantro chorizo green and red peppers and onions.  It was perfect.  Perhaps my favorite part about my breakfast was the hash brown potatoes. At many places like this they are soggy and undercooked.  Not only were they spiced well but they were crispy as well.  That's no joke with breakfast potatoes!    In any case I've been back twice in a week and a half and plan on returning often.  Don't let the exterior or decor fool you; they make good food in that tiny building. 
 This is just a tiny restaurant with a real family feel. We came for a late breakfast on a Sunday. The waitstaff were quick to help us. We chose seats at the counter. There were many specials breakfast lunch soups biscuits and gravy lots of diner food. We sat among the regulars and were treated like one of the family. The husband had eggs hashbrowns and toast-all cooked to perfection. I had a pancake that was huge and so delicious-just like dessert for breakfast. The prices are reasonable the food plentiful and the atmosphere is very friendly. Nothing fancy just good food.We will be going back. 
 My husband and I stopped in here on a freezing Sunday morning.  It's a small place  but doesn't seem too crowded.  We had eggs benedict and it was VERY good. Prices  they charged were more than reasonable for the quality of food   and the waitstaff was super nice. As people who drink coffee black  it's very hard to find small places like this that you need no cream or sugar to make the coffee palatable  and luckily this was one such place. So really  nice atmosphere good food nice waitstaff  don't even bother going anywhere else for breakfast. 
 I would move closer to this place if it was an option. I have enjoyed more than I can say everything I've eaten here. I had friends in town so ended up going there two mornings in a row. Saturday I had the Veggie Benedict (instead of the meat layer it's a mix of tomatoes mushrooms onions and peppers). I love a good Eggs Benedict and always try the different versions but this is the best ever. Sunday I went back to my old friend the greek omelette and it was as good as ever. We sat in a booth on Saturday and then at the counter on Sunday. The coffee was hot and constantly being topped-up. 
 This is a Sun Prairie tradition.Local folks running a local diner.The food is good with very down to earth service. 
 Beautiful course we had a great day.  The Shrimp dinner was wonderful very light breading.  Everyone is very friendly. 
 Terrible experience! The staff there was extremely rude to us the entire day. I will never come back to this golf  course or recommend it to anyone. If you would like to have a nice experience choose somewhere else. 
 If I could give this course no stars I would. WORST customer service experience of my life. Not only was the manager a complete jerk the whole day the beer cart girl was lazy and snotty. She literally made a Starbucks run for the employees while she was \working.\ Not only have they lost our company's business for our annual golf outing but we will never go back for golf league ever again. If you are looking for a good local course in that area try Lake Windsor Golf Club or the Oaks. Much better courses and they are busy because their staff is professional. Obviously Sun Prairie Golf Course got the employees who couldn't cut it at a good course. 
 We went to this store at 8 pm they close at 10pm they were out of dark meat in crispy they had no mac and cheese made.  they did let us get some extra chicken because we wanted three sides of mac and cheese.  The people who woked here tried very hard but just didnt seem to know what was going on.  We went in for two 10 peice buckets and it took us more then a half hour to get what we needed..  this is the second time we had been there and the service was terrible both times. 
 The last time I went in there I observed: cross contamination unfriendly service(no two part greeting) dirty rag BUCKETS left ON THE COUNTER where they set the tongs for serving food no hand washing by employees and confusion with my order although it was a simple one consisting of 12 strips.Also another customer came in while I was waiting and asked if they could prioritize her order because she was in a hurry. They said yes but it resulted in a lot of confusion between employees which drastically slowed service time. The customer complained about the wait which resulted in an indifferent response from a employee. He said \if you wanted your order faster you should have called it in\. He said this with an attitude. Then he turned to me and asked if I thought he handled that correctly and I said no. In the end being a former employee of this establishment I was very disappointed with the cleanliness and customer service. 
 The most family oriented work out place in town.  We love the indoor family and warm water pools. The nursery staff is excellent. I like that when we come in to drop the kids off at the nursery they greet us by our first names.  I love the infrared sauna they recently put in. One advice I would give to people who are considering of joining is that you don't have to get the most exclusive membership like gold cove if you are only going to work out on the machines. We have gold cove the most expensive membership which allows you to have exclusive access to outdoor water park during summer and most of the group fitness classes offered in the club but we hardly go to group fitness class and hardly go to outdoor water park. The water temperature is still cold even it is 80 degrees out. This past summer we went to the outdoor water park maybe two- three times the most and stayed out no more than half hour. So it really isn't worth to have a gold cove unless you know you are looking for specific classes with GC membership. The parking and getting the machine to work out can be a problematic during winter months between 4:30-7:00PM. Sometime you may have to wait 15-20 minutes for the machine to free. If that's the case you can go sit in the sauna until some people leave. So I would suggest go there early in the morning or late in the evening but then if you are bringing along your little ones you run into problems with daycare after nursery is closed. They have a restaurant that offers supposedly healthier food but we never had any luck with the food there. The taste is okay and price is a little bit on the high end for the amount you get. 
 I never belonged to another gym.  It's a solid place to work out.  You can get involved or stay solo and no one mind.  The staff is very nice. 
 I was a member at this club for 5 years.  So I have a lot to say but not nearly enough Yelp space in which to do it so I shall do my best to summarize.Pros1. Three indoor swimming pools + two jacuzzis2. Lots and lots of cardio equipment + 4 different weight areas3. Indoor soccer field track basketball courts and racquetball courts4. Lots of classes - aerobics swimming spinning etc5. Outdoor pools with waterpark6. ChildcareCons1. Expensive membership with required 2 year contract2. You only have access to all the things listed above under the Pros section if you have the Gold Cove membership which is the most expensive package.  Regardless of having the most expensive membership you still have to pay extra for most of the classes.  3. If you have anything less than the Gold Cove membership there is one older woman at the front desk as you check in who will look at you like you're trying to steal the tanning bed she lives in.  However there is also a younger one with long dark hair who is more of an equal opportunity offender.  She'll treat you like crap no matter what your status.4. If you don't have Gold Cove forget about going to the waterpark unless you want to pay 23 dollars per person to get in.  5. Do not I repeat DO NOT bring in any of your own food.  If they catch you anywhere in the facility with so much as a pretzel stick they will go off on you thusly informing you that you can only consume food and beverages purchased at THEIR lounge/bar/crappy food place.  Because you know you might be trying to smuggle in crack cocaine with your pretzels. 6. Lounge/bar area serves you the crappiest overpriced food you can find.  I don't know about the bar because I didn't go to a health club to drink.  7. Parking is a nightmare especially in the mornings and right around the time people are coming home from work.  While that is to be expected the countless number of SUVs and big pick ups with something to prove stalking people as they head to their vehicles makes for a dangerously crowded and highly annoying situation.There you have it.  Nice club with nice amenities just be prepared to part with your money and deal with a few annoying aspects. 
 UNSUPERVISED KIDS!!  The signs tell parents to watch their kids but I haven't been there ONCE when there weren't children running about the cycle & elliptical machines playing tag or something.  Most machines are par for the course.  Some are a bit outdated.  They don't have personal tv's on each machine like some clubs but they do have a group of tv's you can tune into while working out using your headset.  You can't go into the sauna unless you are wearing a swimsuit (not just a towel).  It's not the worst place I've ever seen; the environment just didn't really fit my expectations as a single professional. 
 Best gym in the area.I have been a member of 3 different gyms in the Madison area and none have impressed me like Prairie Athletic Club. The facilities are clean staff is friendly and efficient and they have great equipment!I love the different workout areas - there are several rooms with cardio and weights equipment so you can find your favorite spot or rotate through them all of a change of scenery. There are several pools both indoor and out saunas in the locker rooms and a hot tub.The group fitness classes are offered at several times throughout the day so it's easy to find a class & time that fit your schedule. Classes are only included with the most expensive membership but it is so worth it. The membership is very affordable especially compared to other gyms that I've tried where you get much less for almost the same price. 
 I've belonged to this place for a couple of years now. Before that I went to the Sun Prairie YMCA and before that the east side Princeton Club (we lived on the east side and then moved to Sun Prairie). I like this place. The locker room is clean enough the front desk staff are fast to check me in and the 'waterpark' part (of which we are very new members) is fine. I nearly always bring at least one child when I come and the nursery staff are mostly a great bunch. My older kids are taking part of the summer daycamps and everyone I've dealt with for that has been great. I've never eaten in the restaurant and so have nothing to add there. Mostly I use the cardio equipment upstairs (they have bikes ellipticals and stair climbers but I'm all about the treadmills). Nearly all the cardio equipment has its own little tv set. I haven't taken any classes so far though I'm eyeing the Zumba (pray for me) and the yoga. I'm intimidated by the Spinning classes but may yet grow a spine. They seem to have a lot of different classes. They own the hockey place across the street (a new one coming up by the high school) and my understanding is that it will be razed and more parking added. I don't think the parking situation is terrible now but I try very hard to go during non-peak hours (I am lucky to have a choice most days). 
 If you want to sweat exercise and have fun they have it all.  They have free weights universal machines treadmills stair climbers elliptical machines bikes a running track basketball courts volleyball courts an indoor soccer field an indoor pool and outdoor water park aerobic classes massage services personal trainers racquetball courts a conference room a full service bar a flat grill menu and probably much more. 
 Have been going to MCV Salon for more than a year. Always excellent service. Corina is friendly and energetic.  I always get a fantastic haircut.  Very well put together shop. 
 I admit I have very high expectations when it comes to service and this place was AMAZING. The stylist definitely took the time to listen to my concerns regarding my hair gave me a oil/ head massage before shampooing my hair a hand massage while my hair was conditioning and an amazing cut all for the low price of $33! I already have plans to make it back. Thank you for being so wonderful! 
 I've been convinced to re-write my review for this particular Walmart.  The previous review I wrote was pretty bad.  So allow me to begin again.This Walmart location is one of the teeny tiny original designs.  The parking lot has so many huge dips and holes I sometimes think I am being forced to go spelunking in my car.  The old lady greeters at the front door are my favorite part of the experience because they remind me of grandma.  But they would probably mace me if I tried to run up and give them a hug.  They have a fabric department which seems to be a feature that the newer super walmarts are missing.  Unfortunately the store is usually running a skeleton crew most of the time so it's hard to find an employee in that section of the store who knows how to cut some fabric.  Most of the employees here are like most of the employees at any Walmart underpaid and overworked.  So it doesn't bother me too much when they frown at me.  I've been on the other side of the register before so I know how soul crushing it can be.  Though they may not be frowning at me because of that reason they probably just know I'm an incredible dufus.  However there is one employee there who is usually cashiering and has this wonderful Russian accent.  She's also very friendly and cheery.  The other day she was telling me about growing her own basil freezing it in ice cube trays with chicken stock and then plopping the cubes in rice later on for flavoring.  Tricky tricky!  Anyway I guess I am more impressed by the larger Walmart in Monona that has the shopping cart escalators.  I could stand there all day and launch carts down that thing it really revs up the dork in me.  But in the meantime if I don't feel like heading over that way I could just stop at this Walmart to get maced by the grannies and listen to cooking recipes from Nina. 
 It is a walmart so i never expect much but i think this is the smallest walmart i have ever seen! the selection was slim to non. and the school supplies were all over the store.  I dont think that i would ever go back to this store! the cashiers were very slow and the managment semi unapproachable! 
 I live in Sun Prairie but I drive to the east side of Madison Wal-mart instead of using this one about half the time. This store is SMALL. And OLD. In a word: dingy. It does have a fabric department (as does the east side Madison store) which is better than that giant thing in Monona (though that has underground parking which I love). The employees at this location vary from indifferent to pretty helpful. The cashiers are mostly the former. Having done that exact job I can relate.  They have a couple of small aisles with food stuffs (bread cereal) and there are coolers in the front with milk and OJ which is wonderful when all you need is some cheap fabric a gallon of milk and a tube of mascara. There are plans to build a new Wal-Mart right behind this one then demolish this one and turn it into parking lot. I am waiting with baited breath. 
 This is a brand-new Walmart that was built right next to the old one. They are currently tearing down the old one and if I remember right are going to use that space as parking lot. I hope that is correct especially after my visit today. I saw three separate vehicles (one on the way in and two on the way out) waiting for somebody to back up and open a spot. No big deal right? Except that both cars sat and waited for a few minutes. I thought the first car was disabled because it sat there so long. The store itself is fine. It's a Super Walmart so it has the grocery store side. It's a lot like the one in Monona but without the fun underground parking (best thing I've ever seen in a Walmart) and escalator. I tried to check out using the self-checkout because it is faster when I only have ten items or so. Well this self-checkout machine was troublesome. It kept telling me I had unauthorized items in bagging area (uh it was the item I'd just slid over the laser) and then it said I had a restricted item and needed cashier approval to finish up and pay. I didn't have any alcohol bullets weapons or cigarettes. I had a 2-pack of lighters which was probably it but why? At any rate the guy monitoring the self-checkout had to come over and help me three different times. This was in no way faster than just going through a regular register. The cashier who helped me to checkout and a guy I asked about Nutella were both nice but it was an overall frustrating experience. Having the last part be the worst part didn't help. 
 Well it's been 3 years since I last reviewed this Walmart.  Here we are now in 2014 and they've torn down the old tiny Walmart building and erected a gigantor super Walmart just behind where the old one sat.  I'd like to dance and prance through fields of flowers and sing the praises of this new \super\ Walmart but I can't.  Have you ever been to a ghost town?  Have you ever been to a ghost store?  *Cue the creepy music*This super Walmart has all the usual stylings you find at most super Walmarts.  You know what else it has in common with other super Walmarts?  A skeleton crew.  There are 4 cashiersmanning the 20 check out lanes and two customer service peeps behind the counter.  All the other employees are stretched as thin as possible to cover the rest of the store.  I'm in sporting goods I need a fishing license.  Nope.  You will have to walk all the way back to customer service and request help.  They will then call for help in the sporting goods section over the PA.  Next step:  enter the grumpy overworked employee.  This is the standard MO for all departments.  If you can't help yourself you will be going on a hunt for the elusive poorly treated employee.   This is not unusual for Wally world these days.  Many locations run on a skeleton crew so the bazillionaire Waltons can save a buck. 
 The parking lot is all done now so getting in and out is much less difficult. Either this place is set up oddly or I am because I can never find anything there. I wander around until either finding somebody or giving up (it's about 50/50). 
 Inexpensive friendly tasty diner. I was in town last week and my friend suggested we meet up at the Country Cafe. I got the cinnamon roll french toast with a side of sausage links and coffee. We spent about three hours talking there (all the way from breakfast to lunch!) but the servers were completely gracious about it. Our grand total after downing a ton of food was a little over $12 for both of us. Yay for specials!From the outside it is not the most scenic of  restaurants but inside is what counts! 
 Well how-deee ya'll!!  Are you 90 years old?  Do you live in or around Sun Prairie?  Well then you must hang out at the Country Cafe!  Everybody from the old folks home was here tonight.  Most of the time I love old people and here is why.  They are old enough now that they will say what they want and not think twice you know why?  Cuz they are old and what are you gonna do?  Take away their walkers?  Take the brake off their wheelchairs?  Hell no you ain't!  I am drawn to slightly inebriated old ladies and goofy old dudes who spend the evening talking at length about mosquitoes and hip replacements.  Hey look!!  There is a guy over in the corner with all his teeth on the table and another dude with a dog hidden under the table.  That man over there is pushing an empty wheelchair around in circles!  It's like a geriatric wonderland and I am Alice!  The food here is just ok but the prices are very cheap and the service is excellent.  I wanna be awesome when I'm 90.  *crossing my fingers* 
 Great place for great breakfasts and service. Home cooked and friendly competent staff. 
 My next-door neighbor who is 84 and has lived in Sun Prairie all her life recommended this place for breakfast. It has some very kitschy decor (basic small-town breakfast restaurant style) with lots of gingham and wooden chickens but I didn't care. Nothing on the menu looked very exciting and it seemed like everything cost a dollar or two more than I would have expected. But the waitress was extremely nice the coffee was good and the food (I got the mushroom and cheese omelet) was great. My omelet had three (3!) kinds of cheese and lots of nice 'shrooms inside. It was terrific and also came with hash browns and my choice of toast/pancakes/muffin. I got the rye toast as always.  We got there around 8:30am (on a weekday) and almost had the place to ourselves but more people kept trickling in as we ate. 
 I live in Colorado and was returning home to Wisconsin for a wedding. So happy to find this amazing little diner off of Highway 151. A hardy old-fashioned breakfast with real food and friendly service 
 I hope that a sinkhole opens under this nuisance.  The lack of noise barriers and the racing of unregulated unmuffled cars makes this audible for miles around on Sundays in the summer.  If this was in any other city it would have been closed long ago for noise and pollution inside city limits.  Hopefully the new assistant living community right next door will complain enough that it gets shut down. 
 Dear Angell Park even when I don't know who's behind the wheel any more it's still pretty cool to see those guys drive the hell out of that clay track. Old school fun. Thanks for the nostalgia! You're still cool. Xoxo Stephanie 
 Great experience.  Great ice cream.  Always a good alternative to the restaurant across the parking lot.DQ rocks... 
 I cannot recommend DQ's food. It is edible but not great. But who on earth goes here for anything but ice cream? They have a pretty good selection of grab-and-go stuff in the freezer by the door and there is a drive-through. The inside is very small and they close up for a month (I want to say January) I'm guessing for the owners to snowbird it. Every ice cream item I've ever gotten from here has been great. I had a pumpkin Blizzard in the fall that was DELISH. If you are the first car through the drive-through you should count your lucky stars. If you aren't the first then you might have quite a wait (understandable since the car in front of you might be ordering Peanut Buster Parfaits for the entire marching band and you'd never know until it was too late). A couple of times I've dealt with employees who seemed to hate me and whatever I was ordering (the median age of these people seems to be about 19) but the ice cream was still great . Other times I've had extremely friendly and happy-seeming people at the window/register. Again yummy ice cream. 
 This DQ location has an update: they are now paired with Orange Julius and so had to get rid of the fryers. I'm fine with that; I'm just there for the sugary treats anyhow. I try not to visit this place too often as it is completely unredeemable nutritionally. But so yummy! Anyway I was intrigued by the Blizzard flavor of the month (or as the sign says the BLIZZ FLAV): Lemon Meringue. So I buckled the kids in the minivan and headed out. It's summer vacation so I don't feel bad about having them out after 9pm. It seems like most of Sun Prairie felt the same way because when we got there we were the sixth car or so in line for the drive-through. Instead of waiting forever in line with the engine running I parked in the miniscule lot and walked in. I was then second in line behind some squirrely teenage girls. There were three young people working and they were seriously running their arses off. The young woman who helped the teen in front of me and then me was nothing but professional and courteous. My Blizzards were perfection (Lemon Meringue and Mint Oreo). I docked a star just because the place is so squished. 
 I'm embarrassed to be writing this review. Why you ask? Well it means coping to a number of things: 1. I was at Dairy Queen. I'll stop there. Naw I'll keep going...2. Even though I'm lactose intolerant there's just something about a blizzard I can't say no to.  3. Yes even Yelp's lover of local winds up at a chain every now and again. It's usually during a dark period or when I'm leaving a meeting in Sun Prairie and I drive by the only DQ I know of in Wisconsin. 4. The basis for my low rating is a terrible blizzard that crushed all my blizzard dreams. 5. The real basis for my low rating is the fact that they took out friers so gone are the days of crisp \chicken\ fingers and white bread... seriously why were the baskets served with white bread? At the end of the day the product and I mean water maaaaaybe skim milk and flavoring just didn't meet my expectations as blizzards have before. (I told you I'm embarrassed) Add to this the fact that when it comes to \Brazier\ all you can get is a hot dog swimming in funky hot dog water and there's little to no reason for me to stop here anymore. I want to take this opportunity to apologize to Michael's Culver's and most of all Kopps in Milwaukee. I'll never stray again. You shouldn't either. 
 I was travelling from Minneapolis to Indiana with friends when our car broke down in Madison WI at 10 PM. I called Triple A and they dispatched Prarie Land Towing. Shawn the driver tried to jump start the vehicle.  When that failed he hooked us up and towed us in. Meanwhile he called ahead to have someone at the shop prep a loaner car for us to use locally until the shop opened in the morning.We called around 8 AM but they didn't have a report yet so we called to have a rental car ready. We asked about whether they were open on Sundays because that was when we would be coming back through. Although not normally open on Sunday they were willing to make arrangements with us so we could pick up the car.At 10:15 AM they called to let us know whe could pick up the car in 15 minutes. We cancelled the rental and were on the road by 11 AM. Because of the folks at Prairie Land Towing we made it to our conference arriving only a few hours later than we planned but without missing any major events.If you're ever stranded in the Madison WI area ask for Prairie Land Towing! 
 I walked into this place and the following came to mind:\In 1972 a crack commando unit was sent to prison by a military court for a crime they didn't commit. These men promptly escaped from a maximum security stockade to the Los Angeles underground. Today still wanted by the government they survive as soldiers of fortune. If you have a problem if no one else can help and if you can find them maybe you can hire the A-Team.\I'll have to go back several times to look at all the stuff they got.  Floor to ceiling wall to wall there isn't anywhere you can look and not see something that could blow yer ass up or at least hurt it real bad.  FUN!!! 
 Never thought to review a gun shop... anyhow the owner was extremely helpful as I am admittedly a novice when it comes to firearms. I picked up a 5 and 30 round magazine a tactical bag (carrying case) and a couple boxes of ammo for my AK-47. He also pointed me in the direction of a few shooting ranges that are assault rifle friendly since not all will allow AK-47 AR-15s and the like. 
 Bought three guns from there.  The owner Trig probably not a coincidence to trigger ws very helpful everytime.  Very legit and better prices than the Gander Mountain down the Road.  Would recommend! 
 Knowledgeable & friendly you can't ask for more. 
 Had our wedding here and it was fantastic! Absolutely loved working with Stacey - she answered all our questions and got back to us in a timely manner. They were totally flexible and the servers/bartenders were phenomenal! We have had nothing but compliments about our wedding I would recommend Windsor in a heartbeat!Because we booked our wedding reception on Friday night we were told we would be receiving a \complimentary\ champagne toast. After the wedding though we received a bill charging us for the service fee and gratuity for pouring the champagne. We paid it without any grievances but it would have been nice if they would have informed us of this when we were going over the preliminary invoice. Other than this minor issue Windsor was wonderful! 
 I recently went to a wedding reception here. I felt sorry for the bride and groom. The place was not clean for starters. The food was the worst part. The salad was soggy from the dressing sitting on it for far too long and then they put on top a hot fresh baked bread stick that came from the freezer which in turn made the salad hot. I had the sirloin it was cold chewy and bland. My date had the vegetarian pasta it was over done spinach pasta with some sort of flavorless cream sauce and veggies. Mix in overpriced drinks and you have one of the worst wedding reception venues ever. Stay away! 
 My daughter's Quincea\u00f1era+/Sweet 16 Formal was held here at Lake Windsor Golf and Country Club on Sunday April 10th 2011.  I scouted a few locations with a few places never getting back to me.  We've a large amount of family and friends for this traditional celebration so I needed a place that was both Big (enough for 300+ guests) Bold (that WOW factor when they even entered the building foyer and ballroom) and Beautiful (for a place that would accentuate my daughter and her Epic Ballgown.)I sent an email to Lake Windsor with no response.  Two weeks later I called turns out my email was never received. See?  It pays to follow-up!  My contact from then on was with Ms. Jennifer Larson the general manager to Lake Windsor Golf and Country Club.  I need you to understand that this traditional event was very important.  I have been thinking about my daughters 'Coming of Age' party since she was five (5) and I went into the planning stages of this event early in 2009.  Jennifer and I spoke by phone and we met up the following afternoon. She was very informative knowledgeable and welcoming. No one had had such an event there at Windsor so she was very excited about this one!  We read and reviewed the contract gave her a non-refundable deposit check and we were in the booking book!My daughter Dylilah and I reviewed the menu and decided on a buffet style lunch and the vendors I worked with (Cake Balloons Statues Slide Show Lion Dancers etc.) had no issues having access to the property the day of.If you'd like to see how great it turned out and how beautiful Windsor (and my daughter) really is we've got the video here: http://youtu.be/DCX7KZQCzcE?t=2m8sNo they are not inexpensive but you get what you pay for and truly I'm sure Lake Windsor will take your wishes and concerns seriously and execute them into an unforgettable time as they did with us! 
 Had the best time at a wedding reception here. Highly considering it for my next formal event. The scenery is gorgeous very spacious staff is welcoming. It's very clean here and the golf course isn't bad! 
 I've been to a wedding here a few years ago.  It was nice but I don't remember a whole lot about it.  I'm more about the golf.How you like this course will likely depend on when you go.  If it's been raining recently or is a \wet summer\ you'll find several holes are quite soggy.  Greens fairways teeboxes - all areas can be affected.During dry periods like today (it rained 3 days ago) it wasn't bad and the course was in relatively good shape.  I don't know if it was the sunshine or how the rough was cut (or not cut) but it was really hard to spot a ball in areas where it should be easy.  That was frustrating. The course layout is nice with some rolling elevation change (nothing drastic) and water in play on many holes.  A few par 4's will make you think about going around or over water for your second shot - that's always fun!So while not my favorite course in in the area I will golf here often.  It nice enough and if you look around you can find some good deals.  The staff are always very pleasant and helpful. 
 Good bar and the food is ok not remarkable but good.  Portions sort of skimpy but they ar ealways expanding the menu.  They do have a pretty good Rib eye however but nothing else was that memorable.  I will eat there again I'm sure. 
 Great food new management greatly improved. The wings are very good. The fish fry is top notch the Walleye is very good too. 
 Stuck in Lodi for the day I couldn't find a place for lunch and I dared not to try \The Pizza Pit\ in town. I thought I'd head east and come here for lunch since I didn't find anything better. Years ago this used to be a place called Stockade and I loved it. Now it's a Badgers/Packers bar and grill. Visible from I-90 just west of Madison there's a cheese place (Mouse Haus I believe) and warehouses for Pepsi and Walgreen's nearby. The Rodeside Grill resembles a log cabin style fort from the outside. Years ago this place used to be called Stockade.Once inside it's quite spacious with high ceilings and an all wood interior except for the tile on the floor. The whole place looks very clean not grungy and aged like so many bars in Wisconsin. I sat down to eat at the bar. All along the bar counter there were blurbs and excerpts of Packers and Badgers accomplishments underneath the laminated countertop. The place even had green-colored ductwork so I knew I was deep in Packers territory.A big screen TV aired game highlights from the Packers-Saints NFL season opener from the day before. Large men with mustaches came in for lunch typical Wisconsin body types. I kept a low profile and my Chicago origin and calmly requested the Friday fish fry special. Having traveled up north on many occasions this wasn't the first time I was surrounded by Packer fans. It's not hard to deal with them if you don't disclose where you're from and stick to the menu items or make a positive comment about Jordy Nelson being an awesome rising star on the team.The fish arrived in a few minutes and it came with a side of fries that were seasoned and coated - quite tasty in fact. Coleslaw is also a can't-miss item north of Illinois and this place has it right too. I found the meal quite enjoyable. The bartender got me another iced tea and then spent a few more minutes of admiring the place. The Packers highlights gave way to NASCAR on the TV but I was on my way 150 miles from Chicago once again.While I went for the fish Rodeside also has some good burgers from what I saw around me at lunch that day. Worth a stop on your way to the Dells or Lodi for that matter. Just leave the Bears stuff in the car. 
 We broke down on the road and and eat here we had a very good meal. We would stop here again. 
 Met a client there for lunch and I thought the food was good. It is located right off the highway so it is easy to get to. There is a private lot which makes parking easy and they did have lots of options on the menu. I had the philly beef sandwich that was pretty good. The other plus is they have lots of daily specials every day. Not sure when I would be back but I would not hesitate to bring a client there or eat lunch there if I found myself in the area. 
 Went to check out the Rodeside Grill for breakfast last Saturday with a group. Most of us haven't been there before but we heard good things from friends and saw the Breakfast menu online and thought we should try it out. Got a super warm greeting at the door and seated immediately. Had a nice dining area separate from the bar area and was clean an spacious. Our group was rather chatty so it took us a while to order but the waitress was very nice and patient. I got the Southwestern Omelet with pancakes - a little spicy but good. Others in our group got the french toast and one got prime rib and eggs. All were happy. Yummy food and good portions. Cost was decent - and we all got $ off for checking in on Facebook! We were very pleased and are planning on coming back again to try dinner. 
 Food is average but for the prices they charge it should be better.  Nice atmosphere. 
 My wife and I discovered Roadside while house hunting in the area...simply put...good food atmosphere and friendly and efficient service!!!Highly Recommended!! 
 Bar is okay and the atmosphere is nice.  Food is below average and pricey. Our food was cold and when we commented on that the sever didn't seem to care. 
 Great service here and really good food. The dairy is from a local farm. I had the Sassy Cow cheese curds made with cheese from a local farm and the smokehouse burger. Make sure you try their ranch it's also made in house. Our server Roxy was world class. Docking 1 star because the fries weren't too tasty. The ranch definitely saved them. 
 Don't go in the Drive Thru if there are more than 3 cars. You will sit there for 20 minutes. 
 Lifetime favorite. Restaurant was recently renovated  added more seating and updated decor. 
 Love me some A&W.   Best fast food out there and there needs to be more of them! 
 This location always prepares everything well fresh fast and they are friendly.  I visit here from work in Sun Prairie maybe once every couple of weeks.  My normal selection is the Coney Dog Combo but with cheese curds.  Kind of on the expensive side (give the cheese curds substitution) at $8.00 and some change but a nice alternative from the same old crap.The cheese curds are awesome.  They are soft and have a light coating of breading (probably just flour) compared to Culver's which is more breading than crust and normally not even melted.I'd recommend going here if in the area and in the mood for some better fast food. 
 When I was younger my aunt and uncle and cousins lived in Kenosha WI.  We would drive up a few times a year to visit them and after 2 hours of peering out the car windows along 94 my brother and cousins and I would be dying to get out of the car at any of the attractions along the way--Six Flags the outlet malls or any of the many cheese shops that announced your arrival to Wisconsin.  When I went skiing with friends at Cascade Mountain last winter years of unfulfilled longing swept over me and I demanded that we stop at one.  The one we selected was the Mousehouse Cheesehaus chosen mostly for it's cute sign and awesome name.  Being a lover of all things dairy walking in I beelined for the cheese counter demanding samples of anything and everything.  Oh my!  Anything from a basic kid friendly American to a 15 year aged Cheddar to their own special haus cheese.  I probably walked out with a good 2 lbs of various cheeses (and am still wondering how those seemed to add 10 lbs to my figure but that's another story).  In addition there were the usual Wisconsin knick knacks including many types of beers wines and other kitsch-y stuff like ashtrays and bottle openers.  The woman working at the counter didn't seem too charmed by my friends and I but I'm sure I would tire of travelers demanding cheese nibbles after a while myself. 
 My boyfriend and I made a trip to Wisconsin Dells for my birthday and stopped here on the way back to Chicago to get some cheese. All of the employees here were extremely helpful and friendly. Cheese was decent priced and delicious. I'd recommend it. 
 Great little shop off of the interstate. I was looking for a place to go that wasn't fast food and wasn't the same old-same old. I was surprised how much I liked this place. Made to order deli-sandwiches cheese fudge a New Glarus beverage and Southern Comfort? Yes Southern Comfort. True one stop shopping. I will make this a regular stop between Elgin and Minnesota! 
 Stop here! Buy a block of the dill Havarti and try a bunch of samples. I am sure there will be others that you love :) 
 Sample the many varieties of cheese and take some Butter Swiss home you will love the flavor!! :) 
 Was very disappointed at my recent experience at the mousehouse!!! I have been there before and they had always been so nice not the case this time the lady talked down to us about the difference of white and yellow cheddar and just seemed over all bothered by our presence.  So needless to say we didn't ask for a single sample.  Next time we will not going back. 
 I stopped at the mousehouse on my drive home from Wisconsin Dells soley because i thought the name of it was adorable. Inside its very warm & welcoming. We were the only people in there and were asked by 4 different people if we wanted any samples or had any questions. The staff is amazing and excited to help you which makes me excited to be there! They were all very pleasant to us. They have delicious deli sandwiches that are made to order. I walked out with some fresh string cheese cheese whips a snack pack of beef and cheese and two blocks of cheese. It was very reasonably priced in there. And of course you can try any of them before buying them! I highly reccommend the Mousehouse Jack (their house blend cheese) & the Habanero cheese. It's got kick to it but it's delicious! I will definately be stopping again on my next trip past there.The horseradish & the asiago cheese spreads are AMAZINGLY delicious. as well. be sure to pick up a cheese spread knife for $.99 & a box of crackers on your way out because you'll want to snack on your way home. 
 I'm disappointed by my last stop to the Mousehouse.  I thought I would go outside the box and try the cheese whips (think the string cheese they put in Bloody Mary's) 2 year old sharp cheddar and the Port Wine Cheese Spread.  Total cost:  $20The cheddar tasted sweet (I know weird right?) and the cheese whips had an off taste and were just nasty certainly not worth the calories.  The Port Wine Cheese spread was okay but nothing special.  I could have bought something that tasted the same at the grocery.  Disappointed.  My parents love the Mousehouse and always stop on their way to Milwaukee and always get me the cheese curds.  I will be sticking to those from now on as they are tasty and fresh. 
 What an adorable little cheese shop! Stopped off to break up the endless drive home and for a bathroom break. Little did I know I would come out armed with cheese.We got a nice lesson on cheese. I was worried that it wouldn't be refrigerated for a few hours and they assured me it would be fine and it is. I'm always such a freak when it comes to keeping food cool but trusted the cheese experts.A very nice lady let us try some of the cheese curds and told us how the cheese becomes a block which is something neither of us knew about. Ended up getting the garlic and dill cheese curds which were amazingly fresh and tasty. They are so good when they squeak.I stepped over to look at another case. A very helpful young gentleman helped me decide and gave me samples and offered to give me samples. Very nice trying before buying. He knew his cheese.Ended up with:-Horseradish & Chive Havarti- Swiss and Rye-Garlic Cheeseand some garlic pickles. That Scope mouthwash that breaks through the onion better work! I told the guy the best cheese we have found was at Costco. He looked like he was appalled and right fully so in the cheese state. However Costco does get some good cheese in from NY.Very nice and helpful staff and some really excellent cheese! They have a little deli counter for sandwiches some good looking candy and other knick knacks.Worth a stop! 
 We always seem to miss these cheese shops passing through the Dells. We stopped here coming back from Des Plaines in Oct. and it's right off the exit. As you enter there is a display of fudge but they only want to cut it for you on the way out. Next are all the gadgets and gifts. I got some cool reading glasses a ghost cheese spreader body shampoo a WI shot glass cheese slicer. We were hosting the upcoming fountain pen meeting and bought a great variety of meats and cheeses. One large beef summer sausage I brought to my thanksgiving hostess. Picked up a cranberry jelly various crackers. I got to sample all the cheese spreads and settled on the sharp cheddar. I loved the beef and cheese snack pack because they came in small bites. We left with a few sundries and of course the fudge. Be prepared to drop at least $100. And this was us restraining ourselves. 
 We've always enjoyed the Mousehouse.  We don't visit as much since we don't drive that way anymore but that's okay as their prices are a little higher than any of the cheese coops you can visit off the interstate. 
 Free samples of cheese cheese spreads and fudge! As good as it gets! I love this place. We bought about $15 worth of cheese after being pampered and trying about 10 different types of cheese 5 types of cheese spreads and 2 types of fudge. The store has tons of Wisconsin favorites which I suppose is in part of attracting tourists to think that they are purchasing purely \Wisconsin\ delicacies! 
 Drives into WI are not new to me family trips during my childhood are some of my fondest memories. But my parents were never ones to make leisurely stops so whenever the chance comes up to stop somewhere cute or kitschy I HAVE to stop.  And who doesn't love the cute little mouse sitting on a pyramid of cheese?  My husband and I stopped here on the way to MN a few years ago and I am always bugging him to stop here whenever we drive this way.The MouseHouse offers some great WI items--cheese beer wine and cute gifts. I think the prices are reasonable as this most recent time I bought 2 blocks of Buffalo Cheddar 2 bags of cheese curds a small tub of bacon cheddar spread and 6 pack bottles of Spotted Cow for only $20plus.Service is super friendly. They offered us some samples of cheese and offered to place some of my items on the counter for me so I could be hands free to shop some more. The place looks a little rundown but as long as they keep offering quality products with a smile we'll keep stopping to shop.*For the stroller set* Just an FYI at the time of this review keep your diaper bag in the car there is no changing table available in the bathroom. 
 Stopped in at the Mousehouse to check out the selection of cheese and candies.  I probably would have been much more impressed if this were my first cheese store but since I was just recently at Mars Cheese Castle this was no comparison.  I found a couple of cheese spreads that were tasty but unfortunately like another reviewer posted nothing really different that I can find in the grocery store.  They have a nice selection of cheese to choose from and it was fun to stop in and check it out but I would prefer to go to another. 
 SO happy we stopped here. Wisconsin cheese wine & beer...perfect for dinner!!! We tried about 10 cheeses and fudge. ..they were all so good.The dark chocolate caramel salted fudge was delicious. Glad we stopped here and so will you. :) 
 Right off the freeway next to a gas station. We couldn't visit Wisconsin without a trip We had low expectations since it looked cheesy (yes I said it) from the outside and we expected this place to be a regular liquor store. But it is truly a wonderful world of cheese fudge  great wine end beer selections. they have a table where you can sample any of their many cheese spreads. Here are some of the flavors: taco smoked port wine bacon pumpkin cranberry garlic etc. So many choices so little money unfortunately. Then there was the selection of blocks of every kind of cheese. The staff was very knowledgable and helpful. You can sample pretty much everything besides the alcohol of course. I love this place and would come back someday if I want to make the 9 hr drive again. But I got a brochure so I can order online too. 
 I like that this place has a big selection of craft beers. They have a mix and match section which is $9.99 for a 6 pack. That is pretty standard pricing. The guy was very knowledgeable and gave me recommendations as to what I would like. They have a huge cheeses wine fudge and specialty food items. You could sample whichever cheese you wanted many of them unique. We know Wisconsin is full of cheese and boy did this place deliver. At check-out they had fudge pops which were also pretty tempting. 
 So...we stopped here on our way home from vacation. Because we definitely didn't buy enough cheese in the Dells...lmao.There's lots of tasty cheese to choose from here. We bought a few bricks but the one that stands out to me is the pizza cheese. It was super good! Try it out. It's a cute little shop a good selection with some unique choices!THe staff is really friendly too. They were happy to help us and gave us some samples. 
 I love cheese! This place is like I imagine many others throughout Wisconsin. But since I went to this one and liked it 5 stars.We stopped here on a road trip and was happy to see it open before 10. Walking in we saw more than just a cheese house. They had specialty gifts wine beer and fudge amongst a haven of cheese. The people who worked here were incredibly helpful and friendly. They were happy to give advice about what beer we would like and happily cut samples of cheese. Although we only left with a 6 pack of Wisconsin only beer for $9.99 I was tempted to buy much much more. It is possible we will stop on our way back! 
 For a \cheesehaus\ this place really doesn't have much cheese. I'd say about 70% of the store is \not cheese\ meaning t-shirts souvenirs fudge beer wine jellies and the like. My local grocer has a better selection and better prices (by far!).That said it's a touristy place and fun to stop at. The staff is really nice and happy to offer you samples of anything so you're sure you like it before you invest. Prices are pretty high.You'll like this place a lot more if you're from out of state and don't have a ready source for delicious WI cheese and tasty New Glarus beer. If you live in WI you'll find the same stuff at the grocery store for less money. 
 More than cheese but cheese...If you love cheese you'll like this place.  Heck even if you don't there's still plenty of other stuff to look at (beef jerkey beer/wine fudge etc.).  But really it's abou the cheese.I love me some fresh cheese curds and I have yet to be let down here.  If you're weary just ask someone if they're fresh.  They know and they'll tell you.  The aged cheddar is pretty great if you're in the mood for that.  I will always grab a bag of mozzarella whips - the kids and I will take care of those before they hit the fridge.My dad is a big fan of this place as well.  He'll get an order of brick or some other stinky cheese before heading south and they'll give it a couple extra dips in wax to help it travel better. 
 This particular location helped me out of a potential issue related to closing on my Madison home; the teller Shaun was as professional helpful and friendly as they come - he's definitely an asset to Summit.Gritty details:36 hours before I was due to close on my Madison home the title company called me to \remind\ me that I needed to have a cashier's check at closing to cover the downpayment and closing costs. That was the first I had heard of needing a cashier's check... when I bought my house in AR I just wrote a check and things were good.Apparently this title company doesn't accept personal checks which put me in a bind because my primary bank account is still with a bank in Arkansas. There was absolutely no way I could get a cashier's check from them in less than 36 hours. Eeek!I have a savings account a Visa credit card and an auto loan with this Summit location so I visited them to ask for ideas/help. They suggested using my debit card (from AR) to do a cash advance into my Summit savings account at which point they could generate a cashier's check for me.I called my AR bank and asked them to raise the daily debit limit; they did it immediately. Summit then ran the cash advance and presto-changeo things were golden. Total cost? zero-point-zero! So cool.I've had nothing but great experiences here and today continued that streak. I was truly stressed because I stood to lose my earnest money deposit if the closing would've failed. Shaun and Summit saved the day for me. Thanks! 
 Brought some cds in to sell.  Got a little more than I expected and they took a couple things I wasn't sure anyone but me liked (Vanessa Mae some jazz; but I guess most of my friends are indie rock people).  Lots of stuff great selection of vinyl.  I liked the tape collection and might be back to get some tapes for my '99 subaru.  :)  Also sells DVDs/movies etc. 
 I was not very impressed at all when I recently went in to check out the used record selection. Many of the pop/rock titles seemed overpriced for their condition. This store does not seem very picky about what is selected to sell like they'll just put anything into their bins and slap a price on it no matter how shabby it appears (I felt like mold spores were being released into the air as I looked through the albums). Jazz section seemed a bit better in item quality but was a pretty small selection. If you are ga-ga over used cassettes they have plenty of 'em (kind of an insane amount). CD selection is average. Younger girl working behind the counter seemed apathetic to be there. All in all I'd pass on this store. (They also display some more rare vinyl outside of the store but the covers are all very faded due to sunlight exposure...a bizarre choice for displaying such items!) 
 Might be the worst vinyl focused store I've been into. I'd say 80% of the records including the whatever Beatles records in the \collectibles\ box are beat to heck (and five times the price they should be for the condition). They didn't put records in plastic sleeves. Beat 80s pop records that should be $1-2 in NM/NM shape are $6.50 but hey there is a buy one get one half price or something like that special. Really the dregs of records. I flipped a little bit but there was absolutely nothing. Most of these records should be dumpstered. I'm super pro indie record stores but sometimes when three other stores pass on stuff there is a reason it shouldn't be put out. 
 This is an unpretentious little music store where the focus is definitely CDs. They do have a lot of vinyl but I would have have to agree with other Yelpers that most of the records are in pretty poor condition. They also have VHS movies cassette tapes and a limited but random selection of audiobooks and boxed sets. Not every record store has to be like Championship Vinyl in \High Fidelity\ but I think we all have the expectation that record store employees should be music geeks. And yet when I asked the woman working there if she had the Faces' boxed set \Five Guys Walk into a Bar\ she looked puzzled and stammered out \Who are the Faces?\ On that point alone I have to deduct a star. 
 This place is great when you need a cup of quality Joe but don't want to a) get out of your car and b) go to a fast food drivethru for their horrible brew.  It is drivethru only.The staff is always super-friendly and will come out of their little building to take your order before you get up to the window -- I'm sure this helps with people that are ordering pretentious multi-hyphenate drinks.  The coffee is good strong and nicely priced.  They even put cool little stickers over the sipping hole in the lid so that none of the precious java spills on you.As a disclaimer I must mention that I am completely crushing on the gorgeous girl who waited on me today...  my cup even had a cute lip-shaped sticker on it...  was she flirting?  or was it just a random sticker?  I'll have to go back multiple times and find out. 
 Love this place ...the team makes you feel welcome at the drive thru OR if you run inside for the free WIFI. 
 I really like Java Detours drinks. Especially the Oreo Latte yum!Employees are always very friendly. The one thing that disappointed me is that they had a punch card for customers (buy 10 drinks get one free) and I devotedly brought it with me everytime I went there to get it punched. I was one punch away from a free drink when I handed my punch card over to the employee and she said sorry they discontinued them. I was very disappointed. I understand if they discontinued the punch card concept but at least honor the ones that are still in circulation! 
 Love the drive-through concept (SO much better than Starbucks or McD's!) the coffee the smoothies and the stickers!  I have a little collection of them.  The staff are always super friendly and patient while I'm making up my indecisive Libra mind.Edit: they were also extremely accommodating when I picked up coffee there with two vegan friends.  They have a lot of non-dairy soy-based stuff for the vegans and lactose intolerant among us!  Just one  more reason to love this place. 
 Excellent coffee quick and friendly service and fair prices. There should be more of these places around. Like the little stickers on the lids too. I think mine said \bean juice\ today. 
 Always great coffee and always friendly upbeat baristas!  I love this place and I highly recommend it.  The drive thru is very convienent.  And they have almost any flavored syrup imaginable! 
 A great alternative.  Nice work. 
 i really really like this place - not just because it's right by my house and it's NOT starbucks but those things certainly don't hurt.i love that they have a drive-thru. i love that the staff are genuinely nice people. i love their tiny little nicely-decorated seating area. and most importantly i love their tasty reasonably priced coffee. 
 So I may be the only person in the world who is *not* a fan of Starbucks coffee (it's over-roasted and burned tasting to me)... which is why I'm so glad I found Java Detour - their coffee is smooth the service is out-of-this-world and the location is uber convenient even during rush hour times.Great coffee great service great prices - you can't go wrong.  Solid WIN.I usually get an XL coffee with skim.  Cost: $2.10.  24 ounces of high quality coffee and you're good for the morning afternoon and/or evening.  I also enjoy stopping by on the way home from work and grabbing a decaf as a little \nite cap.\  Every server has been extremely friendly and helpful as well.  If you haven't checked these guys out swing on through and treat yourself to a wonderful coffee experience. 
 Now called 'Moka' I believe new management they cleaned up a lot of the menu and consolidated it. Not nearly as many choices as when it was Java Detour. That said... Absolutely love this place! Sadly it is on the other side of town so we seldom get there but the quality is fantastic. High quality coffee quick and easy to grab and go. Not expensive at all I would go there every day if it didn't take me half an hour out of my way. 
 There service here is AWESOME.  I love coming here mainly for the service.  I don't have a favorite drink but \Mocha\ is a place where you can be comfortable enough to ask what a particular drink is and you won't get a snippy answer.  So I always try something different and I've liked every one of the drinks I've had.  I'm excited to try their iced drinks now that the weather is warming up.  I also like that you can now get a little treat like muffins or different breads.  When I'm in the mood for a coffee and sweet treat they always pop into mind. 
 What can I write about Target that everyone doesn't already know?  The \chic\ alternative to Walmart Shopko or Kmart Target is a one-stop shop for personal care housewares food toys and on and on.  This location was recently remodeled and now boasts a Starbucks and full pharmacy.  Oh and a liquor aisle.  Oh Target all grown up now aren't we...? (takes a swig)For some reason whenever I go to Target to pick up a few things I end up spending $50--what the hell did I buy?  I don't know.  If you do venture out to \Tar-zhay\ go during a weeknight--weekends can be soul-crushing.  Oh and listen up single dudes--Target seems to be crawling with ladies of the female variety.  Perhaps true love is around the corner from the Bounty paper towels... 
 I know... it's Target but it's got pretty much everything you need short of a butcher shop and babysitters. Staff is very helpful... it also houses the closest Starbucks to my home. Since we're talking about 2 miles that's a bit sad but oh well.. 
 It's Target.....get your shop on! 
 The Mrs. went to get a blender there today. The unit she wanted was not available in a box ready for purchase only had one on the display shelf. She asked for help. The reply from boy-flunky: \oh they are in the back and hard to find'. Gee could you be any more motivated? He relented and returned with negative results. Bet he looked real hard. Come on. Any you wonder why American brick and mortar commerce is failing. We are shopping on Amazon tonight. 
 It's Target how can you go wrong?!?I have never had any complaints with this location. It's clean convenient and has an ok grocery section. The check-out lines can be a bit long but they seem to be good about calling for extra cashiers when it's really busy.The one time we were looking for something and they didn't have enough of them in stock they called the nearby Sun Prairie location and arranged it so that our order was waiting at that store when we arrived to purchase it. Very satisfied! 
 I'm usually very pleased with their customer service. However yesterday I felt pushed to make a purchase in the electronic department. He dropped stuff off the counter and I had to pick it up. He didn't even apologize. Overall dissatisfied with the service. 
 I enjoy this place everytime I go in there. Its family owned and has consistently good food. Large soda selection with  awesome crab rangoon. My favorite dish is the Happy family which has beef pork chicken crab and veggies in brown sauce. 
 Way too sweet for my liking. Real authentic Chinese food isn't always sweet. In my opinion if you like sweet taste this much might as well eat candy bar dip in corn syrup as a meal. When I ordered my food a few years back from them they put too much food coloring so much that it looked yellow. It was not appealing to me. But it has been years I haven't been there so they could have improved and better. I sure hope that's the case. 
 As far as take-out places go in Madison this is my favorite. Consistently tasty fair prices large portions and friendly employees. I am eating microwaved general tso's chicken from last night and it is still awesome. Excellent steamed dumplings and egg rolls. 
 The fried dumplings rock! 
 One liner for quick reads:  Fresh made Hot and Sour soup!Yes...they make the Hot and Sour Soup when you order it...no gelatinous nasty leftovers here.  Service can be a little slow but definitely worth it.  Good overall food. Our favorite Chinese takeout.  (note...we always pick up so I cannot comment on the delivery) 
 It was delicious but expensive for delivery. I had the cashew chicken (no veggies so they gave me extra meat - thumbs up!) crab rangoon and a 2-L of soda. Very friendly staff. 
 Singapore dish was perfect!! And they even had my favorite nestea pomegranate & passion fruit .. Huge portions also! 
 Good stuff!  Had the sesame chicken general tsa pot stickers and crab Rangoon.  All were great and were ready quickly. 
 Pretty good for takeout. The meat is more sound than usual Chinese take out 
 My daughter and I stopped in last night for the first time.  I had the Chicken Chop Suey and she had Sweet & Sour Chicken.  We started with an order of Steamed Dumplings.  The dumplings were great.  They had a lot of meat in them.  The Chop Suey was made with a white sauce.  I am used to it being made with a brown sauce.  That did not matter as it was delicious.  The S&S Chicken was wonderful as well.  The S&S sauce that came with it was not laden with all that bright red food coloring.  Very tasty.   She also got an Egg Roll.  It was huge!  We had to split it.  Niiice.  And even though you order and pick your food up at a counter the service was great.  I ordered a Chicken Lo Main to go for my son and she asked me if I wanted them to wait a bit before they cooked it.  I like that!  That tells me that they care about our experience after I pay them!!  A plus!  We've passed this place up numerous times.  Not any more.  We'll be back! 
 Still good but I tried the Chicken Fried Rice.  Don't bother.  The chicken was tasteless.  All they did was steam it.  The seasoning was all in the rice.  Disappointing.  I thought fried rice was an industry standard. 
 My husband and I came in Saturday night to dine in. (Can't say that's a very popular option but I was starving)While we were waiting we were given complimentary crab rangoon.  So nice.  The restaurant is owned by a couple who are incredibly kind.  It made me all warm and fuzzy being customers at such a lovely family establishment. The crab rangoon was piping hot and filled with cheesy crab goodness.The hot and sour soup was incredibly substantial with tons of veggies and delicious broth. It was extra thick and perfect on a cold and windy day.My entree was shrimp and chicken lo mein which I totes recommend.  The shrimp was not overcooked and the noodes were packed again with tons of veggies.   People are nice.Prices are good.Food is huge and tasty.If I didn't live on the West side I'd be here every week. 
 Best Chinese take-out in town. They have the best pork egg rolls I've ever had. The woman who answers the phone and works the counter doesn't speak English very well and yells a lot but I'm willing to put up with that considering their food is so good. 
 Pretty decent. But I think all Chinese in Madison is pretty decent. Nothing has truly blown me away this place included. While staff is nice and carryout is quick food I ordered (veggie fried rice and Mongolian chicken) just didn't have much flavor. Like at all. The menu is extensive though and maybe I need to head back there to try more of it? They make a big claim that if you don't see it on their menu they'll find a way to make it however that didn't hold true when I asked about Cantonese pan fried noodles... an item that seems near impossible to find in this town. 
 Although the staff was friendly and the language was not a barrier for me as it was for others the food I got was not very good. After I ordered the General Tso's Chicken the woman turned on the fryer and without waiting for the oil to heat up she put in the chicken and my crab rangoon. Therefore when I ate the food it wasn't crispy as a good General Tso's/crab rangoon  should be. Another thing that I noticed was that the chicken that she put in the fryer was sitting on the counter in the heat. *note: she hadn't fried any in quite some time which is why she had to turn the fryer on. The person that said the food was too sweet was right. Even though the menu said *spicy for my meal there was no \zip\ at all. Take it for what it's worth but I know I will be looking for another restaurant to get my take out from now on. 
 Best take out Chinese in East Madison.  Food is always fresh and well cooked.  Sometimes you have to make sure they didn't forget the rice - mainly when the woman who typically works the front counter is not there.  I have always found the service to be friendly.  Periodically I have  even received free chicken dumplings or a soda.  By far the best Moo Shu I have found in Madison after living here for 15 years and trying several of the more upscale places in town.FYI there is a small seating area here but it is mainly a takeout place. 
 Best Chinese in town.  Yeah I know Madison is short on good Chinese.  However this place has good prices decent food and great service.1 - Great customer service.  I put that first because it is difficult to find at carry out places.  2 - I had the steamed dumplings as my appetizer.  Delicious! HOT (temperature)! and very satisfying.  They are large in size and 8 in an order for $5.99.3 - For our entree we ordered Chicken Lo Mein and Combo of General Tsao's chicken which came with a pork eggroll.  Everything was delicious and fresh.  The Lo Mein was hot and the noodles were perfectly cooked.  Nothing was over done.  The General's chicken came with pork fried rice.  You could tell everything was fresh.  It had great flavor. The Flaming Wok was not anything new but it was good quality.  The food was hot and delicious.  It was a fair price and the counter guy threw in some extra goodies.  Not to mention after a long Target trip you can call and your food will be ready in 15 minutes. 
 Old Navy!  The place to go for affordable clothing in Madison that doesn't cream Cheap-o like a lot of the \Wet Seal\ type stores do.  Always fantastic sales and the clothes are uber-flattering.  I just picked up a knee-length tweed coat for about $50 and I get compliments every time I wear it.  The staff seem to enjoy their jobs as well.  5 stars! 
 Nice size store with friendly service and a good selection of sizes. The fitting rooms are sometimes a bit messy but that's not really a big mark against the place. Casual fashion at reasonable prices and jeans that fit less-than-skinny ladies. Woot! 
 I haven't been to Old Navy in awhile but I popped in last night to find summer shorts. I didn't find any. I usually head straight for the clearance section and often find clothes for just knocking around for $5 or so. The store is clean and the staff is friendly so I have no specific complaints other than I didn't find anything I liked. 
 Old Navy is one of those places that I totally forgot existed until my sister became employed there. Now I shop here at least twice a month. They are forever having some kind of clearance or sale going on and they a lot of sizes. I believe they go from an XS to a XXL however if they do not have your size in stock they will call over to the West side Old Navy or order it for you online. I have found it that online does have more plus size apparel. They sale shoes accessories skirts dresses shorts hats bags graphic t-shirts and so on. Great store to go to if you're looking for a nice spring dress for a great price. You can also apply for a credit card and get approved immediately. 
 Great service! in and out very plessant service.  wish i lived closer to this store.. the people in this store were wonderful... 
 Earlier this month I got a new phone with Sprint. When it came time for paying my bill after setting up my online account just after receiving it i went online to pay. Post log-in the payment page was \temporarily unavailable\ - for 5 days. So I trudged in to town to go to the Sprint store to make sure that a) my payment wasn't late and b) thatI had a receipt (since Sprint's reliability for payment processing had now been put into question).The store was busy and I did have to wait but I was greeted as I came in and was acknowledged by 2 clerks who were with other customers. When a clerk was free he happily helped me made note of my comment about the website (saying he'd pass the info on) and said that if the problem persisted to come in and they'd see what they could do directly from the store. Very kind service! And everyone seemed genuinely nice - a rarity at a place like that. The store is pretty and well laid-out as well with seats available if you have to wait. So far I'm liking my new service provider. 
 Corp store on Lien rd was not a good choice.  The manager of the store was very unhelpful and gave me the run around about trying to fix my phone. If you want good service with people who actually care go to the store on University Ave 
 This place is awesome! The coffee is fantastic. The staff is super friendly they have comfy seating plenty of room and free wi-fi. You're made to feel comfortable like it's your neighborhood cafe even if you're a first timer.The service is wonderful here. I plan to keep coming back any time I'm in the area I wish they had a better location though.It's the perfect place to wait and enjoy some R&R if you're picking someone up from the airport and really it's just a fantastic little place all together. 
 Perfectly relaxing ambiance with artistic decor. Friendly staff. Tasty food (had the delicious Turkey BLT today). Wonderfully balance cup of cafe latte (soy and vanilla flavor available).They also have a drive-thru option if you're in a hurry. 
 I have come here twice the first time I came here I got a blended coffee drink that wasn't terrible but wasn't memorable either... then the next time I came I got a sandwich that was pretty good but I could of made the same thing at home.... the staff is friendly though.. but I won't be going back.... 
 I purchased the Yelp deal and wasn't able to use it; none of the staff even knew about it. It wasn't a huge deal at the time (though it really would have been nice to use!) but I will be pretty upset if it expires. 
 The staff sucks beyond rude. Shouldn't be in business. Don't know how to make drinks. Don't waste your time or money going to this place. The nut job lady in the morning needs to be on meds. 
 It is a coffee shop. also sells yogurt. WiFi did not work. If you need your fix it is better than nothing 
 Staff know their stuff excellent coffee and food just one door down family-friendly. Foosball couches toys choices choices choices. 
 I love Bongo.  Staff is very knowledgeable and always helpful.  Movies are cheap especially if you go with the bongo bundle or the prepaid card (I forget the details but I think it's something like 10 movies for $24 or so).  I prefer Bongo to Netflix because I feel I end up getting movies that I'm in the mood to watch. 
 Used to be a fabulously affordable restaurant with good food too (and a nice vegetarian plate selection). Then in they suddenly printed new fancy menus (minus the vegetarian listing) jacked up the prices and decorated the place up a little more. After that the food didn't taste as good and the service became lackluster -perhaps forgiveable if not for the price increases. Our little group of Laredo's fans was heartbroken. 
 I didn't think the meal was spectacular but it was fast. I love the salsa and chips they put out and the at atmosphere is casual/enjoyable. I think in the evening it sounds like a fun place but we came for lunch. 
 Pretty good. Nice chips good burrito. Haven't found any Wonderful mexican in Madison so far but this is not bad. 
 Very good mexican food.   Authentic in taste and atmosphere.  The Fajita Guadalajara is our favorite.  We share it and there's plenty for both of us. 
 I've been to Laredo's three times now and it just doesn't do it for me. The food is fine but nothing to write home about. + pretty cheap+ lots of combo platters so you can easily mix it up- chips/salsa not that good- food is only averageTonight I ordered the chimichangas. Instead of one big one you get two smaller ones. Since you get two and your choice of chicken or beef I asked for one of each. They brought my platter and after I took a bite of beans I noticed our waitress hovering over me with another platter. She explained that \this one\ had one of each and that she was going to take the one they gave me and \just throw it away.\ A waste because it wasn't really that big of a deal if they'd brought me two of the same; there was no price difference and I wasn't dead set on having one of each. As it turns out I think they had originally given me what I asked for and took it away because my replacement plate was two chicken chimis*. Food trashed for no reason and potentially the correct order (or they plated it incorrectly twice). *Their idea of chimichangas are really just bigger-than-average flautas; they were open-ended and have no filling aside from the meat. They also offer flautas I wonder if they're just the same thing.Other blips in service:- served everyone but one person at the table and took forever to finally bring them their food (soup)- we had three kids with our group and their parents explained they were going to split a meal between the three of them; the waitress didn't bring any extra plates so we made \plates\ out of napkinsSo yeah. The food there is fine but the atmosphere (dark) and service (lacking) make it pretty low on my list of Mexican places in Madison. 
 There really aren't  many places to eat in Madison as other reviews have stated. Being from NY it really did seem like a no mans land so thankfully Yelp came to our rescue. We went to Laredo's and got carne asada nachos with chicken chimichanga'sand churros. It wasn't the greatest but it wasn't the worst thing in the world. We only got our food to take-out so I don't really know about there wait staff or the bar. We got our food pretty quickly and it was hot but not really well packaged. When we got back to the hotel some  of packages where leaking it was annoying but didn't effect the taste. All the food was good and has something familiar about it. If your in MadisonWI and are looking for decent Mexican then try Laredo's. 
 I think Laredo's has the best Mexican food in Madison. I really like their salsa and guacamole. They have great cheese enchiladas too. Their margaritas are really tasty too:-) I recommend going to eat here. 
 I have to admit that I was a little bit surprised in that the food was actually pretty good.  I'm not sure why I was expecting otherwise.  I guess because from the outside it just looks like your standard cookie cutter Mexican restaurant.  Hell maybe it is.I had a veggie fajita that came out as it should sizzling on a cast iron skillet.  The veggies were well prepared and flavorful as were the beans and rice that came with them.The only complaint I have is with the horchata I drank.  It tasted OK but it was too rich.  Like they ran low on rice milk and supplemented with cow milk or something.  It also left a slight film in my mouth which is a quick way to get me to dislike anything. 
 It's not the best or most authentic but I love it.  The service is great and combo #1 is a home run. 
 This is about the one near Hilldale.  Awful. No stars. I guess we should have taken our clues form the emptiness of the restaurant and the fact happy our lasted until closing....The margarita was a sickly peach color and was solid in the pitcher.The plates were served with the thumb of a dirty oven mitt in the food (I'm guessing they came out of the microwave).The enchiladas were slimy and water-logged covered in a dilute flavorless \mole\ (i wouldn't call it that.The rice was instant and without any seasoning not even salt  with a couple bits of also favor less corn.  The waiter did one of those disinterested \howseverythinggoingeverythingokay\ before we flagged him back to say it was inedible. We declined his offer to make it again and just received a bill for the margaritas that we also left.On the way when we commented on how gross the food looked as well as tasted another dinner confirmed she would never go there again.So we went across the road to Pascals and had real margaritas and excellent enchiladas with Mole.Stay away! 
 Basic Mexican fare.  Service is good.  Food is inexpensive.  I am a regular.See more info in my review of Pedro's. 
 Food was excellent and our server was exceptional.  He was friendly checked back with us often and made sure we had a great meal.  I would go back for the food but the server we had put it over the top for me. 
 Some of the best Mexican food in Madison. Well priced great food friendly service and nice atmosphere. 
 This is where you go to get wrecked............ by cheese.  If you like cheese A LOT you can order any of their delicious combos smothered in ooey gooey creamy warm cheese.  Is there actually any real food underneath the gigantic blobs of cheese?  Strap on a portable oxygen tank and dive in to find out!In the 1988 film \The Blob\ an evil life form goes around eating people only at Laredo's you can finally get yer revenge and eat the blob...............if you dare!  *blurp *blurp* 
 so chinese food... i never care for it but every once in a while mr. bekee gets a hankerin' so i go along.their vegetable moo shu was excellent. a great mix of fresh crispy (when necessary) vegetables and egg delivered with four pancakes (not flour tortillas like some places try to pull) and yummy plum sauce. the vegetable spring roll was also a success though a little over-greasy.my dining companion had a three-meat and garlic sauce dish which he said was delicious with dumplings and a pork egg roll. all were very tasty.the best part was that the delivery took under 15 minutes! and we're over 2 miles away as the car drives. i presume they'll become part of our lazy weekend agenda. 
 It was all right.  The vegetable egg roll was great.  The fried rice was ok.  I had chicken lo mein and the noodles & vegetables were good but the meat was yuck.  I'm not sure what it is... I think I should only order items that do NOT have meat in them when I go to restaurants because I commonly end up unsatisfied with the meat and it ruins the whole meal.  The checken was bland tasteless kind of gummy and some pieces were extremely gristly.The fortune cookies were the good kind :) and they gave my boyfriend real pancakes w/his order (moo shu pork I think?)  He seemed to like his quite a bit.PS it was delivery not eat-in and the delivery time wasn't horrible but not super great. 
 I ordered delivery from this place. It took them about 40 min to deliver which I think is a standard. Well the food was alright - didn't wow me and my friend but we didn't complain about it either.I liked the fact that they serve not overly greasy chinese. We ordered pork chop suey mixed vegetable and beef with snow peas. All of them tasted  good without making my guts feel nauseous. One thing my friend and I didn't know - so in Midwest (or in Madison only?) \chow mein\ is not a noodle dish .... .  So make sure to order \Lo mein\ if you want that noodle dish. Chow mein is chop suey. I swear it's not like that in California! 
 This is my go to place for Chinese delivery. Never actually been to the store though most of the food is pretty standard however the dumplings are fantastic they're all I order now. 
 No vegetarian options and staff always too busy and not personable. 
 This is our \go-to\ Chinese restaurant on the North and East side of Madison. It's not going to knock your socks off or anything but it's by far the best in the area in this price range. The food is not super greasy or full of crazy amounts of that fake testing Chinese food seasoning some of the restaurants put in (I don't know what it is...but there are some of you right now who know what I'm talking about!). They are not overly helpful on the phone but in the many times we've ordered (over 6 years) they've never messed up on an order are always within 30 minutes of a delivery time and deliver HOT. We recommend the orange chicken the vegetable lo mein and any form of tofu--especially the tofu cashew (as a nice vegetarian option). I see that some people say there aren't veggie options but as a family that is primarily vegetarian they've substituted tofu in every dish without complaint. And will make just about any dish you ask. They may not appear to be excited about doing it but then again I don't think they get excited about anything....They just do what they do--Make good fast hot Chinese food. Really what more do you want? 
 My go to delivery Chinese spot..from that category you gotta know what to expect but the Wok definitely steps it up over any other delivery place that I know of in the area. 
 So far the best Chinese delivery we've had here in Madison. Their food is flavorful fresh and not super-greasy. They also have an online menu to order from which is amazing! It makes life simple and I don't have to worry that I mispronounce something or said the wrong thing entirely. The only complaint I had is that while our food was steamy hot the crab rangoons weren't. They were actually a little on the cool side. But it's delivery so that's not all that surprising. 
 Tasty.  Not too greasy not too salty.  Quick delivery.Fresh ingredients.Fast delivery... use the computer based ordering system... very efficient.Overall very good food and experience. 
 You know how you see a picture of food at a restaurant you order it only to have what is put on your plate barely resemble what you saw in the picture?  Well you don't have to worry about this at China Wok.  What you get as your meal looks even better than the pictures above their counter.I've dined at this carry out Chinese location numerous times over the past 2 years.  My office is only a mile or so away and it makes for a quick meal.  I must say I feel like something has changed in the past year.  When I used to go I felt like no matter what I ordered it all looked/tasted the same. (ie sauce color vegetables etc)  But for the past year or so my coworker and I marvel at how great the food looks when it comes from the kitchen.  We primarily dine in.  We're practically giving each other high-fives because we feel like we just scored big.And the flavor is just as good as it looks.  I just ate at another carryout Chinese location and the quality of food reminded me how great China Wok is so I jumped out to right this review.I regularly get Kung Pao Chicken or Mongolian Beef.  My coworker exclusively gets General Tso's Chicken (this thing always looks amazing!)Value is always great...we can get both of our lunches i usually add an egg roll (75 cents) and he usually gets a soda and it costs us around $12 for both of us.  Quantity of food is also great.As you can tell I highly recommend this place.  Given it's a carryout Chinese place I really should give it 5 stars for overcoming such an obstacle! 
 Like most Chinese in Madison (it seems) China Wok is pretty middle of the road. I won't say it's the worst I've had... that honor was given to Wong's on Atwood but it's certainly not the best. I have 3 indicators for good Chinese food. 1. What color is the sweet and sour sauce? (It shouldn't be red.)2. How thick are the crispy noodles? (They shouldn't be they're noodles thick \noodles\ are just fried wonton wrappers.)3. What are their specialties. (If they all sound American they're not special.)While China Wok has red sauce thick noodles and specialties that I could probably make it's decent when you're in a bind have nothing in the fridge and live 2 minutes away. They also have a pretty large delivery radius and it's only ten bucks minimum so even if you're solo you can probably hit that mark. Extremely nice folks though so for convenience and pleasurable peeps I'd probably hit them up again. 
 There food is good for what it is and the owners are great!! A few months back they let me in after hours to order. 
 I need to give these guys another star solely based on the fact that I've been there 3 times this month. And while I hold my ground that it isn't he best in town the staff is incredible... so sweet! And if you miss their crazy 5-$7 lunch specials 11-3 that's ok because dinner specials start at $8 or so. Again I've had better in town but for fast like lightening fast take-out it's fit the bill on some colder nights when I didn't feel like leaving the couch to cook. 
 Thanks for the Chinese Delivery suggestion Yelp! I ordered online using the Beyond Menu app which was simple enough.Delicious food. I ordered the Moo Goo Gai Pan (see pic) and Egg Drop Soup. Delivery arrived on-time. Will order delivery from here again! 
 Good Chinese at an affordable price. They have the best lunch combos and the food is usually ready for pickup in 10 minutes. My food is always hot and have yet had any complaints with consistency.  Not the best Chinese out there but for the price it's pretty solid! 
 DISGUSTING !! I had lunch there yesterday. Half way through there was a hair in my sub. It looked like a pubic hair. I took up to the manager and he offered to make me a new one. Since he was the one who made it in the first place I respectfully declined. How about you guys where hair nets or beard nets. I will not go back to this place again. 
